Privacy Policy
Table of contents
Personal data we collect from you
How we use your personal data
Your privacy rights
Third parties processing your personal data
Anonymous Mode
Flo for Partners
Retention of your personal data
Security of your personal data
Children’s privacy
Communication with you
Storage and international personal data transfers
United States
Contact us
Effective as of 6 September, 2024
See the previous versions of our Privacy Policy
here
.
This policy explains how we handle your personal data. Here’s a quick summary first, with key takeaways. It is not a substitute for reading the full policy, along with our Terms of Use.
Safeguarding Your Data: Flo’s dedication to Privacy and Security
We are proud to hold two certifications for internationally recognised privacy and security standards. Flo has obtained independent certifications in both ISO/IEC 27001 in Information Security and ISO/IEC 27701 in Privacy. Our certifications demonstrate our commitment to maintain high standards when it comes to securing your information and managing a strong privacy programme. When you use Flo, you are trusting us with your personal data. We are committed to being transparent, protecting your rights, and respecting your data.
Anonymous Mode
Flo is the first female health app to introduce further privacy protections for your data with Anonymous Mode. With an even deeper layer of privacy, Anonymous Mode gives you the option to access the app without your name, email address, or technical identifiers being associated with the data you put into the app.
Data that helps to serve you
When you use Flo, we collect your personal data and use it to improve your experience and service. We can then increase the safety and accuracy of your predictions and give you relevant app content and product offers.
You can contribute to the growth of the Flo community
If you consent, we may use technical information about your device and other information about you (such as your device’s unique technical identifier, age group, subscription status, emails and the fact you launch the app) to reach you for promotional purposes.
You’re in control and can reach out to us
We believe in transparent and open conversation - you can access, modify, correct, erase, and update your personal data by emailing us at
support@flo.health
or emailing our data protection officer at
dpo@flo.health.
Where we rely on your consent to process your personal data, you can withdraw your consent. If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, let us know.
We limit children’s access to the app
You must be at least 13 years old to use the app (16 years old for European Economic Area, United Kingdom residents and Canada).
Introduction
This Privacy Policy explains how Flo Health UK Limited and its affiliated entities (“Flo” or “we” or “us”) complies with the provisions of the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), the UK GDPR and any other applicable data protection laws and regulations. This Privacy Policy explains how Flo collects, stores, uses, transfers, and shares personal data from our users (“you”) in connection with the Flo mobile application, Flo Period & Ovulation Tracker application (the “App”),* and the flo.health website, including all subdomains, products and services related to it (the “Website”) (all collectively, the “Services”).
Flo Health UK Limited is a UK registered data controller of the Services.
*The App may be listed under a different name depending on your location. A full list of names is available
here
.
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. If the changes are material, we will notify you by email or through the App. If permitted by law, your continued use of the Services after this policy has been updated indicates your acceptance of changes made. In some cases, you will be given a choice to accept changes to this policy. If you do not accept the terms of the updated Privacy Policy, please do not use the Services.
The latest updates to this policy are available on our Website and in the App.
Personal data we collect from you
We collect personal data about you when you interact with the Services. This can be directly from you or from other sources and third parties.
Personal data you provide to us directly:
General information:
When you sign up to use the Services, we may collect personal data such as your name, email address, year and month of birth
, password, place of residence and
location information including time zone and language. We may be able to infer your sex and/or gender by your use of the Services.
You may also choose to input information such as your first name or the name you would like us to call you. This is led by you and it will not affect your use of the Services should you choose not to enter this information.
Well-being:
When you use the Services, you can choose to input personal data about yourself, such as your weight; height; body mass index (BMI); body temperature; menstrual cycle dates; pregnancy and details relating to your pregnancy (if you select the pregnancy mode); other symptoms and stages that are related to your menstrual cycle; perimenopause and menopause symptoms; general well-being and health; symptoms, which may include information relating to your sex life; or other information, like your physical and mental well-being, water intake and sleep duration.
Third-party services (including wearables):
With your consent, you may also allow us to connect to third-party services, such as Apple HealthKit and Google Health Connect. This enables us to import information about your health and activities into the App without the need for you to log it yourself. This imported data may include fitness activities, weight, height, BMI, calories burned, heart rate, number of steps/distance traveled, body temperature, sleep and other activity data. This data provides you with general insights into your activities and helps us to make better predictions regarding your cycle. We will process this data in order to provide you with App functionality and features. Importing this data is subject to the
Google Health Connect
and
Apple HealthKit
privacy policies and terms. Please also check the applicable terms and privacy policies of the wearable devices that you may use to connect to Flo. Your wearable provider may collect usage data relating to your connection for its own business purposes, including to improve its services.
Personal data we collect automatically:
When you access or use the Services, we may automatically collect the following information:
Device information:
device model; information about the operating system and its version; unique device identifiers; enabled device accessibility features (e.g., display features, hearing features, and physical and motor features); mobile operator and network information; device storage information or version of your device system.
Location information:
IP address for an approximate location (not precise location); time zone or information about your mobile service provider.
Data about your use of the Services,
including: frequency of use; areas and features of the Services that you access or use; payment transaction information (excluding full payment card details) or engagement with particular features.
To collect this and other information, we may use cookies and other similar technologies. See more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Data from external sources:
we may receive personal data about you from third parties. For example, we may obtain information from third parties to enhance or supplement your existing information, including to customize your experience and for statistical purposes and analytics.
How we use your personal data
Depending on which features of the Services you use, we will process your personal data based on one or more of the following legal bases (we have included some examples):
Your
consent
: you can give us permission to process your health data to provide the Services.
To fulfill our contractual obligations to you in order to provide the Services to you
: we may process your personal data to fulfill our contractual obligation to you for activities such as management of your Flo account and other administrative purposes.
Legitimate interest:
we may process your personal data based on our legitimate interests in order to manage our Services better. For example, we may use your personal data in order to:
identify and fix bugs;
determine genuine user interaction with the Services (rather than bots);
monitor the App and analyze its performance and reliability;
inform you of matters concerning your subscriptions;
conduct vulnerability scanning to protect the security of the Services; and
review aggregated App usage trends.
Further examples of our legitimate interests are outlined in the table below. When relying on this legal basis,
we first determine that we have a legitimate interest in conducting and managing our business. We then consider and balance potential impacts to you and your rights, to ensure that our interests do not override them.
Legal obligation
: We may be obligated to process some of your personal data to comply with applicable laws and regulations.
Below, we describe the purposes for which we process your personal data and our lawful bases for doing so, including some basic examples:
Purpose of processing
Legal basis for processing
Example
To support the existing functions of the App, including tailored content, insights and materials you see when you use the App based on: the data you provide within the App; the Services you have selected for use (e.g. your selected mode) and the App features you engage with; information obtained from connected third-party services (like Apple HealthKit and Google Health Connect); and certain information provided in onboarding questionnaires.
Consent
We use your cycle data to predict your future cycles or ovulation, analyze your data to provide you with new features and Services, and provide certain suggested articles or materials (e.g., stories, Health Assistant, and Secret Chats) to read.
For the customization of product and service offerings and making our recommendations to you, for example through emails or push notifications, including for third-party products and offerings (excluding data from Apple HealthKit and Google Health Connect).
Consent
We may offer you a discount for Flo Premium.
To process transactions and send you related information, including confirmations and reminders for account management and other administrative purposes.
Contract
Using your device data, we may send you a reminder (e.g., via push notifications) if your subscription has expired or is due to expire, or we may send you an email containing your invoice, if applicable.
To respond to your comments, questions, requests and to provide customer service.
Legitimate interest
We may process your name and email to reply to your support request or to contact you about a specific query or question you have raised.
To review App content, feedback and complaints raised to ensure clinical safety and medical accuracy of the App.
Legitimate interest
We may process your name and email to review support requests that require review by our medical team.
To send you: technical notices and updates; security alerts (and investigate incidents); support and administrative messages; and  customer satisfaction surveys.
Legitimate interest
To request that you update your App to ensure you have access to the latest features.
To integrate data between the Website and App in connection with onboarding users. Please note that information provided during your Website onboarding journey, and before you create a Flo account, will not be stored by Flo until your account is created
.
Legitimate interest
When you sign up for the Services on the Website, we use a third party, AppsFlyer, to help us identify you as an existing user when you use the App.
To monitor and analyze trends, usage and activities in connection with our App.
Legitimate interest
We may analyze your browsing activity in the App to ensure the App functions as it should in response to your interactions, fix issues and improve your future experience.
Promotional communications regarding our Services.
Consent
If you give your consent and we use your personal data, we can post your review or comment on our Website.
Principles of processing
Data minimization and purpose limitation:
We will not process personal data in a way that is incompatible with the purposes for which it has been collected or authorized by you or collect any personal data that is not needed for the mentioned purposes.
No sale of personal data:
We will not sell or rent your personal data for monetary gain. We will not disclose your personal data except as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy. We will share your personal data with our service providers who support our Services as described in this Privacy Policy. We will also not use information received through your use of the Apple HealthKit or Google Health Connect framework for advertising or similar services, or sell it to advertising platforms, data brokers, or information resellers.
Your privacy rights
It does not matter what country, state, or region you come from; we are committed to providing you with individual privacy rights in accordance with the GDPR in relation to your personal data.
What are these rights?
Only you or a person legally authorized to act on your behalf may make a verifiable request related to your personal data. We reserve the right to perform reasonable checks to confirm a person’s authorization, (for example, in the US, we may check if they are a person registered with the California Secretary of State).
Correction of your personal data
If you believe that your personal data is inaccurate, you have the right to contact us and ask us to correct such personal data.
Restriction of processing
You have the right to request that the processing of your personal data be restricted in some circumstances. For example, you have the right to request the restriction of your personal data if you contest the accuracy of your personal data and we need some time to verify such accuracy.
Access to your personal data
You have the right to request information about what personal data we process about you, to access all your personal data and to receive a copy of it, including in a structured and portable form (.json). For iOS Flo Premium users, the App also enables you to download a report containing some of your personal data from within the App.
Right to data portability
You have the right to request your personal data in a portable form which enables you to, for instance, reuse your data for your individual purposes or different services. In other words, it may allow you to move, copy or transfer personal data from Flo in a safe and secure way.
Erasure of your personal data
You have the right to request that we erase your personal data at any time. Please be aware that erasing some personal data may affect your experience using certain features of the Services that rely on historical data.
Objection to the processing of your personal data
You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data, for example, if we process it for direct marketing purposes.
How to exercise your privacy rights
Please email us at
support@flo.health
to exercise your privacy rights.
If you would like to exercise your right to
request erasure of your account,
you can visit the settings in your App.
We will address your request within one-month after receipt. It can take us up to 90 days in some cases, for example, for full erasure of your personal data stored in our backup systems. We will let you know if we need more time and explain the reasons for the delay.
We rely on your consent to process your health data to access the Services. You can withdraw this consent by contacting us or deleting your account in the App.
What else?
Please keep in mind that if we receive a vague request, we may contact you to better understand the request. We may also refuse to comply with or charge a reasonable fee for a request that is manifestly unfounded and/or excessive (repetitive) requests.
We will require you to prove your identity. Normally, we will verify that the request is coming from the same email that you provided when registering. If you have not registered your account, we may ask you to undergo additional verification checks to ensure we can appropriately respond to you.
Subject to applicable laws, you may have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority about any of our activities. If you have any concerns about our privacy practices, please let us know by emailing our support team at
support@flo.health
or by emailing our data protection officer at
dpo@flo.health
.
Third parties processing your personal data
We will not share your personal data with third parties except as specified within this Privacy Policy.
Promoting our Services
With your consent, we may share some of your
non-health
personal data with AppsFlyer to promote the Services.
AppsFlyer is a mobile marketing platform that handles your personal data in accordance with our instructions. By using AppsFlyer and its integrated partners to promote the Services, we are able to reach you and people like you on various platforms and spread the word about Flo. If we need to share your personal data with other platforms for this purpose, except as we have explained in this Privacy Policy, we will ask for your
consent
.
Here is a step-by-step illustration of how we work with AppsFlyer and its integrated partners for marketing and promotional purposes:
1. You become a Flo user, and with your consent, we start sharing the following personal data with AppsFlyer and its integrated partners to promote the Services:
technical identifiers: IP address (which may also provide general location information), user agent, identifier for advertisers (IDFA), Android ID (in Android devices), Google advertising ID, customer-issued user ID, and other similar unique technical identifiers
your age group;
your subscription status; and
the fact of App launch.
2. Flo sends your personal data to AppsFlyer, which analyzes it and provides us reports and insights on how to optimize our promotional campaigns.
3. At the same time, AppsFlyer sends your personal data to some of its integrated partners (e.g., Pinterest, Google Ads, Apple Search Ads, Meta Audience and others) to find you or people like you on different platforms, including social media websites.
These integrated partners analyze your personal data and show relevant information about Flo to people who might be potentially interested in it or remind you about revisiting the App if you stopped using it a while ago.
Read more about how AppsFlyer works
here
and how its integrated partners work
here
.
4. Opt-out options
: You can withdraw your consent or opt out from the sharing of your personal data with AppsFlyer for marketing purposes in accordance with this subsection anytime by adjusting your device settings in iOS or Android.
Note that we also use AppsFlyer to integrate data between the Website and App in connection with onboarding users. You are not able to opt out of AppsFlyer’s processing of your personal data for these purposes.
Processing to make the App run
In some situations, we engage other companies to process your personal data on our behalf. We refer to these companies or service providers as “processors.”
Processors are companies that help us run the Services, support our communication with you, or perform other App-related activities. They process certain personal data on our behalf to accomplish the goals related to the App functions and deliver the Services. We remain responsible for any acts or omissions of our processors, and we enter into data processing contracts with them to the extent required by applicable law.
Flo’s team is based in a number of countries. The following group companies are therefore data processors within the Flo group of companies:
Flo Health Cyprus Ltd (based in Cyprus);
Flo Health LTU UAB (based in Lithuania and our main EU establishment); and
Flo Health NL. BV (based in the Netherlands).
Here are some of the main processors we rely on:
Type
Processor
Processor's privacy policy
Data collected
Purpose
Infrastructure and security
Amazon Web Services, Inc.
AWS Privacy Notice
All personal data
Storage of all personal data when you use the App
Infrastructure and security
Cloudflare, Inc.
Cloudflare Privacy Policy
All personal data
Security of the App, content delivery
Infrastructure and security
Auth0, Inc. (Okta, Inc.)
Okta Privacy and Cookie Policy
Email address
IP address
Name
Authentication and authorization services
Infrastructure and security
Kibana (ElasticSearch) Inc.
ElasticSearch Inc. Privacy Statement
All personal data
To protect users’ data
Infrastructure and security
Vercel Inc.
Vercel’s Privacy Policy
Personal data processed via the Website
Improving the performance of the Website to ensure efficient service delivery
Email communications
SendGrid, Inc. (Twilio, Inc.)
SendGrid Privacy Notice
Email address
To reach you with our newsletters, surveys and notifications
Email and in-App communications
SurveyMonkey (Momentive Europe UC))
SurveyMonkey Privacy Notice
IP address
User ID
Results of surveys
To deliver different Service-related surveys
Analytical tools
Looker (Google Cloud EMEA, Ltd))
Looker Privacy Policy
App usage data
To understand how you use the App, engage with particular features and what you like or dislike the most
To generate statistical reports.
Analytical tools
Databricks, Inc.
Databricks Privacy Notice
App usage data
To understand how you use the Website, engage with particular features and what you like or dislike the most to engineer product experiences
Analytical tools
Google LLC (Google Tag Manager & Google Analytics 4)
Google Privacy Policy
Google Analytics 4: Data privacy and security
Website usage data
To monitor our performance and understand how you use the Services on our Website, while applying suitable privacy protections.
Internal functions
Algolia SAS
Algolia Privacy Policy
I
P address and user ID
Content of the search request
Age
Aim and usage purpose
To provide you search functions inside the App, including search suggestions for all users
Some personal data is needed to increase the accuracy of the search
Customer support
Zendesk Inc., USA
Zendesk Privacy Policy
Email address
Content of the emails
To process and sort all emails received from you
Customer support
Customer Thermometer Ltd
Customer Thermometer Privacy Policy
Email address
Responses to surveys
To obtain customer feedback
Machine Learning Development Platform
Tecton, Inc.
Tecton Privacy Policy
Data relating to cycle dates, goals, symptoms
Providing you with predictions and App functionality
Payments
Apple, Inc.
Apple: App Store & Privacy Notice
Payment and banking information
Personal identifiers
To collect and process payments for subscription to the App
Payments
Google LLC, USA
Google Privacy Policy
Payment and banking information
Personal identifiers
To collect and process payments for subscription to the App
Payments
Stripe, Inc., USA
Stripe Privacy Policy
Payment and banking information
Personal identifiers
To collect and process payments for certain Website
Payments
PayPal Inc.
PayPal Privacy Statement
Payment and banking information
Personal identifiers
To collect and process payments for subscription to the App
Payments
Chargeback Gurus (International Risk Mitigation, LLC)
Chargeback Gurus Privacy Policy
Payment and banking information
To handle disputes and process refunds
User onboarding and data integration
AppsFlyer UK Ltd
AppsFlyer Privacy Policy
Data relating to device model, language and operating system
To integrate data between the Website and App in connection with onboarding users
To create a link between accounts when utilizing Flo for Partners
To simplify, track and optimize influencers campaigns
For information relating to processors we engage to utilize cookies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Aggregated information
We may aggregate, anonymize, or de-identify your personal data so that it cannot reasonably be used to identify you. We may share such data with third parties such as academic research institutions or use the data for statistical purposes. For example, we may share or use general age and demographic information and aggregate statistics about certain activities or symptoms from data collected to help identify patterns across users in articles, blog posts, and scientific publications. Sharing such data may contribute to the advancement of scientific research on female health.
For certain targeted academic or user research studies, we will contact you and rely on your consent. You can withdraw your consent at any time by emailing us at
dpo@flo.health
.
Information posted by you
The App features several community areas like Secret Chats and guided groups where users with similar interests can share information and support one another.
Posting your personal data in such groups is not permitted, and is in violation of our rules, such as the
Secret Chats Rules
. Any information (including personal data) you share in any online community area or online discussion is by its nature, open to the Flo community. Please think carefully before posting anything that may identify you in any public forum. Remember, what you post can be seen, disclosed to, or collected by others and may be used in ways we cannot control or predict, including to contact you for unauthorized purposes. If you mistakenly post personal data in our community areas and would like it removed, email us at
support@flo.health
.
We may also preserve or share some of your personal data in the following limited circumstances:
in response to subpoenas, court orders, or legal processes, to the extent permitted and as required by applicable law (including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements);
when disclosure is required to maintain the security and integrity of the Services or to protect any user’s security or the security of other persons, consistent with applicable laws. In such cases, we may also delete some of your personal data (e.g., by resetting your password to avoid unauthorized access);
to assert legal rights or defend against legal claims;
when disclosure is directed or consented to by the user who has inputted the personal data;
in the context of an acquisition or transfer of any party of our business or in connection with the business reorganization; and
depending on the circumstance, we may rely on legitimate interest or legal obligation as our legal basis for the processing activities above.
Anonymous Mode
Anonymous Mode lets you create a Flo account without your email, name, or technical identifiers being associated with your new Anonymous Mode account.
If you have an existing account, certain non-identifiable data will be transferred to your new Anonymous Mode account (e.g., your cycle data). Your old account with personal information you logged from your previous cycles will be automatically deleted in line with our retention policy, and you will no longer have access to it.
Limitations of Anonymous Mode:
When you choose to create an Anonymous Mode account, some features of the App will not be available to you since they use personal data to function. These features may include integration with your wearable device, some push notifications and emails.
When you create an Anonymous Mode account, we cannot identify you. While our customer support will not be able to answer some specific or technical questions, we will do our best to help.
As is the case with all digital Services, in certain limited circumstances, it may be theoretically possible for someone to find a way around security measures. For instance, a user’s device may be utilized without authorization by a third party. Anonymous Mode accounts unlink all personal information from stored health data, which reduces the risks posed by such events. For more information about Anonymous Mode, please read our Anonymous Mode FAQs
here
.
Flo for Partners
If you are over 18 years old, you can select the Flo for Partners Service,
in which you permit certain information from your Flo account to be shared with your partner.
As the main user, you have full control over this sharing and can stop sharing at any time.
What information will be shared with my partner?
Your partner will have read-only access to the information that you share. This means that they cannot download or edit your information. Your partner can not see or edit: your calendar information that was created prior to your decision to share; your personal notes; any symptoms or feelings that you have logged while using the App; or your interaction with other features in the App (such as Secret Chats).
If you’re trying to conceive
or
keeping track of your menstrual cycle,
your partner will have access to a view-only version of your current cycle day and cycle phase predictions calendar. Your partner will also receive tailored daily educational insights and notifications during significant phases of your cycle.
If you’re pregnant,
your partner will receive regular updates about your pregnancy, including tailored daily educational insights. They will also receive notifications about any changes that may be happening to your body, symptoms commonly experienced and important development milestones.
Your partner will be able to see within their App if you switch between modes - for example, if you switch from ‘track pregnancy’ to ‘track cycle’ their content will be adjusted accordingly.
What data is collected from you as a partner?
If you’re a partner and you are receiving information from the main Flo user, we will collect your name and email (in order to create a partner account with Flo) and your month and year of birth in order to verify your age. While your gender information is not directly collected, this is inferred by your use of the App. We will not collect any health data relating to you.
Retention of your personal data
Except as set forth below, we will retain your personal data for as long as needed to provide you with the Services or otherwise fulfill the purposes for which it was collected.
Impact of account deactivation/requests to erase personal data:
At any time, you can deactivate your account by following the steps detailed above at ‘How to exercise your privacy rights’. We will address your deletion request within one-month after receipt. It will take us up to 90 days in some cases to complete full erasure of your personal data stored in our backup systems. If you choose to deactivate your account, Flo will generally delete all your personal data, and it will not be recoverable should you later create another account.
Impact of App deletion or inactivity:
If you choose to delete the App from your device or your account becomes inactive, we will retain your personal data for a period of three years in case you decide to reactivate the Services or reinstall the App. After three years of inactivity, we will delete your personal information. While this is the Flo data retention standard, you can still ask for your data to be deleted at an earlier date by contacting us. The App covers different periods of users’ lifecycle; therefore, retention of your data is needed in some cases to secure your smooth experience with other App functions (e.g., switching to pregnancy mode after cycle tracking).
Limitations
: You should be aware that although we will delete, anonymize or otherwise de-identify your data where possible, we may retain certain personal data and other information after your account has been terminated or deleted. This is as required and permitted by applicable law, like the GDPR, and will include the following circumstances:
as necessary to comply with legal obligations;
establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; and
for archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or historical research or statistical purposes.
How do we delete your data?
We use industry-standard methods and procedures to ensure that we securely and permanently delete your personal data from our systems so that it is no longer capable of recovery. These procedures can include automated notifications to some of our processors who process your personal data on our behalf.
Security of your personal data
General security measures
We implement technical and organizational measures in an effort to protect personal data from loss, theft, misuse, and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction, taking into account the nature of the personal data that we process and risks associated with special categories of personal data we collect. This includes:
encryption of your personal data in transit and in rest;
systematic vulnerability scanning and penetration testing;
protection of data integrity;
organizational and legal measures: For example, our employees have different levels of access to your personal data and only access your personal data for limited and necessary purposes required for the operation of the Services. We impose strict responsibility on our employees for any disclosure, unauthorized access, alteration, destruction, or misuse of your personal data; and
conducting periodical data protection impact assessments in order to ensure that the Services fully adhere to the principles of privacy by design, privacy by default, and others. We also commit to undertake a privacy audit in the event of Flo’s merger or takeover.
Please protect your password. Do not share it with others or allow anyone to use your mobile device. You may also wish to add a passcode or enable face ID to access the App for an added layer of protection.
No security system is perfect. Therefore, we cannot guarantee the absolute security of the Services or that your information will not be intercepted while being transmitted to us.
Security breaches
If we learn of a security systems breach, we may either post a notice or attempt to notify you by email and will take reasonable steps to remedy the breach as specified in applicable law and this Privacy Policy. If we learn of a potential personal data breach, together with other actions referred to in the Privacy Policy, we will take actions to remedy the breach as appropriate under the circumstances, which may include logging you out from all the devices, resetting a password (sending a temporary password for you to apply), and performing other reasonably necessary activities.
If you want to report a security incident related to the Services, please email us at
security@flo.health.
Children’s privacy
General age limitation:
The Services are not intended for children, and we do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 13 years old through the Services. If you are aware of anyone under 13 years old using the Services, please email us at
support@flo.health
and we will take the required steps to delete such information and/or delete the child’s account.
Age limitation for residents of the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK) and Canada:
Due to legal requirements, we do not allow the use of the Services by residents of EEA or the UK younger than 16 years old. If you are aware of anyone younger than 16 using the Services, please email us at
support@flo.health
, and we will take steps to delete such information and/or delete the child’s account.
Some App functions are only available to users over the age of 18 years.
Communication with you
We may contact you from time to time via email or through other means (like pop-ups or push notifications) to communicate with you about Services, offers, promotions, rewards, and events offered by us and provide news and information that we think will be of interest to you. These communications may be based on the Services you have selected for use (e.g. your selected mode) and the App features you engage with.
Opt-out options:
You can always opt out of receiving marketing emails by unsubscribing via the “Unsubscribe” link contained in the email. Opting out of these marketing emails or notifications will not end the transmission of service-related emails that are necessary to your use of the Services. You may also opt out of receiving push notifications by adjusting your settings in your device. If required, we may ask some users to provide additional consent for such communications.
Please note that we may contact you with information about Services, offers, promotions, rewards, and events offered by us and others via third-party platforms (like social media).
Presence on social networks
We may use social media platforms to promote Flo and engage with our customers. When you interact with us on these platforms, we may process information, such as your username, profile picture, and any comments or posts you make related to Flo, for engagement purposes only.
Storage and international personal data transfers
Flo is based in the UK. Personal data we collect is transferred to and processed in the US; where it is governed by US law) and to other countries (where it is governed by the applicable laws of those countries). These transfers are usually cloud-based, and can occur when you engage with the Services and are subject to our retention policies. The laws of other countries may not offer the same protections as the laws of your jurisdiction.
Transfers of personal data outside of the EEA and the UK
Personal data in the EEA and the UK is protected by the GDPR and the UK GDPR. When transferring personal data outside of these locations, we will always apply appropriate safeguards in accordance with the law to ensure your personal data is protected. For example, we enter into data transfer agreements that incorporate the European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses and carry out transfer risk assessments.
For further information, please email us at
support@flo.health.
Data Privacy Framework (“DPF”) participation
As set forth by the US Department of Commerce, Flo complies with the EU–US DPF, the UK extension to the EU–US DPF, and the Swiss–US DPF (collectively, the “DPFs”). We have certified to the US Department of Commerce that in reliance of the DPFs, we adhere to the DPFs’ principles when processing personal data of individuals within the European Union, United Kingdom, and/or Switzerland. For onward transfers, Flo is responsible for processing personal data we receive under the DPFs and then transfers to a third party acting on Flo’s behalf. Flo remains liable under the DPFs if those third parties process personal data in a way that is not in compliance with the DPFs, unless Flo can prove that we are not responsible for the cause of any damage.
If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the DPFs’ principles, the DPF principles will govern. You can view our certification
here
.
Complaints and dispute resolution:
We commit to resolve complaints about our collection and use of your personal data. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our DPFs should first contact us by emailing us at
dpo@flo.health
or by mail using the address Flo Health UK Limited, 27 Old Gloucester Street, London, WC1N 3AX, United Kingdom.
Arbitration:
You may also be able to invoke binding arbitration for unresolved complaints, but prior to initiating such arbitration, a resident of a European country (including Switzerland) participating in the DPFs must first (1) contact us and afford us the opportunity to resolve the issue; (2) seek assistance from JAMS; and (3) contact the US Department of Commerce (either directly or through a European data protection authority) and afford the Department of Commerce time to attempt to resolve the issue. If such a resident invokes binding arbitration, each party shall be responsible for its own attorney’s fees. Please be advised that pursuant to the DPFs, the arbitrator(s) may only impose individual-specific, nonmonetary, equitable relief necessary to remedy any violation of the DPFs with respect to the resident. The arbitration option may not be invoked if the individual’s same claimed violation of the principles (1) has previously been subject to binding arbitration; (2) was the subject of a final judgment entered in a court action to which the individual was a party; or (3) was previously settled by the parties.
We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission concerning personal data transferred under the DPFs, the United Kingdom’s Information Commissioner’s Office (for UK individuals), the relevant EU Data Protection Authority, and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner for resolving disputes with Swiss individuals.
We have further committed to refer unresolved DPFs complaints to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider located in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your complaint to your satisfaction, please contact JAMS or visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
United States
We do not sell your information for monetary gain.
Under certain state laws (including California), if we disclose personal information to a third party for any benefit, this can be considered a “sale” or “share” or personal information, even if the third party does not use the personal information for any other purpose. We “share” personal information if we disclose personal information to a company for purposes of cross-context behavioral advertising.
Request to opt out/Do Not Track
: We
do not sell
your personal information. You have the right to opt out of sharing your personal information with our analytics and advertising partners. This includes opting out of “sale” — a term very broadly defined under US state legislation (including California) — and “Do Not Track” requirements. Note: This personal information will not contain your health data. Regardless of your choices, we do not share health data with these partners.
Do Not Track is a web browsing setting that adds a signal to your browser header that tells other websites that you do not want their tracking cookies.
Flo currently does not respond to such signals in browsers because no DNT standard has been adopted.
To exercise this right you can contact us at support@flo.health.
Limiting the use of sensitive personal information:
Sensitive personal information that we process is limited to only those purposes that are necessary to provide Services to you.
Request to know/access:
In addition to the other rights mentioned in this policy, you have the right to request to know (i) the personal and sensitive information we have collected about you and our purposes of use; and (ii) the categories, sources, and third parties involved in personal information we have collected about you or “sold” or disclosed in the past 12 months. You may exercise your right to request to know twice a year, free of charge.
Shine the Light:
California residents may also request information from us once a calendar year about any personal information shared with third parties for their own direct marketing purposes. We don’t share information with third parties for their own marketing uses, but please email us at
support@flo.health
if you have questions. You’ll need to specify “California Privacy Rights Request” in the subject line of the email, and also include your name, street address, city, state, and ZIP code.
References to “personal data” in this policy include “sensitive/personal information” as defined under California laws.
Contact us
General
If you have any questions or concerns about your privacy, you may contact us or our data protection officer by writing to us at:
Flo Health UK Limited
, 27 Old Gloucester Street, London, WC1N 3AX, United Kingdom
Flo Health LTU UAB
, Saltoniškių street 2 Vilnius, LT-08126, Lithuania
(our main EU establishment)
Or by emailing us at
support@flo.health
or
dpo@flo.health
.
You may also contact your local data protection authority. You can find a list of local data protection authorities
here
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/:
Select your cookie preferences
We use essential cookies and similar tools that are necessary to provide our site and services. We use performance cookies to collect anonymous statistics, so we can understand how customers use our site and make improvements. Essential cookies cannot be deactivated, but you can choose “Customize” or “Decline” to decline performance cookies.
If you agree, AWS and approved third parties will also use cookies to provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content, including relevant advertising. To accept or decline all non-essential cookies, choose “Accept” or “Decline.” To make more detailed choices, choose “Customize.”
Accept
Decline
Customize
We use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") for the following purposes.
Essential
Essential cookies are necessary to provide our site and services and cannot be deactivated. They are usually set in response to your actions on the site, such as setting your privacy preferences, signing in, or filling in forms.
Performance
Performance cookies provide anonymous statistics about how customers navigate our site so we can improve site experience and performance. Approved third parties may perform analytics on our behalf, but they cannot use the data for their own purposes.
Allow performance category
Allowed
Functional
Functional cookies help us provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content. Approved third parties may set these cookies to provide certain site features. If you do not allow these cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Allow functional category
Allowed
Advertising
Advertising cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners and help us deliver relevant marketing content. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less relevant advertising.
Allow advertising category
Allowed
Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of our sites. You may review and change your choices at any time by selecting Cookie preferences in the footer of this site. We and selected third-parties use cookies or similar technologies as specified in the
AWS Cookie Notice
.
We display ads relevant to your interests on AWS sites and on other properties, including cross-context behavioral advertising. Cross-context behavioral advertising uses data from one site or app to advertise to you on a different company’s site or app.
To not allow AWS cross-context behavioral advertising based on cookies or similar technologies, select “Don't allow” and “Save privacy choices” below, or visit an AWS site with a legally-recognized decline signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control. If you delete your cookies or visit this site from a different browser or device, you will need to make your selection again. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
AWS Cookie Notice
.
Cross-context behavioral ads
Allow
Don't allow
To not allow all other AWS cross-context behavioral advertising,
complete this form by email
.
For more information about how AWS handles your information, please read the
AWS Privacy Notice
.
We will only store essential cookies at this time, because we were unable to save your cookie preferences.
If you want to change your cookie preferences, try again later using the link in the AWS console footer, or contact support if the problem persists.
Skip to main content
Privacy Notice
Last Updated: February 21, 2025
To see prior version, click
here
.
This Privacy Notice describes how we collect and use your personal information in relation to AWS websites, applications, products, services, events, and experiences that reference this Privacy Notice (together, “AWS Offerings”).
This Privacy Notice does not apply to the “content” processed, stored, or hosted by our customers using AWS Offerings in connection with an AWS account. See the agreement governing your access to your AWS account and the
AWS Data Privacy FAQ
for more information about how we handle content and how our customers can control their content through AWS Offerings. This Privacy Notice also does not apply to any products, services, websites, or content that are offered by third parties or have their own privacy notice.
Personal Information We Collect
How We Use Personal Information
Cookies
How We Share Personal Information
Location of Personal Information
How We Secure Information
Access and Choice
Children’s Personal Information
Third Party Sites and Services
Retention of Personal Information
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
Examples of Information Collected
Personal Information We Collect
We collect your personal information in the course of providing AWS Offerings to you.
Here are the types of information we gather:
Information You Give Us:
We collect any information you provide in relation to AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information you give us.
Automatic Information:
We automatically collect certain types of information when you interact with AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect automatically.
Information from Other Sources:
We might collect information about you from other sources, including service providers, partners, and publicly available sources. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect from other sources.
How We Use Personal Information
We use your personal information to operate, provide, and improve AWS Offerings. Our purposes for using personal information include:
Provide AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to provide and deliver AWS Offerings and process transactions related to AWS Offerings, including registrations, subscriptions, purchases, and payments.
Measure, Support, and Improve AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to measure use of, analyze performance of, fix errors in, provide support for, improve, and develop AWS Offerings.
Recommendations and Personalization:
We use your personal information to recommend AWS Offerings that might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalize your experience with AWS Offerings.
Comply with Legal Obligations:
In certain cases, we have a legal obligation to collect, use, or retain your personal information. For example, we collect bank account information from AWS Marketplace sellers for identity verification.
Communicate with You:
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to AWS Offerings via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat) and to respond to your requests.
Marketing:
We use your personal information to market and promote AWS Offerings.
Fraud and Abuse Prevention and Credit Risks:
We use your personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, AWS, and others. We may also use scoring methods to assess and manage credit risks.
Purposes for Which We Seek Your Consent:
We may also ask for your consent to use your personal information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you.
Cookies
To enable our systems to recognize your browser or device and to provide, market, and improve AWS Offerings, we and approved third parties use cookies and other identifiers. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
How We Share Personal Information
Information about our customers is an important part of our business and we are not in the business of selling our customers’ personal information to others. We share personal information only as described below and with Amazon.com, Inc. and the affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls that are either subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions Involving Third Parties:
We make available to you services, software, and content provided by third parties for use on or through AWS Offerings. You can tell when a third party is involved in your transactions, and we share information related to those transactions with that third party. For example, you can order services, software, and content from sellers using the AWS Marketplace and we provide those sellers information to facilitate your subscription, purchases, or support.
Third-Party Service Providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples include: delivering AWS hardware, sending communications, processing payments, assessing credit and compliance risks, analyzing data, providing marketing and sales assistance (including advertising and event management), conducting customer relationship management, and providing training. These third-party service providers have access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but may not use it for other purposes. Further, they must process that information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection law.
Business Transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or services. In such transactions, personal information generally is one of the transferred business assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy Notice (unless, of course, the individual consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely event that AWS or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your information will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Us and Others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce or apply our terms and other agreements, or protect the rights, property, or security of AWS, our customers, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud prevention and detection and credit risk reduction.
At Your Option:
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about you might be shared with third parties, and you will have an opportunity to choose not to share the information.
Location of Personal Information
Amazon Web Services, Inc. is located in the United States, and our affiliated companies are located throughout the world. Depending on the scope of your interactions with AWS Offerings, your personal information may be stored in or accessed from multiple countries, including the United States. Whenever we transfer personal information to other jurisdictions, we will ensure that the information is transferred in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection laws.
How We Secure Information
At AWS, security is our highest priority. We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We maintain a wide variety of compliance programs that validate our security controls. Click
here
to learn more about our compliance programs.
We protect the security of your information during transmission to or from AWS websites, applications, products, or services by using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards in connection with the collection, storage, and disclosure of personal information. Our security procedures mean that we may request proof of identity before we disclose personal information to you.
Access and Choice
You can view, update, and delete certain information about your account and your interactions with AWS Offerings. Click
here
for a list of examples of information that you can access. If you cannot access or update your information yourself, you can always contact us for assistance.
You have choices about the collection and use of your personal information. Many AWS Offerings include settings that provide you with options as to how your information is being used. You can choose not to provide certain information, but then you might not be able to take advantage of certain AWS Offerings.
Account Information:
If you want to add, update, or delete information related to your account, please go to the
AWS Management Console
. When you update or delete any information, we usually keep a copy of the prior version for our records.
Communications:
If you do not want to receive promotional messages from us, please unsubscribe or adjust your communication preferences in the
AWS Management Console
or the
AWS Email Preference Center
. If you do not want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification settings in the app or your device.
Cookies Preferences:
You can change your cookie preferences on AWS sites at any time by clicking Cookie Preferences in the footer of the AWS site. You can also manage cookies through your browser settings.
The "Help" feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to remove cookies from your device, how to prevent your browser or device from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether.
Sellers and Amazon Partners:
Sellers and Amazon Partner Network members can add, update, or delete information in the
AWS Marketplace
and
APN Partner Central
, respectively.
Children’s Personal Information
We don’t provide AWS Offerings for purchase by children. If you’re under 18, you may use AWS Offerings only with the involvement of a parent or guardian.
Third Party Sites and Services
AWS Offerings may embed content provided by others or include links to other websites and applications. These companies may collect information about you when you interact with their content or services. We are not responsible for the practices of these companies. Please consult their privacy policies to learn about their data practices.
Retention of Personal Information
We keep your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
If you have any concerns about privacy at AWS, please
contact us
with a thorough description, and we will try to resolve the issue for you.
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services, Inc., our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, ATTN: AWS Legal
Contact details for specific jurisdictions including the European Economic Area, the UK and Switzerland, can be found in “Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions” below.
If you interact with AWS Offerings on behalf of or through your organization, then your personal information may also be subject to your organization’s privacy practices, and you should direct privacy inquiries to your organization.
Our business changes constantly, and our Privacy Notice may also change. You should check our website frequently to see recent changes. You can see the date on which the latest version of this Privacy Notice was posted. Unless stated otherwise, our current Privacy Notice applies to all personal information we have about you and your account. We stand behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our policies and practices to make them less protective of personal information collected in the past without informing affected customers and giving them a choice.
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon Web Services, Inc. participates in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Click
here
to learn more.
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
We provide additional information about our controllers and data protection officers (as applicable), the privacy, collection, and use of personal information of prospective and current customers of AWS Offerings located in certain jurisdictions.
Brazil
Controller of Personal Information
. When Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda., A. Presidente Juscelino Kubitschek, 2.041, Torre E - 18th and 19th Floors, Vila Nova Conceicao, Sao Paulo, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering. The data protection officer for Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. can be contacted at aws-brazil-privacy@amazon.com.
Processing
. We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (ANPD) through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Transfers outside of Brazil
. When we transfer your personal information outside Brazil, we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
Canada
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements; and
lodge a complaint with us regarding our practices related to your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or by mail at 120 Bremner Blvd, 26th Floor, Toronto, Ontario, M5J 0A8, Canada, ATTN: AWS Canada Legal. Further, the Amazon Web Services Canada, Inc. Privacy Officer can be contacted at
aws-canada-privacy@amazon.com
or by mail at the address noted above.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Costa Rica
Your Rights
. With respect to data collected and processed by Amazon Web Services Costa Rica (“AWS Costa Rica”), you have the rights of access, rectification, erasure, restriction, or complaint. When you consent to AWS Costa Rica processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and AWS Costa Rica will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us at Zona Franca America, Edificio C7. 600 norte de Plaza Real Cariari, sobre la paralela a la Autopista General Cañas. San Francisco de Heredia, Costa Rica.
European Economic Area, UK, and Switzerland
Controller of Personal Information.
When Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 Avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxembourg, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is also the authorized representative of Amazon Web Services, Inc. in the EEA.
Processing.
We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Information We Retain After Your Account is Closed.
If you decide to terminate your agreement and close your AWS account, we will retain your content for a period of up to 90 days after account closure, during which you may still access part of the AWS Management Console in order to retrieve your billing documents and to contact customer support. During this period, you may also decide to reopen your AWS account. At the end of this period, we will delete any content remaining in your account.
After account closure, we may need to keep certain information for an additional period of time for legal and legitimate business purposes. For example, we may retain personal information such as your contact information (e.g., name, email address, physical address) and any invoices that AWS has sent to you (e.g., record of purchases, applicable discounts, and tax information) for tax and accounting purposes. If applicable, AWS may also retain records of communications with you, as well as relevant logs (e.g., a log of your account closure) for dispute resolution purposes. We further may keep records for preventing fraud and ensuring security, for example in case of misuse of our services or violation of our terms.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means.
Questions and Contacts.
If you wish to do any of these things or have a data-protection related question, and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
The data protection officer for Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL can be contacted at aws-EU-privacy@amazon.com.
You can also lodge a complaint with our principal supervisory authority, the
Commission Nationale pour la Protection des Données in Luxembourg
, or with a local authority.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Cookies.
Please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
Transfers outside of the EEA.
When we transfer your personal information outside the EEA we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
India
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services India Private Limited (formerly known as Amazon Internet Services Private Limited), our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services India Private Limited, Block E, 14th Floor, Unit Nos. 1401 to 1421, International Trade Tower, Nehru Place, New Delhi, Delhi 110019, India, ATTN: AWS India Legal.
Japan
Controller of Personal Information
Any personal information provided to or gathered by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN.
Any personal information collected by Amazon Web Services, Inc. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services, Inc.
Use of Personal Information
We jointly use your personal information for such purposes as described in this Privacy Notice with domestic and foreign affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls, including Amazon Web Services, Inc., Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, and other global entities that either are subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice. Jointly used personal information includes personal information described under “Personal Information We Collect” and “Example of Information Collected” above. Amazon Web Services, Inc. is the business operator primarily responsible for managing jointly used personal information.
We share personal information with third parties only to the extent described under “How We Share Personal Information” above and in accordance with the Act on Protection of Personal Information.
When we share your personal information with third parties outside of Japan, such as sellers of products on AWS Marketplace and sponsors of AWS events, we require the recipients to adopt personal information security measures to protect your personal information.
Please see
here
for information on the countries where third parties may be located, and the applicable data privacy laws and data protection systems in these countries.
Your Rights
You may have the right to request access to or delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law. If you wish to submit a data subject access request, please
contact us
(for AWS customers) or contact us at our mailing address, Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN, ATTN: AWS Japan Legal (for current or prospective customers of Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. and non-customers in Japan).
Malaysia
A Bahasa Malaysia translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Nigeria
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Nigeria Limited, located at 3-5 Sinari Daranijo Street, Off Ajose Adeogun, Victoria Island, Lagos, Nigeria (“AWS Nigeria”), AWS Nigeria is the data controller.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Nigeria customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
You can also file a complaint with Nigeria’s National Information Technology Development Agency through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Peru
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Peru S.R.L., located at Av. Jorge Basadre 349 San Isidro, Lima (“AWS Peru”), AWS Peru is the data controller and the personal data bank holder of the following data banks: customers, prospective customers, and vendors.
Personal Information.
Depending on how you engage with AWS Peru, we may process one or more of the following kinds of personal information: name, identity card number, Tax ID, contact information (such as address, telephone, email address), profession, banking and credit card details, and physical or electronic signature. For more information about the personal information that we collect, click
here
.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
exercise any other rights afforded by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Peru customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint before the Peruvian National Data Protection Authority through its official channels.
Data Processors and Transfers to Third Parties.
We may share your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice and as permitted by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations, including to Amazon Web Services Inc., located at 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, United States of America, for the purposes of providing services and engaging in marketing, business development, and sales efforts with respect to cloud services that Amazon Web Services, Inc. sells globally; and enabling the provision of data hosting, storage, and processing by Amazon Web Services, Inc. as AWS Peru’s data processor.
Philippines
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Philippines, Inc. (“AWS Philippines”), you may contact the Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) and Data Compliance Officer for Privacy (“COP”)
here
if you are an AWS Philippines customer. If you are not an AWS customer, you may contact the DPO and COP at 21st floor Arthaland Century Pacific Tower, 5th Avenue 1634 Bonifacio Global City, Taguig, Philippines.
South Africa
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services South Africa Proprietary Limited, located at 29 Gogosoa Street, Observatory, Cape Town, South Africa, 7925 (“AWS South Africa”), AWS South Africa is the responsible party.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
object, at any time to the processing of your personal information for purposes of direct marketing other than direct marketing by means of unsolicited electronic communications from AWS which is prohibited unless you give consent to receive such direct marketing;
object, at any time (at which point we will cease processing of your personal information), to the processing of your personal information if you feel the processing of that personal information is not necessary for protection of your legitimate interest/s; proper performance of a public law duty by a public body; or pursuance of the legitimate interests of AWS or of a third party to whom the information is supplied; and
to submit a complaint to the Information Regulator of South Africa regarding interference with the protection of your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS South Africa customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
The Information Regulator Contact Details. The Information Regulator of South Africa is located at: JD House, 27 Stiemens Street, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2001. P.O. Box 31533, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2017. You may direct general enquiries by email to:
enquiries@inforegulator.org.za
. You may direct complaints by email to:
POPIAComplaints@inforegulator.org.za
.
South Korea
AWS does not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 14 without the consent of the child's parent or guardian.
How We Share Personal Information
AWS may share personal information as described in this Privacy Notice, including with affiliates of Amazon Web Services, Inc.
AWS has contracts in place with the following third party service provider(s) (delegatees) to perform functions on behalf of AWS in Korea, and they may have access to your personal information as needed to perform their functions described below:
The details of delegation for event management can be found on the relevant event page.
AWS may share your personal information with the following third party service provider(s) outside of Korea as described below:
If you do not agree with the above-stated overseas transfers, please stop using AWS Services and close your AWS Account.
Deletion of Personal Information
AWS will delete your personal information (including after closure of your AWS account) as described in this Privacy Notice. When deleting personal information, AWS will take standard commercially reasonable measures to make the personal information practically irrecoverable or irreproducible. The specific manner of deletion will depend on the information being deleted, how the information was collected and stored, and your interactions with us. Electronic documents or files containing personal information will be deleted using a technical method that makes recovery or retrieval of such information practically impossible or renders the data no longer personally identifiable. Non-electronic documents or files containing personal information will be shredded, incinerated, or both.
Retention of Personal Information
AWS Korea keeps your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes as may be required by the Framework Act on National Taxes of Republic of Korea or other laws), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
If you have any privacy questions or requests please contact:
AWS Korea Privacy
Email: aws-korea-privacy@amazon.com
Korean translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Turkey
Controller of Personal Information.
When AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi is the provider of an AWS Offering, AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi, located at Esentepe Mahallesi Bahar Sk. Özdilek/River Plaza/Wyndham Grand Hotel Apt. No: 13/52 Şişli/İstanbul, Turkey, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
United States
These additional disclosures are required by certain state privacy laws to the extent they apply to your use of AWS Offerings, and serve as a Notice at Collection under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Categories of personal information collected
. The personal information that we may collect, or may have collected from consumers in the preceding twelve months, fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, alias, address, phone numbers, or IP address, your AWS account log-in information, or a government-issued identifier (such as a state-issued ID number, which may be required to verify your identity when completing certain AWS certification courses, or an ID you provide for identity verification, which in some cases may reflect citizenship or immigration status);
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information;
characteristics of protected classifications under California or US federal law, such as age, race, or gender or gender identity, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis;
commercial information, such as purchase activity;
internet or other electronic network activity information, including content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details;
information used to prevent and detect fraud or other unauthorized activity, including informing customers if such activity were to affect them;
biometric information, such as your voice or appearance, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of a speech or image recognition service;
geolocation data, which may in some cases constitute precise geolocation information, such as the location of your device or computer, for example if you enable location services to enhance your experience through event applications we offer;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, including when you communicate with us by phone or otherwise;
professional or employment-related information, for example data you may provide about your business;
inference data, such as information about your preferences; and
education information, such as information about enrollment status, fields of study, or degrees, honors, and awards received.
We collect this information from you, automatically through your interaction with the AWS Offerings, or from third parties. For more information about the personal information we collect, click
here
. We collect this information for the business and commercial purposes described in the “How We Use Personal Information” section above.
Categories of personal information disclosed for a business purpose
. The personal information that we may have disclosed about consumers for a business purpose in the preceding twelve months fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, address, or phone numbers, for example if we use a third-party carrier to deliver AWS hardware, or government identifier or certain types of ID you provide for identity verification, which may in some cases reflect your citizenship or immigration status, for example if we use a third-party service to verify your identity;
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information, for example if we use a third-party payment processor;
information that may reveal your age, gender or gender identity, race, or other protected classifications under California or US federal law, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis using a third-party service provider;
commercial information, such as the details of a product or service you purchased if a third-party service provider assists in providing that product or service to you;
internet or other electronic network activity information, such as if we use a third-party service provider to help us gather reports for analyzing the health of our devices and services;
information relating to our prevention and detection of unauthorized activity, such as attempted fraud;
biometric information, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of certain AWS services facilitated by a third-party service provider;
geolocation data, which may constitute precise geolocation data, for example if we enable transportation services from a third party in connection with an AWS event;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, for example if a third-party service provider reviews recordings of customer support phone calls for quality assurance purposes;
professional or employment-related information, for example if we provide information to a third-party service provider for verification or registration as part of the AWS Offerings;
education information, for example if we facilitate employment or internship recruitment activities for participants in the AWS Educate program; and
inference data, for example if we use a third-party service provider to store information about your preferences.
For more information about the personal information we may disclose for a business purpose, click
here
.
Your Data Rights
. You may have certain data rights under state privacy laws, including to request information about the collection of your personal information by us, to access your personal information in a portable format, and to correct or delete your personal information. If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, or you are an authorized agent under applicable state law, please contact us
here
or at the address under
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
above. Additionally, you may have the right to appeal the denial of any of these rights by submitting a form that will be provided to you if we deny a data request. Depending on your data choices, certain services may be limited or unavailable.
To ensure the security of your AWS account, we will generally ask you to verify your request using the contact information you have already provided. If you are an authorized agent making a request on behalf of a consumer pursuant to applicable state law, we may ask you to provide information verifying you have proper authority to make the request on behalf of the consumer or we may ask the consumer to verify their identity with us directly.
No sale or sharing of personal information
. We do not sell or share any personal information of consumers, as those terms are defined under the California Privacy Rights Act.
De-identified Data Disclosure.
AWS may use de-identified data in some instances. AWS either maintains such data without attempting to re-identify it or treats such data as personal data subject to applicable law.
California Privacy Rights Act Sensitive Personal Information Disclosure
. The categories of data that we collect and disclose for a business purpose include “sensitive personal information” as defined under the California Privacy Rights Act. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose not expressly permitted by the California Privacy Rights Act.
California Privacy Rights Act Retention Disclosure
. To enable your continued use of AWS Services, we keep your personal information for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this AWS Privacy Notice, as permitted or as may be required by law, or as otherwise communicated to you.
California Privacy Rights Act Non-Discrimination Statement
. We will not discriminate against any consumer for exercising their rights under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Colorado Privacy Act and Oregon Privacy Act Profiling Disclosure
. We do not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act or the Oregon Privacy Act.
Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us
You provide information to us when you:
search for, subscribe to, or purchase AWS Offerings;
create or administer your AWS account (and you might have more than one account if you have used more than one email address when using AWS Offerings);
configure your settings for, provide data access permissions for, or otherwise interact with AWS Offerings;
register for or attend an AWS event;
purchase or use content, products, or services from third-party providers through the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
offer your content, products, or services on or through AWS Offerings or the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
communicate with us by phone, email, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or other information request forms;
post on AWS websites or participate in community features; and
employ notification services.
Depending on your use of AWS Offerings, you might supply us with such information as:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
payment information, including credit card and bank account information;
information about your location;
information about your organization and your contacts, such as colleagues or people within your organization;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
content of feedback, testimonials, inquiries, support tickets, and any phone conversations, chat sessions and emails with or to us;
your image (still, video, and in some cases 3-D), voice, and other identifiers that are personal to you when you attend an AWS event or use certain AWS Offerings;
information regarding identity, including government-issued identification information;
corporate and financial information; and
VAT numbers and other tax identifiers.
Automatic Information
We collect information automatically when you:
visit, interact with, or use AWS Offerings (including when you use your computer or other device to interact with AWS Offerings);
download content from us;
open emails or click on links in emails from us; and
interact or communicate with us (such as when you attend an AWS event or when you request customer support).
Examples of the information we automatically collect include:
network and connection information, such as the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer or other device to the Internet and information about your Internet service provider;
computer and device information, such as device, application, or browser type and version, browser plug-in type and version, operating system, or time zone setting;
the location of your device or computer;
authentication and security credential information;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details, including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads;
AWS Offerings metrics, such as offering usage, occurrences of technical errors, diagnostic reports, your settings preferences, backup information, API calls, and other logs;
the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL) clickstream to, through, and from our website (including date and time) and AWS Offerings, content you viewed or searched for, page response times, download errors, and page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs);
email addresses and phone numbers used to contact us; and
identifiers and information contained in cookies (see our
Cookie Notice
).
Information from Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
marketing, sales generation, and recruitment information, including your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
subscription, purchase, support, or other information about your interactions with products and services offered by us, our affiliates (such as AWS training courses), or third parties (such as products offered through the AWS Marketplace) in relation to AWS Offerings;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links); and
credit history information from credit bureaus.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through AWS Offerings include:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
your subscription, purchase, usage, billing, and payment history;
payment settings, such as payment instrument information and billing preferences;
tax information;
email communication and notification settings; and
if you participate in the AWS Marketplace or Amazon Partner Network (or other similar venues operated or provided by us), your account, your status, subscriptions, and other information.
Customers can access the information above through AWS Offerings, such as the
AWS Management Console
(including the
My Account
,
Billing Dashboard
,
Bills
,
Payment Methods
,
Payment History
,
Preferences
and
Tax Settings
pages), the
AWS Email Preference Center
,
AWS Marketplace
, and
APN Partner Central
.
AWS support for Internet Explorer ends on 07/31/2022. Supported browsers are Chrome, Firefox, Edge, and Safari.
Learn more »
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Sub-policy 1
https://www.cloudflare.com/en-gb/privacypolicy/:
Solutions
By topic
By need
By industry
Public interest
Global services
Connectivity cloud
Contact sales
Products
Our products
For your employees
For apps and infrastructure
For developers
Register domain name
Get 1.1.1.1
Need help choosing?
Latest product news
Contact sales
Pricing
Our plans & pricing
Enterprise plan
Compare all plans
Need help choosing?
View FAQs
Contact sales
Resources
Library
Documentation
Getting Started
Application Security
Application Services
Zero Trust Services
Developer Platform
Network Services
Insights
API
AI
Learning
Trust & compliance
Trends & insights
Blog
Cloudflare TV
Community forum
Get help
Contact sales
Partners
Partner network
Peering portal
Partner Network
Why Cloudflare
Why choose Cloudflare
Learn about Cloudflare
Comparisons
Why trust Cloudflare
Contact sales
Sign up
Sign up
Under attack?
Under attack?
Log in
Log in
Support
Community Support
Help Center
Contact Cloudflare
Lost account access?
Log in
Log in
Privacy Policy
Overview
Policy application
Information we collect
How we use information we collect
Data aggregation
Information sharing
Notice to UK and EU residents
International information transfers
Data subject rights and choices
Communication preferences
Data security, data integrity and access
Data retention
Notification of changes
Business transactions
English language controls
Dispute resolution
Notice to California residents
Contact information
Legal questions
Have Questions?
If you have questions about these terms or anything else about Cloudflare, please don't hesitate to contact us:
+1 (650) 319-8930
Cloudflare, Inc.
101 Townsend St,
San Francisco, CA 94107
USA
Cloudflare Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy is effective as of August 28, 2024.
We have updated our July 18, 2024 Privacy Policy to update the contact email of our Data Protection Officer.
This Cloudflare Privacy Policy (“Policy”) outlines the personal information that Cloudflare, Inc. (“Cloudflare”, “we”, “us” or “our”) gathers, how we use that personal information, and the options you have to access, correct, or delete such personal information.
CLOUDFLARE’S PROMISE
Our mission to help build a better Internet is rooted in the importance we place on establishing trust with our Customers, users, and the Internet community globally. To earn and maintain that trust, we commit to communicating transparently, providing security, and protecting the privacy of data on our systems.
We keep your personal information personal and private. We will not sell or rent your personal information. We will only share or otherwise disclose your personal information as necessary to provide our Services or as otherwise described in this Policy, except in cases where we first provide you with notice and the opportunity to consent.
1. POLICY APPLICATION
This Policy applies to Cloudflare’s collection, use, and disclosure of the personal information of the following categories of data subjects:
Attendees
: Those who visit our offices or provide their information to Cloudflare or Cloudflare representatives when they attend or register to attend Cloudflare-sponsored events or other events at which Cloudflare (and/or its representatives) participates, as well as those who participate in Cloudflare’s studies such as user experience research.
Website Visitors
: Those who visit our Websites, including those who may opt to provide an email address or other contact information to receive communications from Cloudflare, fill out a survey, or provide feedback. For the purposes of this Policy, “Websites” refer collectively to
www.cloudflare.com
as well as any other websites Cloudflare operates for its own behalf and that link to this Policy. For clarity, “Websites” does not include any sites owned or operated by our Customers, including where we serve as Registrar.
Customers
: Individuals or entities who enter into a subscription agreement with Cloudflare (or its authorized partner) and to whom Cloudflare provides Services pursuant to such agreement. For purposes of this Policy, “Services” shall refer to all of the cloud-based solutions offered, marketed, or sold by Cloudflare or its authorized partners that are designed to increase the performance, security, and availability of Internet properties, applications, devices, and networks, along with any software, software development kits, and application programming interfaces ("APIs") made available in connection with the foregoing.
Administrative Users
: Those with login credentials for a Cloudflare account and/or those who administer any of the Services for a Customer. In some cases, an Administrative User and Customer may be the same individual. In other cases, an Administrative User may be an agent acting on behalf of a Customer.
Public DNS Resolver Users
: Those who use Cloudflare’s 1.1.1.1 public recursive Domain Name System (“DNS”) resolver service, including 1.1.1.1 for Families ("1.1.1.1 resolver"). Learn more about the 1.1.1.1 resolver
here
.
End Users
: Those who (i) access or use our Customers’ domains, networks, websites, application programming interfaces, and applications, or (ii) Customers’ employees, agents, or contractors, who access or use Services, such as Cloudflare Zero Trust end users.
Registrants:
Users of Cloudflare’s domain registrar services. Cloudflare is an
ICANN
-accredited registrar and complies with the
2013 Registrar Accreditation Agreement
(“RAA”).
This Policy does not apply to “Application Users”—those individuals who use Cloudflare’s consumer-facing 1.1.1.1 Application. See the
1.1.1.1 Application Privacy Policy
for more information about the data collection and use practices for Cloudflare's 1.1.1.1 Application and the associated 1.1.1.1 Application Services.
This Policy also does not apply to our Customers’ domains, websites, APIs, applications, and networks, which may have their own terms and privacy policies. Our Customers are solely responsible for establishing policies for and ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations, including those relating to the collection of personal information, in connection with the use of our Services by End Users with whom our Customers interact.
Cloudflare’s Websites and Services are not intended for, nor designed to attract, individuals under the age of eighteen. Cloudflare does not knowingly collect or share personal information from any person under the age of eighteen. To the extent we become aware that we have the personal information of a person under the age of eighteen, we will delete that information.
When Cloudflare is a reverse proxy, our IP addresses may appear in WHOIS and DNS records for websites using our Services. We are a conduit for information controlled by others. It is our Customers and their users who are responsible for the content transmitted across our network (e.g., images, written content, graphics, etc.).
2. INFORMATION WE COLLECT (Categories of Data Subjects)
Attendees
Name, email address, and other contact information
: We may ask for and collect personal information such as your name, address, phone number and email address when you visit our offices, register for or attend a sponsored event or other events at which Cloudflare (and/or its representatives) participates, or participate in Cloudflare’s studies such as user experience research.
Image and voice
: When you participate in a Cloudflare study, we may ask for your permission to record your voice and/or image during your participation in the study.
Website Visitors
Name, email address, and other contact information
: We ask for and—at your option—collect personal information from you when you submit web forms on our Websites, including opportunities to sign up for and agree to receive email communications from us. We may ask you to submit such personal information if you choose to use interactive features of the Websites, including participation in surveys, contests, promotions, sweepstakes, or studies, requesting customer support, submitting feedback, or otherwise communicating with us. We will send such communications in accordance with applicable law.
Log files
: Just as when you visit and interact with most websites and services delivered via the Internet, when you visit our Websites, including the Cloudflare Community Forum, we gather certain information and store it in log files. This information may include but is not limited to Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, system configuration information, URLs of referring pages, and locale and language preferences.
Cookies and other tracking technologies
: We may use cookies and other information-gathering technologies for a variety of purposes, such as providing us with information about how you interact with our Websites and assisting us in our marketing efforts. You may view a complete list of cookies and change your cookie preferences by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link (or, in the United States, the “Your Privacy Choices” link) in the footer of the Cloudflare homepage at cloudflare.com or in the banner displayed when you visit our Websites from certain countries (such as the European Economic Area and the UK). Note that if you disable cookies entirely, Cloudflare’s Websites may not function properly. We may also use cookies and similar technologies to provide you advertising on third-party sites based upon your browsing activities and interests. In addition to exercising cookie choices through our “Cookie Preferences” or “Your Privacy Choices” links, if you do not want to have cookies and similar technologies used for the purpose of serving you interest-based ads, you may opt-out by clicking
here
(or if located in the European Union, the United Kingdom, or Switzerland, click
here
). For more information about the cookies Cloudflare uses and your privacy choices, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Material contributed in Interactive Areas
: The Websites may offer publicly accessible blogs, community forums, comments sections, discussion forums, or other interactive features (“Interactive Areas”). If you choose to participate in any of these Interactive Areas, please be aware that any information that you post in an Interactive Area might be read, collected, and used by others who access it. If you wish to remove your personal information from any of our Interactive Areas, please see the Section 8, below.
Customers and Administrative Users
Customer Account Information
: When you register for an account, we collect contact information. Depending on subscription level, this contact information may include your Customer name, the email address(es) of your account administrator(s), telephone number, and addresses necessary to process payment and delivery of Services. In addition, when you use the Services, we collect information about how you configure your account and the Services (e.g., firewall settings for the domains you administer). We refer to all of this information collectively as “Customer Account Information” for the purposes of this Policy. Customer Account Information is required to enable your access to your Cloudflare account and Services. By providing us with any personal information, you represent that you are the owner of such personal information or otherwise have the requisite consent to provide it to us. We also maintain logs of Administrative Users’ activity (e.g., actions taken to configure settings in Customers’ account).
Payment information
: We do not require our Customers to have payment information on file with us unless they have a paid subscription to our Services. When you sign up for one of our paid Services, you must provide payment and billing information. The information you will need to submit depends on which payment method you choose. For example, if you pay with a credit card, we will collect your card information and billing address, although we do not store full credit card numbers or personal account numbers.
Crash Reports
: When our Services encounter an unexpected error, you may be asked to submit a crash report, which may contain personal information. You will have an opportunity to review the content of the report prior to submitting the report to us.
Public DNS Resolver Users
Limited DNS query data
: We will collect limited DNS query data that is sent to our 1.1.1.1 resolver. Our 1.1.1.1 resolver service does not log personal information, and the bulk of the limited non-personally identifiable query data is only stored for 25 hours. You can learn more about our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitment to privacy
here
.
Please note that our data handling practices for our 1.1.1.1 Application, which is not covered by this Policy, are somewhat different than our 1.1.1.1 resolver data handling practices and are described
here
.
End Users
Cloudflare processes End Users’ interactions with Customer’s Internet Properties and the Services. This information is processed when End Users access or use our Customers’ domains, websites, APIs, applications, devices, end points, and networks that use one or more of our Services, and when End Users access or use Services, such as Cloudflare Zero Trust. The information processed may include but is not limited to IP addresses, traffic routing data, system configuration information, and other information about traffic to and from Customers’ websites, devices, applications, and/or networks.
The End User data that we make available to our Customers via the Service dashboard or other online interface are specifically defined as “Customer Logs”.
Registrants
Contact and domain information: We collect data such as domain name and status, contact information (such as name, organization, address, phone number and email address), name server, DNSSEC, and Form of Approval (i.e., full WHOIS capture at time of transfer into our system, including the IP address that initiated the transfer).
Network Data.
Cloudflare collects and stores Network Data, which are models, observations, reports, analyses, statistics, databases and other information created, compiled, analyzed, generated or derived by Cloudflare from server, network or traffic data generated by Cloudflare in the course of providing the Service, including information required to help Cloudflare identify, analyze, mitigate, prevent, and block malicious activities on Cloudflare’s network. Examples of Network Data include service uptime and service availability metrics, request volumes, error rates, cache rates, origin and nature of malware, and IP threat scores.
3. HOW WE USE INFORMATION WE COLLECT
Cloudflare only processes personal information in a way that is compatible with and relevant to the purpose for which it was collected or authorized. As a general matter, for the categories of data described in Section 2 above, except 1.1.1.1 resolver user data as explained below, we may use your personal information to:
Provide, operate, maintain, improve, and promote the Websites and Services for all users of the Websites and Services;
Enable you to access and use the Websites and Services;
Process and complete transactions, and send you related information, including purchase confirmations and invoices;
Send transactional messages, including responses to your comments, questions, and requests; provide customer service and support; and send you technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Comply with legal obligations as well as to investigate and prevent fraudulent transactions, unauthorized access to the Services, and other illegal activities;
For other purposes for which we obtain your consent.
In addition, we may use the information we collect from Attendees, Websites Visitors, and Registrants, as well as Customer Account Information for the following purposes:
Send commercial communications, in accordance with your communication preferences, such as providing you with information about products and services, features, surveys, newsletters, offers, promotions, contests, and events about us and our partners; and send other news or information about us and our partners. See Section 9 below for information on managing your communication preferences.
Process and deliver contest or sweepstakes entries and rewards;
Monitor and analyze trends, usage, and activities in connection with the Websites and Services and for marketing or advertising purposes;
Personalize the Websites and Services, including by providing features or content that match your interests and preferences;
To register visitors to our offices and to manage non-disclosure agreements that visitors may be required to sign, to the extent such processing is necessary for our legitimate interest in protecting our offices and our confidential information against unauthorized access; and
Public DNS Resolver Users
. We use information we collect from 1.1.1.1 resolver users to operate and improve the 1.1.1.1 resolver, such as to assist us in our debugging efforts if an issue arises. Our 1.1.1.1 resolver service does not store 1.1.1.1 resolver users’ personal information. We will not combine any information collected from DNS queries to our 1.1.1.1 resolver with any other Cloudflare or third party data in any way that can be used to identify individual end users. Cloudflare may store aggregated data, as outlined within our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitments to privacy, indefinitely in order to power Cloudflare Radar and assist Cloudflare in improving Cloudflare services, such as, enhancing the overall performance of the Cloudflare Resolver and identifying security threats. Learn more about our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitment to privacy
here
.
Information from Third Party Services
. We may combine information we collect as described in Section 2 above with personal information we obtain from third parties. For example, we may combine information entered on a Cloudflare sales submission form with information we receive from a third-party sales intelligence platform vendor to enhance our ability to market our Services to Customers or potential Customers.
4. DATA AGGREGATION
Cloudflare may aggregate data we acquire about our Customers, Administrators, and End Users. For example, we may assemble data to determine how Web crawlers index the Internet and whether they are engaged in malicious activity or to compile web traffic reports and statistics. Non-personally identifiable, aggregated data may be shared with third parties.
5. INFORMATION SHARING
We work with other companies who provide us with services that help run our business and the Cloudflare Service (“Service Providers”). These companies provide services to help us deliver customer support, process credit card payments, manage and contact our existing Customers and Administrators as well as sales leads, provide marketing support, and otherwise operate and improve our Services. These Service Providers may only process personal information pursuant to our instructions and in compliance both with this Privacy Policy, the contracts we have in place with such Service Providers, and other applicable confidentiality, data protection, and security measures and regulations.
Specifically, we do not permit our Service Providers to sell any personal information we share with them or to use any personal information we share with them for their own marketing purposes or for any purpose other than in connection with the services they provide to us.
In addition to sharing with Service Providers as described above, we also may share your information with others in the following circumstances:
Within the Cloudflare Group (defined for the purposes of this Policy as Cloudflare, Inc. (United States) and its subsidiaries listed Section 15);
With our resellers and other sales partners who may help us distribute the Services to Customers;
With an app developer when you install an app from our App Marketplace;
In the event of a merger, sale, change in control, or reorganization of all or part of our business;
When we are required to disclose personal information to respond to subpoenas, court orders, or legal process, or to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims. (Learn more about how we handle law enforcement requests
here
);
Where we have a good-faith belief sharing is necessary to investigate, prevent or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person, or violations of our Website Terms of Use, Self-Serve Subscription Agreement, and/or Enterprise Subscription Terms of Service; or as otherwise required to comply with our legal obligations; or
As you may otherwise consent from time to time.
Additional Information on Sharing
Public DNS Resolver Users.
Cloudflare does not share 1.1.1.1 resolver logs with any third parties except for anonymous logs shared with APNIC pursuant to a Research Cooperative Agreement. Learn more about information sharing specific to the 1.1.1.1 resolver
here
.
Registrants.
If you purchase a domain name from Cloudflare’s registrar service, ICANN (The Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers) and the relevant registry operators overseeing the domain’s top-level domain require us to collect registrant data for the purposes of domain registration and via the WHOIS protocol. We may also be required to share this public data with ICANN, the relevant registry operators and other such providers with whom we contract in order to provide our domain name services, and additionally upon the legitimate request of third parties. Registrant data may include the domain name, registrant name and other contact information, and domain name server information. See our Domain Registration Agreement
here
.
Marketing & Advertising Partners.
Our marketing and advertising partners may collect or receive personal information about you and/or collect certain information about your interactions with our Websites, or your email communications with Cloudflare, including through the use of cookies, beacons, and similar technologies, in order to gain insights that may help us market and advertise our services to you.  You may opt out of such sharing using our “Cookie Preferences” link (or, in the United States, the “Your Privacy Choices” link) on the cloudflare.com homepage.
In addition, we may also provide these marketing and advertising partners with your email address or other limited account information. You may opt out of such sharing by emailing us at sar@cloudflare.com.
These partners’ use of your information will be based on their own privacy policies. We share this personal information for our business purposes.
California residents can find additional information about data sharing for marketing and advertising purposes and their data subject rights in Section 16, below
6. NOTICE TO EU, UK, AND SWISS RESIDENTS
“Personal information” as referenced in this Privacy Policy means “personal data” as that term is defined under the European Union (“EU”) General Data Protection Regulations (“GDPR”) and its United Kingdom (“UK”) GDPR counterpart. Cloudflare is a data controller for the personal information collected from all categories of data subjects listed above, with the following exceptions: Cloudflare is a data processor of Customer Logs, Administrative User logs, and some account settings information. In addition, Cloudflare is a data processor for any of the content provided by Customers and End Users through the Services that transits, or in some cases, is stored on, the Cloudflare network. Where Cloudflare is a data processor, Cloudflare processes data on behalf of its Customers pursuant to their data processing instructions.
If you are an individual from the European Economic Area (the “EEA”), the UK or Switzerland, please note that our legal basis for collecting and using your personal information will depend on the personal information collected and the specific context in which we collect it. We normally will collect personal information from you only where: (a) we have your consent to do so, (b) where we need your personal information to perform a contract with you (e.g. to deliver the Cloudflare Services you have requested), or (c) where the processing is in our legitimate interests. Please note that in most cases, if you do not provide the requested information, Cloudflare will not be able to provide the requested service to you.
In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect personal information from you, or may otherwise need the personal information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. Where we rely on your consent to process your personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline consent at any time. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to process your personal data, you have the right to object by emailing us at sar@cloudflare.com.
If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
7. INTERNATIONAL INFORMATION TRANSFERS
Cloudflare is a U.S. based, global company. We primarily store your information in the United States and the European Economic Area. To facilitate our global operations, we may transfer and access such information from around the world, including from other countries in which the Cloudflare Group has operations for the purposes described in this Policy.
Whenever a Cloudflare company transfers personal information originating from one country to another Cloudflare group company or a third party service provider or partner in a different country, we will implement appropriate safeguards, consistent with the laws of the territory from which the data is exported. We describe the safeguards we implement
here
. If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the safeguards Cloudflare has in place to protect your personal information, please contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
When Cloudflare transfers personal data from the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom (UK) to the United States, we rely on our certifications under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF), and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Should these certifications lapse or become otherwise invalidated, Cloudflare relies on the standard contractual clauses, including supplementary measures as necessary for transfers to the United States. We also use standard contractual clauses for other international transfers from the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom.
Self-certification to the Data Privacy Framework
Cloudflare complies with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Cloudflare has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Cloudflare has also certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF (together, the “DPFs”), Cloudflare commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPFs should first contact us by emailing sar@cloudflare.com or via mail to: Cloudflare, Inc., 101 Townsend St., San Francisco, CA 94107, Attn: Data Protection Officer. We will respond to your inquiry within 30 days of receipt and verification of your identity.
In compliance with the DPFs, Cloudflare commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal information received in reliance on the DPFs to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe, LLC are provided at no cost to you. You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other mechanisms set out in this DPF Notice or our Privacy Notice.  For more information, please see Annex 1 of the DPF Principles, available
here
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Cloudflare’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF). We may be required to disclose personal information we receive under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Cloudflare is liable for the processing of personal information it receives under the DPF Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf.  Cloudflare shall remain liable under the DPF Principles if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Cloudflare proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
8. DATA SUBJECT RIGHTS AND CHOICES
Cloudflare  recognizes individuals’ data protection rights. You have the right to access, correct, update, port, or delete your personal information, and to restrict or object to the processing of your personal information (each of these a “Rights Request”). You may email us at sar@cloudflare.com with any Rights Request, and we will respond within thirty (30) days. Customers and Administrative Users also can access, correct, export, or update their Account Information by editing their profile or organization record at Cloudflare.com.
Please note that before we can complete your Rights Request, we will need to verify that your identity matches that of the data in which you are requesting to exercise your rights. You can expect a verification email under separate cover, to the email address associated with your personal information on file. If you are making a Rights Request on behalf of another individual as an authorized agent, we require that either (a) the data subject must verify their identity and directly confirm with Cloudflare they provided the authorized agent permission to submit the Rights Request, (b) the authorized agent must be provided power of attorney by the data subject in accordance with the law of the data subject’s jurisdiction, or (c) the Rights Request must otherwise be submitted in accordance with applicable privacy law.
For any Rights Request, we will need to verify a requestor is inquiring about their own information before we can assist. Where a Rights Request may implicate the personal information of another individual, we must balance the request against the risk of violating another person’s privacy rights. We will comply with Rights Requests to the extent required by applicable law or the Swiss-U.S. or EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. In the event that your Rights Request is denied, residents of the U.S. states Virginia and Colorado may appeal our decision by responding to the email informing them of the denial or by submitting a Rights Request to appeal to sar@cloudflare.com, and we will respond within sixty (60) days. In the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Please note that we do not retain any personal information about 1.1.1.1 resolver users that would be subject to the Rights Requests described above. In addition, Cloudflare has no direct relationship with End Users. Even where “Cloudflare” may be indicated as the authoritative name server for a domain, unless Cloudflare is the owner of that domain, we have no control over a domain’s content. Accordingly, we rely upon our Customers to comply with the underlying legal requirements for Rights Requests in accordance with their obligations under applicable data protection laws. If an End User requests that we fulfill a Rights Request, we will direct that End User to contact the Customer website(s) with which they interacted directly. Our Customers are solely responsible for ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations with respect to their website users.
9. COMMUNICATION PREFERENCES
Cloudflare will send you commercial communications based on the communication preferences in your account settings. Cloudflare also will send you service-related communications. You may manage your receipt of commercial communications by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link located on the bottom of such emails, through your account settings if you have a Cloudflare account, or you may send a request to unsubscribe@cloudflare.com.
10. DATA SECURITY, DATA INTEGRITY AND ACCESS
We take all reasonable steps to protect information we receive from you from accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, and unauthorized disclosure or access. We have put in place appropriate physical, technical and administrative measures to safeguard and secure your information, and we make use of privacy-enhancing technologies such as encryption. If you have any questions about the security of your personal information, you can contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
11. DATA RETENTION
We store your personal information for a period of time that is consistent with the business purposes set forth in Section 3 of this policy or as long as needed to fulfill and comply with legal obligations. The criteria we used to determine how long we store your personal information will vary depending on several different factors. We typically consider the following when determining data retention:
The purpose for collecting the personal information in the first place. For example, if you have an active account with us, we need to keep your contact information during the entirety of that time in order to provide you with support or contact you regarding your account;
The volume, nature, and sensitivity of the personal information we are processing;
The potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the personal information;
Whether we can achieve the purposes for processing with less data or through other means
Legal requirements that may apply to the data, such as applicable statutes of limitation or contractual obligations.
When the data retention period expires for a given type of data, we will delete or destroy it. If, for technical reasons, we are unable to do so, we will implement appropriate security measures to prevent any further use of such data.
12. NOTIFICATION OF CHANGES
If we make changes to this Policy that we believe materially impact the privacy of your personal information, we will promptly provide notice of any such changes (and, where necessary, obtain consent), as well as post the updated Policy on this website noting the effective date of any changes.
13. BUSINESS TRANSACTIONS
We may assign or transfer this Policy, as well as information covered by this Policy, in the event of a merger, sale, change in control, or reorganization of all or part of our business.
14. ENGLISH LANGUAGE CONTROLS
Non-English translations of this Policy are provided for convenience only. In the event of any ambiguity or conflict between translations, the English version is authoritative and controls.
15. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
If you have an unresolved privacy or data-use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
16. NOTICE TO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
This section applies only to California residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household as defined in the CCPA. It does not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA.
How We Collect, Use, and Share Your Personal Information under the CCPA
We may collect, use, and disclose for our business and commercial purposes, the following categories of Personal Information:
Identifiers for the categories of individuals/users defined in Section 1 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy (e.g., email address of Customers and Administrative Users, name and contact information of Attendees);
Payment and customer records information of our Customers;
Protected classification characteristics (e.g., age, ethnicity, race, languages spoken, or gender) to the extent these characteristics are voluntarily disclosed to us or contained in any  content transmitted across or stored on our network;
Commercial information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or usage histories);
Professional or employment information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information; and
Inferences (e.g., information about your interests or preferences).
The sources from which we collect information are described in Section 2 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
The business and commercial purposes for which we collect and use this information are described in Section 3 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
The categories of third parties to whom we “disclose” the information for a business purpose are described in Section 5 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
Your California Privacy Rights
As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Knowledge
. You can request information about what personal information we have collected about you, including:
the categories of personal information;
the categories of sources from which the personal information is collected;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal information;
the categories of third parties to whom we disclose personal information;
the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Access
. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Deletion
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Correction
. You can ask us to rectify inaccurate personal information and, taking into account the purpose of processing the personal information, ensure it is complete;
Opt-out of sales or sharing
. You can ask that we do not “sell” or “share” your Personal Information as “sell” and “share” are explicitly defined under the CCPA. For more information, please refer to the section titled “Right to Opt Out of the Sale and Sharing of Your Personal Information” below.
Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination. This means that we will not penalize you for exercising your rights by taking actions such as denying you the Services; increasing the price/rate of the Services; decreasing service quality; or suggesting that we may penalize you as described above for exercising your rights.
In order to submit a request to exercise your right of information, access, or deletion pursuant to the CCPA, please follow the instructions for the submitting a Rights Request detailed in Section 8, above. Please note, we reserve the right to confirm your California residence to process your requests and may need to confirm your identity to process certain requests using the verification methods described in Section 8. For example, we take reasonable precautions to verify the identities of those California residents submitting requests to delete or access Personal Information.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale and Sharing of Your Personal Information
Cloudflare does not sell your Personal Information in the conventional sense (i.e., for money). Like many companies, however, we use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you and may transfer Personal Information to business partners for their use. Making Personal Information (such as online identifiers or browsing activity) available to these companies may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information under the CCPA.
You can request to opt out of such “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information using the “
Your Privacy Choices”
link in the footer below
.
In addition, some internet browsers offer the option to enable opt-out signals such as Global Privacy Control that lets you tell websites that you do not want to have your online activities tracked. Cloudflare responds to these signals by processing them as a request to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information as discussed above.
Please note that you will still see some advertising, regardless of your selection. We do not impose verification protocols for processing opt out requests unless we have reason to question the authenticity of a requester’s identity, in which case we may request evidence of identity and California residency.
17. CONTACT INFORMATION
Cloudflare, Inc.
101 Townsend St.
San Francisco, CA 94107
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare (Canada) Information Technology Co., Ltd.
Suite 2600, Three Bentall Centre
595 Burrard Street, P.O. Box 49314
Vancouver, BC V7X 1L3
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare, Ltd.
County Hall/The Riverside Building
Belvedere Road
London, SE1 7PB
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
Largo Rafael Bordalo Pinheiro 29
1200-369 Lisboa
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Germany GmbH
Rosental 7
80331 München
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare France SAS
6 place de la Madeleine
75008 Paris
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Netherlands B.V.
Keizersgracht 62,
1015CS Amsterdam
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Pte., Ltd.
182 Cecil Street, #35-01
Frasers Tower, Singapore 069547
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Australia Pty Ltd.
333 George St., 5th Floor
Sydney, NSW 2000
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare (Beijing) Information Technology Co., Ltd.
16 South Guangshun Street
Donghuang Building 17th Floor
Chaoyang District Beijing 100015
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Japan K.K.
Marunouchi Kitaguchi Building 9F
1-6-5 Marunouchi, Chiyoda-ku
Tokyo, 100-0005
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Middle East FZ-LLC
DIC 1 Internet City Road
Building 1, Ground Floor, Office 17
Jumeirah
Dubai UAE
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare India Private Limited
No. 215 Richmond Towers, 12 Richmond Road, Richmond Town
Banglore, Bangalore, Karnataka, India, 560025
Attention: Grievance Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Area 1 Security, LLC
838 Walker Road Suite 21-2,
Dover, DE, 19904
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Korea LLC
8-113 (Samseong-dong), Teheran-ro 507
Gangnam-gu, Seoul, South Korea, 06168
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Mexico S. de R.L de C.V.
Bosque de Ciruelos No. 180 int. PP 101, Col. Bosque de las Lomas, Miguel Hidalgo
Ciudad de México, 11700, México
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Malaysia Sdn. Bhd.
Level 21, Suite 21.01, The Gardens South Tower,
Mid Valley City,
Lingkaran Syed Putra,
Kuala Lumpur
Wilayah Persekutuan
59200
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Getting Started
Free plans
For enterprises
Compare plans
Domain name search
Get a recommendation
Request a demo
Contact sales
Resources
Learning center
Analyst reports
Cloudflare Radar
Cloudflare TV
Case studies
Webinars
White Papers
Developer docs
Architecture Center
theNET
Blog
Find an expert
Solutions
Connectivity cloud
SSE and SASE services
Application services
Network services
Developer services
Community
Community hub
Project Galileo
Athenian Project
Cloudflare for Campaigns
Critical Infrastructure Defense Project
Support
Help center
Cloudflare status
Trust-hub
Compliance
GDPR
Trust & safety
Company
About Cloudflare
Our team
Investor relations
Press
Careers
Diversity, equity, & inclusion
Impact/ESG
Network map
Logos & press kit
Become a partner
Sub-policy 2
https://www.okta.com/privacy-policy/:
Okta
Looks like you have Javascript turned off! Please enable it to improve your browsing experience.
Skip to main content
Effective Date: January 2025
Posted Date: January 2025
I. Introduction
At Okta, data privacy is important to us. This Okta Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) details our privacy practices for the activities described in this Privacy Policy. Please take the time to read this Privacy Policy carefully in order to understand how we collect, share, and otherwise process information relating to individuals (“Personal Data”), and to learn about your rights and choices regarding our processing of your Personal Data.
If you are a California resident, please review the section of this
Privacy Policy for California residents
.
In this Privacy Policy, “Okta,” “we,” “our,” and “us” each mean Okta, Inc. and the applicable Okta affiliate(s) involved in the processing activity. The addresses of our offices, where Okta, Inc. and our affiliates are located, can be found at
https://www.okta.com/contact
.
Auth0, LLC is a subsidiary of Okta. Any references to Customer Identity Cloud are inclusive of Auth0 by Okta.
II. Okta’s Roles & Responsibilities
Okta is the controller of your Personal Data, as described in this Privacy Policy, unless otherwise stated.  Please note that this Privacy Policy does not apply to the extent that we process Personal Data in the role of a processor (or a comparable role such as a “service provider” in certain jurisdictions) on behalf of our customers, including where we offer to our customers various cloud products and services, through which our customers (and/or their affiliates) connect their own websites and applications to our hosted platform (including our Auth0 by Okta-branded services), sell or offer their own products and services, send electronic communications to other individuals, or otherwise collect, use, share or process Personal Data via our cloud products and services.
Each of our customers, not Okta, controls whether they provide you with an account or other access to the Okta identity cloud service through their subscription, and if they provide you with such accounts or other access through their subscription, they control what information about you that they submit to our service. This content may include contact information (such as your first and last name, email address, and phone number), professional information (such as the department you work for at your place of employment), or other types of information that a customer chooses to submit. Use of this content by Okta is governed by agreements between Okta and the Customer.
For detailed privacy information applicable to situations where an Okta customer (and/or a customer affiliate) who uses Okta’s cloud products and services is the controller, please reach out to the respective customer directly. We are not responsible for the privacy or data security practices of our customers, which may differ from those set forth in this Privacy Policy. If not stated otherwise either in this Privacy Policy or in a separate disclosure, we process such Personal Data in the role of a processor or service provider on behalf of a customer (and/or its affiliates), who is the responsible controller of the applicable Personal Data.
If your Personal Data has been submitted to us by or on behalf of an Okta customer and you wish to exercise any rights you may have under applicable data protection laws, please inquire with the applicable customer directly. Because we may only access a customer’s data upon instruction from that customer, if you wish to make your request directly to us, please provide to us the name of the Okta customer who submitted your Personal Data to us. If we are able to verify the Okta customer, we will refer your request to that customer and support them as needed in responding to your request within a reasonable timeframe.
Additional information and safeguards regarding Okta’s data protection obligations (including for international transfers) to our customers are set forth in our subscription agreement form and related documents, including our Trust & Compliance Documentation, all of which are available online at
https://www.okta.com/agreements
.
III. Personal Data We Collect and Data Sources
Covered Data Processing Activities
This Privacy Policy applies to the processing of Personal Data that we collect in the following ways, as detailed in this section.
We collect information about you when you provide it to us, when you interact with our products and services, websites and electronic systems, when you attend events and visit our offices, and when other sources provide it to us, as further described below.
Information you provide to us
Based on our current practices (and including our practices over the last 12 months), we collect the following categories of information about you:
Contact and Professional Data.
We collect contact and/or professional data about you in person, through communications, including communications from you or your colleagues, and through our websites. For example, you provide your contact and professional information to us when you sign up to learn more about Okta’s products and services, download content, register for an event, and visit our offices. If you attend an event, we may also receive contact and professional details about you when you choose to scan your attendee badge or by providing a business card or other method(s) whereby you share Personal Data with us. Typically, contact data includes your name and contact methods, such as telephone number, email address, and office or other mailing address, and professional data includes details such as the organization you are affiliated with, your job title, and industry.
Administrator Data
. When you sign up for an account to try Okta, subscribe to any Okta service via Okta or another entity (such as a marketplace or authorized reseller), have the ability to submit a support request, or are designated an administrator of any part of the Okta Service, then information is provided to us about you (“Administrator Data”). Administrator Data usually includes your name, email address, phone number, address, billing information, business contact information, credentials information (including Okta training and credentials), subscription and service configurations you select, and other details you may provide to us about you or include in your profiles in Okta communities and other support portals. We may also receive any Personal Data you share via tooling used to provide support, e.g., videoconferencing or other communication methods you participate in.
Biographical, Community, and Support Data
. We may also collect various types of biographical, community, and support Personal Data from you via our help center and community support forums. For example, if you register for an online community that we host, we may ask you to provide a username, photo and/or biographical information, such as your occupation, organization name and areas of expertise. Additionally, you may provide Personal Data to us when you create user-generated content (for example, by posting in a forum), provide Okta with feedback, or when you participate in interactive features, trainings, online surveys, contests, promotions, sweepstakes, activities, or events. Okta may receive Personal Data and Administrator Data in connection with an administrator's request for support for the Okta service.
Job Applicant Data.
We collect contact and professional information, including your resume with educational and work background, that you provide when you apply for a job with Okta. We may also collect sensitive information, like your Social Security Number or other government identifier, criminal history information, racial or ethnic origin, or other such Personal Data that you provide in connection with your job application.
Contract and Payment Data
. We may receive contract details (like signatures) from you or your organization and use payment processing services to collect payment and billing information, which may contain Personal Data such as billing name, billing address and payment card details, in connection with some of our products and services.
Audio, Electronic, or Visual Data
. If you attend an Okta in-person or virtual event or agree to be recorded in a telephone or video meeting, we may record some or all of that event or meeting. For events, we may document the event in various ways, such as by taking photos at the event, interviewing you at the event, or recording your participation in a live question-and-answer or other interactive session. We use this information for business and marketing purposes to better inform the public about Okta, its events, and provide testimonials about our products and services, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
Consumer Products
. If you use consumer products made available by Okta (“Okta Consumer Products”), then we may receive various types of information and content from you that you choose to share, including contact information (such as your first and last name, email address, and phone number), additional multi-factor authentication factor setup details, content you upload (such as identification or other documentation), and information regarding the websites and applications that you visit and use through Okta Consumer Products for authentication. We also receive Ancillary Data, including device data, Usage Data, and metadata, as described below for the purposes described below.
Depending on your jurisdiction, if we collect sensitive data from you, we will do so by providing you with additional notice or confirming your consent upon collection, if required by applicable law.
Personal Data We Collect From Other Sources
In the course of doing business (and over the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Policy), we receive Personal Data and other information from other third parties for our business or commercial purposes. This information varies and typically falls into a few categories:
Business contact information (such as name, job title, business email, phone number, and address), social profile (such as LinkedIn or XING) including other details about your organization for sales and marketing purposes, to better inform you about Okta products and services;
Third-party platform usernames and identifying information;
Details about you as a job candidate (which may include your name, resume, educational and work history, criminal history information, and feedback) as permitted under law; and
Data used for security purposes to protect our products and services.
We receive business contact information that contains Personal Data for commercial purposes, including details about your organization from third parties for marketing and business intelligence, such as analyzing business opportunities, identifying and communicating with potential customers, and providing our audience with more relevant content and advertising. Typically, and subject to applicable laws, we receive this information about you from a few sources, such as: (i) third-party marketing initiatives, such as events where we are a sponsor, or website forms hosted by third parties that may provide content about us; (ii) instances when you consent to having your attendee badge scanned at an event hosted by us or another entity; (iii) companies, such as information aggregators and similar entities, from whom we have licensed business contact information; (iv) referrals; or (v) resellers and channel partners, including those that offer joint marketing services. In some situations, we may combine such business contact information with other non-personal and Personal Data we possess or that you have provided to us. For example, we may combine business contact details with details about your organization, such as its address or revenue range, and analyze this information for business opportunities or use this to send you tailored content.
We also receive Personal Data to help with threat intelligence and to protect the safety and security of our service and our customers’ applications, such as breached website credentials from other entities. We use this Personal Data for various purposes, such as for security and fraud detection purposes and to enable our customers to configure the settings within the Okta products and services to notify their administrators and users if the data that they put into the Okta service is found within this data set.
We also receive information from third-party platforms for various business purposes such as organizational credit information, program management, or technical reasons. For example, we may receive credit information about an organization that includes the names of individuals. If you participate in an open source project or our bug bounty program, we may receive details about you, such as your username or pull requests, to help us manage your participation in the project or program and provide you with updates.
If you are a candidate applying for a job at Okta, subject to laws applicable in your jurisdiction, we may receive Personal Data about you from third parties for business purposes, such as through background checks (educational, employment, criminal, and financial information), publicly-available sources (like social media accounts, including LinkedIn for identifying candidates), feedback about your application and from interviews, and other third parties that may provide feedback about your application. Okta treats references provided as part of a job application as confidential.
For our professional services work, as a processor or service provider for our customers, Okta may also receive Personal Data about you to perform its obligations under its contract with a third party. Okta partners may also share your business contact information with Okta as part of their recommendation to your organization to become an Okta customer. If Okta is interested in partnering with, acquiring, investing in, or partners with, acquires, or invests in your employing or retaining organization, Okta may receive Personal Data about you through the (potential or completed) transaction for its business purposes.
Device Data, Usage Data, Ancillary Data, Diagnostic Data, and Metadata We Collect
Explanation of Device Data, Usage Data, Ancillary Data, Diagnostic Data, and Other Metadata and Technology Used
Like most websites, applications, and software across the Internet, Okta collects certain Personal Data when you access and use our websites, applications, software, and products and services subject to laws applicable in your jurisdiction. This type of data collection allows us to better understand how individuals use and the performance of our websites, applications, and products and services and allows us to provide, fix, and improve our websites, applications, software, and products and services, and detect, investigate, and combat fraud, security incidents, and other deceptive or malicious behavior. The data we collect can include the following:
Device Data
. We may collect certain information from and about your device, such as unique device identifiers, browser type, the operating system installed on your device, certain device configurations, and similar device or version information (“Device Data”). We use Device Data to identify the location of the device, which we use to provide necessary disclosures, obtain necessary consents, prevent access to our products and services as required by applicable law, and comply with any other requirements applicable to Okta, to detect, investigate, and combat fraud, security incidents, and other deceptive or malicious behavior, and to help us determine that users from one type of device use our websites, products and services in different ways than users of a different type of device, which in turn allows us to troubleshoot and investigate the performance of our products and services, improve our websites, products, and services, such as through optimizing the screen size of Okta mobile applications, or making sure that our customers’ users have a more efficient user experience. The Device Data we collect can include the following:
Location Data.
We may collect information about your location when you use our websites, mobile applications, and products and services. Your location can be determined with varying degrees of accuracy by your IP address and information about things near your device, such as Bluetooth-enabled devices. The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and settings. If we collect your precise geolocation data, we will do so only with your consent.
Camera.
When enabled, some of our services allow you to set up the services by using the camera on your device to scan a QR code. We cannot access your camera without permission. You can always change our access to your camera by turning off our access to your camera in your device’s settings menu.
Touch ID and Face ID
. Some of our products and services may allow you to authenticate using Touch ID and Face ID for Apple devices and Face Unlock and Fingerprint Unlock for Android devices. If you authenticate using Touch ID, Face ID, Face Unlock or Fingerprint Unlock, we are only notified as to whether the authentication was successful and cannot access the Face ID, Touch ID, Face Unlock, or Fingerprint Unlock. You can enable or disable Touch ID, Face ID, Face Unlock and Fingerprint Unlock at any time through your device’s settings menu.
Usage Data
. We may also collect data about your use of our websites, applications, and products and services, including data regarding service configurations and applications utilized in connection with the hosted Service, support data, operational data, log data, logs of your usage and click activities, logs about your login history, identity confirmation, and the performance results for the hosted Service (“Usage Data”). Okta uses Usage Data to: (i) analyze usage trends, (ii) detect, investigate, and combat fraud and cyber-attacks; (iii) detect, investigate, and combat security incidents, and other such deceptive, fraudulent or malicious behavior against Okta or its customers, including taking measures to improve Okta’s overall security posture; (iv) improve service and product functionality; and (v) retain and/or employ another service provider or contractor.
Bug, Error, and Crash Reports
. We may also collect data about any problems you experience with our websites, applications, and products and services, including bug, error, and crash reports, which can include Device Data, location data, Usage Data, and user data at the time of the bug, error, and/or crash.
Ancillary Data
. For the Okta Mobility Management product, data collected may include the applications that are installed on your device. Collectively, we refer to this data as “Ancillary Data”. Some of the Ancillary Data, including Usage Data, that we receive is dependent on your organization’s policies and settings and what information it permits to be shared with Okta. Okta uses Ancillary Data to improve security and to provide and improve its products to customers, including to better understand customer behavior in order to create new features and provide threat-related insights for our customers.
Some of these products that collect and process Ancillary Data include:
the Okta browser plugin;
the Okta desktop and mobile applications (Okta Verify and Okta Mobile); and
Okta Consumer Products.
Through the Okta browser plugin, the Ancillary Data we collect includes details about your login session, IP address, user-agent, and the web application name and website address, as well as other information that is not personal in nature. In addition, as part of Ancillary Data, we may collect interaction data about your use of the Okta browser plugin. We use the information collected through the Okta browser plugin for security purposes and to provide features, such as to allow you to better manage your passwords for websites that you visit.
Diagnostic Data
. Some products and services may require, or may be enhanced by, your installation of on-premise software (e.g., agents, device management applications). The on-premise software may collect data about the use and performance of the software, including IP address, username, and host name, which may be transmitted and used by Okta to provide customer support, to diagnose issues with the on-premise software and/or related products and services, to improve our products and services, and/or for the purposes identified in the applicable agreement(s) between Okta and the applicable customer. For example, Okta Advanced Server Access (“ASA”) provides functionality for a customer to generate support bundles, which contain local log files generated by the local software running on the customer’s ASA servers, that the customer can provide to Okta to enable Okta to diagnose issues and provide support.
Metadata
. We may collect metadata about you, including technical data about your performance or use of our website, products and services. One common technology we use to collect metadata that may be considered Personal Data is our use of cookies. Cookies are small text files that are placed on your web browser and that help us recognize your browser or device as a unique visitor in different ways based on the type of cookie. The three main types of cookies are:
Essential cookies
. Essential cookies are required for website functionality and security. For example, authentication, security, and session cookies may be required for our website or products to work.
Functional cookies
. We use functional cookies to help enhance our websites’ performance, for market research, or other analytics or advertising that is not tied to a specific individual. For example, we may use Google Analytics to help us track how many individuals visited our websites. We may also utilize HTML5 local storage cookies for the reasons described in this section. These types of cookies are different from browser cookies in the amount and type of data they store and how they store it.
Targeting or advertising cookies
. We use targeting and advertising cookies to help us understand our marketing efforts and to reach potential customers across the web. For example, we contract with third-party advertising networks that may track your activity over time and across different channels, including our websites, email activity, and other websites and applications that display advertisements. They may use this tracking information to understand and predict your interests, to display an advertisement for Okta on another website, or email you with a marketing communication for an Okta product.
If you would like to manage your cookies and your permissions to share data with cookie providers, please visit the section below on
Your Information Choices
.
A second common technology we use to collect metadata that may be considered Personal Data is beacon technology. We use beacons in our websites and in email communications to you. Beacons provide us with information about your activity and help us to improve our business operations and strategy, such as by understanding our email communications’ functionality and improving our websites and content. For example, if you click on a marketing email we send to you about a new product or service, the beacon will provide signals to us that you and your organization may be interested in learning more. If you would like to manage your email subscriptions with us, please visit the section below on
Your Information Choices
.
IV. How We Use Personal Data
How we use the Personal Data that we collect depends in part on how you choose to communicate with us, how you use our websites and interact with us, and any preferences you have communicated to us.  In general, we use your Personal Data as is necessary to run our business and carry out our day-to-day activities. In addition to the uses identified elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, we may use your Personal Data to accomplish the following tasks (and we have done so during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Policy):
For the purpose of communicating with you about our products and services and facilitate other interaction.
We may use your Personal Data, such as contact data, Ancillary Data, and metadata, to send you transactional communications, notices, updates, security alerts, and administrative messages regarding our products and services that may be useful to you and your organization. We will respond to your questions, provide tailored communications based on your activity and interactions with us, and help you use our products and services effectively. We also use Administrator Data to communicate with you for various purposes, including to provide you with account updates (about your subscription, settings, security, billing, feature and product updates, technical issues, certifications, and other similar content). You cannot unsubscribe from non-promotional and transactional communications. For promotional communications, you may manage your communication preferences via your administrator settings, Okta communities, or our subscription center (linked in the Your Information Choices section below).
In some situations, we may also share Administrator Data with authorized partners in order to provide you with information relevant to your purchase of Okta or other entities’ tools that may connect to Okta to meet your technical or organizational needs.
If you choose to subscribe to alerts, then we will also use your Administrator Data to send you trust alerts, including via SMS (“Okta Alerts”). Phone numbers collected as a part of Okta Alerts SMS subscriptions will not be used for marketing purposes and only shared with service providers as required to carry out the alerts or as otherwise required under applicable law. In some instances, the phone number you use to sign up for Okta Alerts may be the same phone number we use for marketing purposes based on your consent or receipt through a different channel.
For the purpose of supporting safety, security, and manage operations
. We use Personal Data, such as contact data, Ancillary Data and other metadata, about you and your use of our products, services, and offices to verify accounts and activity, monitor suspicious or fraudulent activity, assist our customers in their monitoring of suspicious or fraudulent activity, and identify violations of policies regarding the use of our products and services. We may also combine Ancillary Data with other data we receive for safety, security, and to manage our business operations. We also process Personal Data, such as contact data and health data, for security and operations management reasons, such as to register visitors to our offices and carry out related safety measures (including through using our Atmosphere application), including to manage non-disclosure agreements that visitors may be required to sign. We also use Administrator Data to provide our customers with the Okta service, complete transactions, provide support and other service to the customer account, detect and prevent fraud, for audit and compliance purposes, and to comply with applicable law. Okta physically and electronically monitors its offices with access monitoring software and tools, and has on-premise surveillance cameras in order to prevent unauthorized access to our offices and to protect employees, authorized visitors, and our property.
For the purpose of marketing our products and services
. We use your Personal Data, such as contact data, Ancillary Data, and other metadata about how you use the products and services to send promotional communications that may be of specific interest to you and your organization, including by email and by displaying Okta marketing communications on other organizations’ websites and applications, as well as on third-party platforms like Facebook, Twitter, and Google subject to laws applicable in your jurisdiction. These communications are aimed at encouraging engagement and maximizing the benefits that you and your organization can gain from Okta’s products and services, including information about new products and features, survey requests, newsletters, and events that we think may be of interest to you and your organization.
For the purpose of analyzing, predicting, and improving results and operations
. We use Personal Data to analyze and predict results (such as those arising from our sales and marketing efforts and product usage and consumption), improve the performance of our websites, products and services and customer support, identify potential customers, opportunities, and potential new product areas, ascertain trends, improve our websites’ functionality, improve our security, and provide us with general business intelligence, including through the use of automated means such as machine learning technology. Subject to the laws applicable in your jurisdiction, we may also combine the metadata and usage information collected from our websites with other information to help further the purposes described in the previous sentence.
For the purpose of managing contests or promotions and customer appreciation
. Okta may occasionally run contests or other special promotions or make available opportunities or other tokens of appreciation for customers, and if you register for these, we may process your Personal Data, such as contact information, biographical information, and contract-related data to perform our contract with you. Okta may also use the Personal Data, such as contact data, collected in these contests, promotions, and for customer appreciation as well as to send you gifts or prizes and promotional material about Okta and our partners.
For the purpose of processing payments
. We process Personal Data, such as contact information, contract-related data, financial information, biographical information, and payment information to process payments to the extent that doing so is necessary to complete a transaction and perform our contract with you or your organization.
For the purpose of recruiting and hiring
. We process your Personal Data, such as contact, job applicant, and biographical data, to assess your application and to evaluate and improve our recruitment system, our application tracking and recruitment activities. We also use your Personal Data to communicate with you regarding your application or opportunities at Okta that appear over time that we believe may be of interest to you. We also use your Personal Data to send you new hire and employee experience information. We may verify your information, including through confidential reference checks and, where allowed, background checks.
Other purposes for our legitimate interests
. Where required by law or where we believe it is necessary to protect our legal rights, interests, or the interests of others, we may use your Personal Data in connection with the management of our business, including but not limited to, for operational purposes and workflow automation, business intelligence (such as to understand subscription consumption and free trial product usage), website and product improvement, legal claims, compliance, regulatory, and audit functions, protecting against misuse or abuse of our products and services, and protecting personal property or safety. For example, we may review compliance with applicable usage terms in our customer contracts, assess capacity requirements for our products, websites, and offices, improve your user experience, respond to requests by you for support or for contact, or identify customer opportunities. If you sign up to participate in specific programs, such as the Okta Ideas forum or other product feedback programs, we may analyze Ancillary Data, including Usage Data, related to your use of our products and Service, along with the data you choose to provide to us through Okta Ideas, to provide you with a better customer experience. Furthermore, we use Administrator Data to provide technical support as described in our documentation and help center, and to improve our products, services, and processes related to providing such support.
Other purposes with your consent
. We may use your Personal Data if you have given us consent to do so for a specific purpose not listed above. For example, we may publish testimonials or featured customer stories to promote our products and services or record phone calls for quality and training purposes, with your permission.
If we process your Personal Data for a purpose other than those set out above, we may provide you with a notice and obtain your consent prior to such processing, where required by us under applicable law in your jurisdiction.
Legal Bases for Processing Personal Data (for United Kingdom and European Economic Area and other relevant jurisdictions)
If you are an individual in the United Kingdom, the European Economic Area (EEA), or of another relevant jurisdiction, we collect and process information about you only where we have a legal basis or bases for doing so under applicable laws. The legal bases depend on the products and services that your organization has purchased from Okta, or the Okta Consumer Products that you are using, as applicable, how such products and services are used, and how you choose to interact and communicate with Okta’s websites, systems, and whether you attend Okta events. This means we collect and use your Personal Data only where:
We need it to operate and provide you with our products and services, provide customer support and personalized features, and to protect the safety and security of our products and services;
It satisfies a legitimate interest of Okta’s (which is not overridden by your data protection interests and rights), such as for research and development, to provide information to you about our products and services that we believe you and your organization may find useful, and to protect our legal rights and interests;
You give us consent to do so for a specific purpose; or
We need to comply with a legal obligation.
If you have consented to our use of Personal Data about you for a specific purpose, you have the right to change your mind at any time, subject to contractual and legal restrictions, and reasonable prior written notice. This will not affect any processing that has already taken place. Where we are using your Personal Data because we or another entity (for example, your employer) have a legitimate interest to do so, you have the right to object to that use; however, in some cases, this may mean that you no longer use our products and services.
In the event that we de-identify any Personal Data for further use, we commit to maintain and use the information in de-identified form and will not attempt to re-identify the information, except for the purpose of determining if our de-identification processes satisfy applicable legal requirements.
V. Personal Data Disclosed by Okta and Data You Choose to Disclose to Other Entities
Personal Data Disclosed by Okta
In the course of doing business (and over the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Policy), Okta may disclose Personal Data as described below.
Service Providers
. For all categories of information that we collect, we disclose Personal Data to our service providers for various business purposes, including, but not limited to, auditing interactions with users, debugging our websites, products and services, security purposes, internal research and gleaning insights through machine learning, short-term uses such as credit verification, payment processing, IT services, quality control and safety, gift fulfillment, in-person and virtual event management, as well as to perform other services on our behalf. For example, we may use service providers to help us proctor and score Okta certification exams, or host our customer relationship management system.
In-person and Virtual Events
. If you choose to register for or attend a virtual or in-person event or webinar that we host (such as our Oktane customer conference), enter a contest or raffle with us and a sponsor, or download content (such as a whitepaper) from our website, then we may disclose your contact information, content interest information or other activity data, and any other information, including Personal Data, collected in the course of these activities for commercial purposes to those sponsors. In many cases, you intentionally disclose your details by providing your information to these sponsors through consent via a registration form or by scanning your badge at the applicable sponsor’s booth. Virtual events hosted by third party platforms may also collect additional data from you when you visit their sites. The treatment of this information is subject to each of these other entities’ respective privacy statements.
Partners and Resellers
. We may disclose your Personal Data, such as contact information, business details, and content interest and activity details, to our partners and resellers for business purposes, such as to carry out our business or for joint marketing efforts to reach our customers and prospective customers, subject to laws applicable in your jurisdiction. In many cases, you intentionally disclose your details by providing your information to these sponsors through consent via a registration form. You can review a list of our current partners
here
.
Protection of Rights, Security and Fraud Detection
. For all categories of data we collect, we disclose your Personal Data for business purposes to protect our customers and users, to secure our physical and intellectual property, and to prevent or investigate security or fraudulent attempts against our users through our platform.
Law Enforcement and Legal Requests
. For all categories of data we collect, we may disclose Personal Data to comply with applicable law or to respond to valid legal requests, such as a subpoena, from law enforcement or other authorities.
With our Affiliates, Related to Corporate Transactions, and Provision of Professional Services
. For all categories of data we collect, we disclose Personal Data to our affiliates and subsidiaries for business purposes, including any service providers and agents that work on our behalf. For example, we may disclose your Personal Data to support service providers with whom we have in place agreements to protect your Personal Data. We may also disclose your information as required for us to carry out a corporate transaction, such as a merger or sale of assets of all or part of our company. We will also disclose your Personal Data to our professional service providers (for example, our auditors, insurance providers, financial service providers, and legal advisors) as needed for us to run our business.
Platform, Training, and Community Analytics Data
. We disclose Ancillary Data, such as metadata (for example, unique identifiers and Usage Data), collected through our platform with analytics service providers for our business purposes, such as to provide a better user experience and improve our products and services.
Advertising and Marketing
. We share your Personal Data, such as metadata and contact data, with third-party advertising and marketing providers, to allow us to better reach our customers and prospective customers, and to sell our products and services, to the extent permitted by laws applicable in your jurisdiction. In some circumstances, we may ask you to consent to directly disclosing your Personal Data with these third parties prior to sharing your Personal Data, such as via a consent banner on our website. For details on your choices with respect this sharing or disclosure, please see
Your Information Choices
below. For specific details on these companies’ privacy practices, please visit their privacy policies.
Anonymous or De-identified Usage Data
. We disclose anonymized or aggregated usage data or security threat information with third parties or the public. For example, this may include disclosing trends regarding organizations’ use of Okta’s products and services to customers and prospective customers in our “Businesses at Work” report. The data disclosed in this category is not Personal Data.
Okta Communities, Help Center, and Other User Generated Content
. We make available various community forums and self-help support materials, as well as blogs and other means for you to post information on our websites. This information you post is publicly-available information that you choose to disclose and it may be read, collected, and processed by others that visit these websites. Except for username (which may be your real name) and the details that you choose to include in your profile, the categories of data disclosed in these circumstances will depend on what information you choose to provide.
Recruitment Data
. When you apply for a job at Okta, we disclose your Personal Data, including applicant data, biographical information, and other Personal Data we possess to our affiliate companies for business reasons, such as human resource management and internal reporting; our service providers for business reasons, such as the recruitment platform, to verify references and to manage background checks; and law enforcement or government authorities, or as otherwise necessary to comply with law or as needed for the recruitment and human resources process.
Okta Social Media Outlets
Okta’s websites may use social media features, such as the Facebook “like” button, the Instagram “heart” button, Twitter sharing features, and other similar widgets (“Social Media Features”). You may be given the option by such Social Media Features to post information about your activities on a website to a profile page of yours that is provided by a third-party social media network in order to share content with others within your network. Social Media Features are either hosted by the respective social media network, or hosted directly on our websites. To the extent the Social Media Features are hosted by the respective social media networks and you click through to these from our website, the latter may receive information showing that you have visited our website. If you are logged in to your social media account, it is possible that the respective social media network can link your visit to our websites with your social media profile.
Your interactions with Social Media Features are governed by the privacy policies (and any other applicable terms) of the respective companies that provide the relevant Social Media Features.
Products and Services Available Through Other Channels
If you visit the Unity Technologies Asset Store to access an Okta product or service, as part of provisioning assets through the Asset Store, Unity Technologies will collect personal data as described in its Privacy Policy. If you use the Heroku Marketplace to access an Okta product or service, Heroku (Salesforce, Inc.) will collect personal data as described in its Privacy Policy.
VI. Okta’s Security Posture & Measures Taken
Security is a critical priority for Okta. We maintain a comprehensive, written information security program that contains industry-standard administrative, technical, and physical safeguards designed to prevent the loss or theft and unauthorized access, use, disclosure or alteration of Personal Data.
However, no security system is perfect, and due to the inherent nature of the Internet, we cannot guarantee that data, including Personal Data, is absolutely safe from intrusion or other unauthorized access by others. You are responsible for protecting your password(s) and other authentication factors, as well as maintaining the security of your devices.
If you use the Okta online service via a subscription purchased for you by an Okta customer, then that customer is responsible for configuring your instance appropriately. Additional information about security settings and configurations can be found in the documentation related to our online service, including the Trust & Compliance documentation, which is available at
https://www.okta.com/agreements
.
VII. International Data Transfers
Your Personal Data may be collected, transferred to, processed, and stored by us in the United States, and by our affiliates, service providers, and third parties that are based in other countries. The addresses of our offices where Okta, Inc. and its affiliates are located can be found online at
https://www.okta.com/contact
.
Some of the countries where your Personal Data may be processed, including the United States, are not subject to an adequacy decision by the European Commission or your local legislature and/or regulator, and may lack data protection laws as comprehensive as or may not provide the same level of data protection as your jurisdiction, such as the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, or Japan. For example, as of the effective date of this policy, the United States does not have a federal privacy law that covers all types of data; however, privacy is regulated by federal and state agencies and by various state laws. In light of regional differences, Okta has put in place various safeguards and the security measures described above. For example, when we share Personal Data, we take reasonable steps so that the recipient of your Personal Data offers an adequate level of data protection, for example, by entering into the appropriate agreements containing relevant data protection provisions or we will ask you for your prior consent to such international data transfers.
Auth0, LLCs Adherence to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework
Auth0 LLC complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Auth0, LLC has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Auth0, LLC has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Pursuant to the DPF Program, EU, UK, and Swiss individuals have the right to obtain our confirmation of whether we maintain personal information relating to you in the United States. Upon request, we will provide you with access to the personal information that we hold about you. You may also correct, amend, or delete the personal information we hold about you. An individual who seeks access, or who seeks to correct, amend, or delete inaccurate data transferred to the United States in reliance on the DPF Program should direct their query to privacy@okta.com. If requested to remove data, we will respond within a reasonable timeframe.
We will provide an individual opt-out choice, or opt-in for sensitive data, before we share your data with third parties other than our agents, or before we use it for a purpose other than which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized. To request to limit the use and disclosure of your personal information, please submit a written request using the contact information described in the “
How to Contact Okta
” section below.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Auth0 LLC commits to resolve complaints about our collection or use of your personal data transferred to the U.S. pursuant to the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. EU individuals with inquiries or complaints should contact Okta at privacy@okta.com. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, you can refer your unresolved inquiries or complaints to the Data Privacy Framework Services owned and operated by BBB National Programs
here
.  The services of the Data Privacy Framework Services are provided at no cost to you.  If your DPF Principles-related complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms, as described
here
. Individuals located in the EEA, UK or in Switzerland with DPF Principles-related inquiries or complaints may email or write to us, using the contact information described in the “
How to Contact Okta
” section below.
Okta is responsible for the processing of personal data it receives under the DPF and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. Okta complies with the DPF Principles for all onward transfers of personal data from the EU, UK, and Switzerland, including the onward transfer liability provisions.
In certain situations, we may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Auth0 LLC’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
VIII. Children
Okta’s websites are not directed at children. We do not knowingly collect Personal Data from children under the age of 16. If you are a parent or guardian and believe that your child has provided us with Personal Data without your consent, please contact us by using the information in the “How to Contact Us” section, below, and we will take steps to delete such Personal Data from our systems.
IX. How Long Does Okta Keep Your Data?
We will retain your Personal Data for a period of time that is consistent with the original purpose of the data collection, or as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements. We determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data by considering the amount, nature and sensitivity of your Personal Data processed, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Data and whether we can achieve the purposes of the processing through other means, and on the basis of applicable legal requirements (such as applicable statutes of limitation).
X. Your Information Choices
Your Privacy Choices
In the above sections, we describe how we may collect, use and share your Personal Data for providing relevant content and advertising. Below, we describe how you may unsubscribe, opt out, or otherwise modify settings related to our processing of your Personal Data.
Direct Email Marketing.
If you wish to withdraw from direct email marketing communications from Okta, you may click the “unsubscribe” button included in our emails or:
Visit our
Subscription Center
. Please note, you cannot unsubscribe from critical transactional emails that are related to our provision of our online Service (such as those related to security and your Okta account).
For the Okta Talent Community, then you may visit our Talent Community unsubscribe page
here
.
For Okta Consumer Products, you may update your preferences by logging into your account
here
.
Direct Marketing – Phone or Postal Mailings.
If you wish to withdraw from phone call or postal mail marketing communications from Okta, please request to do so through our
form
.
Analytics
. To opt-out of analytics on our websites, you may adjust your cookie preferences as described below. For more information on how to opt-out of tracking technology from Google Analytics, click
here
. To opt-out of Marketo’s tracking technology, click
here
.
If you are a user of the Okta online service via a subscription purchased for you by an Okta customer, to opt-out of platform-based analytics on an individual level, including participation in the Okta Ideas forum, please contact us at privacy@okta.com or please make a request for this through our
form
.
Cookie Preferences
. To manage the use of relevant advertising and other non-essential cookies, please see details below:
We use OneTrust as a service provider to help you manage cookies. Click the following
Cookies Settings
OneTrust preference center or the
Auth0 by Okta Cookie Settings
to opt-out of relevant advertising and other non-essential cookies. (You may need to adjust your browser or cookie settings to access if you have already made a choice to accept cookies.)
You may also adjust your web browser settings to opt-out of non-essential cookies. Please understand that blocking or deleting non-essential cookies may affect our websites’ functionality.
If you came to our websites from personalized advertising, then you may further opt out of interest-based advertising from our advertising vendors through the Digital Advertising Alliance by using the following, applicable link(s): (i)
USA
; (ii)
Europe
; (iii)
Canada
; and (iv)
Other regions
.
Note that any choice with regards to cookie-based advertising only applies to the web browser through which you exercise that choice. You will continue to see advertising, including potentially from Okta, even if you opt-out of personalized advertising.
Your Privacy Rights
Depending on your jurisdiction, you may have certain rights with respect to your Personal Data that we process in our capacity as a data controller, subject to applicable law:
Right to Access
. You have the right to access your Personal Data held by us.
Right to Rectification
. You have the right to rectify inaccurate Personal Data and, taking into account the purpose of processing, to ensure it is complete.
Right to Erasure (or “Right to be Forgotten”)
. You have the right to have your Personal Data erased or deleted.
Right to Restrict Processing
. You have the right to restrict our processing of your Personal Data.
Right to Data Portability
. You have the right to transfer your Personal Data, when possible.
Right to Object
. You have the right to object to the processing of your Personal Data that is carried out on the basis of legitimate interests, such as direct marketing.
Right to Opt Out of Sale
. You may also have the right to opt-out of the sharing of your Personal Data with third parties for targeted advertising purposes on third-party sites.  As described in Section III above, Okta may use targeted or advertising cookies for our marketing efforts and to reach potential customers across the web. Depending on your jurisdiction (for example, if you are a California resident), you have the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data by us as a business. Okta shares Personal Data as further described below in Section XI, which may be considered a “sale” of Personal Data under the California Consumer Privacy Act. You may opt out by clicking the “
Your Privacy Choices
” link at the bottom of our website and selecting your preferences on that page.
Right Not to be Subject to Automated Decision-Making
. You have the right not to be subject to automated decision-making, including profiling, which produces legal effects. Okta does not currently engage in the foregoing on our websites or in our products and services.
Right to Non-Discrimination for the Exercise of Your Privacy Rights
. You have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of your privacy rights as described above.
If you would like to make a request and exercise your rights described above or have questions or concerns, please complete our online
form
or reach out to us using the contact information below. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with your relevant supervisory authority.
XI. Information for California Residents / Your California Privacy Rights
Under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”), California residents have certain rights to understand and request that we disclose details about how we handle your Personal Data. If you would like to learn about our process for verifying requests, including the details that you must provide to us to verify your request,
click here
. To learn more about how we collect, use, disclose, and share your Personal Data, please see below.
Categories of Personal Data Collected
In the preceding 12 months, we have collected the following categories of Personal Data about California consumers. We may collect this Personal Data directly from you, from third parties, and from your interactions with us. For additional detail about the Personal Data that we collect and the sources from which we collect this Personal Data, please review Section III above. The Personal Data categories are:
identifiers, such as name, email address, address, and phone number;
categories of Personal Data described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80, such as address, telephone number, employment, and employment history;
commercial information, such as records of products or services purchased and other transactional data;
Internet or other network or device activity details, such as technical data about your use of our website, products and services;
geolocation data, such as your approximate location based on IP address;
audio, electronic, or visual data, such as part of a photo or recording for an Okta in-person or virtual event;
professional or employment-related information, such as your employer and job role;
education information and details such as education history, certifications and qualifications;
any other information you provide to Okta in connection with a job application, such as information contained in a cover letter, information disclosed in an interview, or other information you volunteer during the application process; and
inferences drawn from any of the above information.
We may retain this Personal Data for as long as is needed for the purpose(s) for which it was collected and no longer than is relevant and reasonably necessary. Our retention periods vary based on business, legal and regulatory needs. We securely retain records of data requests for at least 24 months as required under the CCPA.  For further information on our retention criteria see
Section IX
above.
Business and Commercial Purposes for Collection; Disclosures for a Business Purpose
We may collect all of the above categories of Personal Data to run our business and carry out our day-to-day activities, as described above in Section IV. We have disclosed each of these categories of Personal Data with our service providers for various business purposes, as described above in Section V, in the preceding 12 months.
We collect and process Personal Data related to job applicants to recruit and hire, assess and evaluate a job applicant’s skills and qualifications, comply with legal obligations, and send information about positions at Okta that may be of interest to individuals.
Categories of Personal Data Sold or Shared for Cross-Context Behavioral Advertising
In the preceding 12 months, we have disclosed the above categories of Personal Data to third-party advertising partners, such as in connection with our use of tracking technologies for cross-context behavioral advertising or by providing lists of email addresses for potential customers, so that we can reach you across the web with advertisements for our products and services. This may be considered “sharing” or a “sale” under the CCPA. You can read more about our sharing and sales activities above in Section III and Section V. Okta does not have actual knowledge that it sells or shares the personal data of consumers under 16 years of age.
Categories of Personal Data Sold or Shared for Job Applicants
Okta has not sold or shared any Personal Data relating to job applicants, in the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Policy.
Sensitive Personal Data
In addition to the categories of Personal Data listed above, we may collect certain categories of Sensitive Personal Data from you as that term is defined under CCPA, if you choose to provide it. In the preceding 12 months, we may have collected the following categories of Sensitive Personal Data from California consumers:
Social Security Number, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number;
account log-In, financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account;
precise geolocation;
racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, or union membership;
contents of your email and text messages, unless we are the intended recipient of the communication;
biometric information for the purpose of unique identification;
health information; and
sex life or sexual orientation information.
Categories of Sensitive Personal Data Disclosed
In the preceding 12 months Okta has not sold or shared any Sensitive Personal Data; however, we may have disclosed your Sensitive Personal Data to service providers for business purposes as further described in Section V above and as set forth below.
Business Purposes For Which Sensitive Personal Data will be Used or Disclosed
We may collect the categories of Sensitive Personal Data listed for processing job applications and the purposes as further described in Section IV above, and to further our legitimate business purposes as outlined under the CCPA:
performing services, including maintaining or servicing accounts;
detection and prevention of security incidents;
protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal actions and prosecuting those responsible;
auditing related to consumer interactions;
short-term, transient use;
quality and safety maintenance or verification;
internal research for technological development; and
debugging to identify and repair functionality.
Your Rights
The CCPA gives you certain rights regarding the Personal Data we collect about you:
Right to Know About Personal Data Collected, Disclosed, or Sold.
You have the right to request to know what Personal Data we collect, use, disclose, share and sell about you.
Right to Request Deletion of Personal Data
. You have the right to request the deletion of your Personal Data collected or maintained by us as a business.
Right to Opt-Out of the Sale or Sharing of Personal Data.
You have the right to opt-out of the sale of your Personal Data by us as a business. Okta shares Personal Data as described above, which may be considered a “sale” of Personal Data under the CCPA.
You may opt out by clicking here “
Your Privacy Choices
” link at the bottom of our website and selecting your preferences on that page. You may also opt out by broadcasting an opt-out preference signal like the Global Privacy Control (GPC), but please note that this signal will be linked to your browser only. If you wish to learn more about the GPC and how to use a browser or browser extension incorporating the GPC signal, you can visit the GPC website
here
.
Right to Limit the Use and Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Data
.  In some instances, we may use or disclose your Sensitive Personal Data for the legitimate business purposes as outlined under the CCPA, and for any other purposes as set forth in Section IV, above.  If we ever use or disclose your Sensitive Personal Data for a reason other than the legitimate business purposes as outlined under the CCPA and for any other purposes other than those described in Section IV, we will update this Privacy Policy and provide you with instructions to limit the use and disclosure of your Sensitive Personal Data.
Right to Correct Inaccurate Personal Data
.  You have the right to request the correction of your Personal Data if it is inaccurate and you may submit a request as further described below.
Right to Non-Discrimination for the Exercise of Your Privacy Rights
. You have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of your privacy rights conferred by the CCPA.
Authorized Agent
. You may designate an authorized agent to make a request under the CCPA on your behalf. We may require the agent to demonstrate proof of their authorization by providing us with a signed permission from you or a copy of your power-of-attorney document granting that right. In the case of the former, we may still request that you verify your own identity as described above or directly confirm that you have provided such permission.
Financial Incentives
. We do not provide any financial incentives tied to the collection, sale, or deletion of your Personal Data.
If you would like to make a request and exercise your rights described above, please complete our online
form
, or contact us via the telephone number listed in the section below.
XII. How to Contact Okta
If you would like to contact us with questions or concerns about our privacy policies and practices, you may contact us via any of the following methods:
Online Form: Click
here
.
Email: privacy@okta.com
Toll-free Number (USA): 888-655-1161
Mailing Address:
Okta, Inc. (including its subsidiary, Auth0, LLC)
ATTN: Okta Data Protection Officer (Okta Privacy Team)
100 First Street, Floor 6
San Francisco, CA 94105
USA
Okta UK Limited
ATTN: Okta Data Protection Officer (Okta Privacy Team)
20 Farringdon Road
ECIM 3HE
United Kingdom
Okta Japan K.K.
ATTN: Okta Data Protection Officer (Okta Privacy Team)
45F, Shibuya Scramble Square
2-24-12 Shibuya
Shibuya-ku, Tokyo, Japan, 150-6139
A representative director for Okta in Japan is Takashi Watanabe.
Accessibility
If you are not able to access our form, you may request that a copy be provided to you in an alternative format by calling 888-655-1161 (USA toll-free) or by emailing privacy@okta.com.
XIII. Changes to the Policy
This Privacy Policy may be updated from time to time, to reflect changes in our practices, technologies, additional factors, and to be consistent with applicable data protection and privacy laws and principles, and other legal requirements. If we do make updates, we will update the “effective date” at the top of this Privacy Policy webpage. If we make a materially significant update, we may provide you with notice prior to the update taking effect, such as by posting a conspicuous notice on our website or by contacting you using the email address you provided.
For the January 01, 2023 archived Privacy Policy, please visit
https://www.okta.com/privacy-policy/2023-01-archived/
.
Okta Privacy Policy
I. Introduction
II. Okta’s Roles & Responsibilities
III. Personal Data We Collect and Data Sources
Covered Data Processing Activities
Personal Data We Collect From Other Sources
Device Data, Usage Data, Ancillary Data, Diagnostic Data, and Metadata We Collect
IV. How We Use Personal Data
V. Personal Data Disclosed by Okta and Data You Choose to Disclose to Other Entities
Personal Data Disclosed by Okta
VI. Okta’s Security Posture & Measures Taken
VII. International Data Transfers
VIII. Children
IX. How Long Does Okta Keep Your Data?
X. Your Information Choices
Your Privacy Choices
XI. Information for California Residents / Your California Privacy Rights
Your Rights
XII. How to Contact Okta
Accessibility
XIII. Changes to the Policy
Sub-policy 3
https://www.elastic.co/legal/privacy-statement:
Skip to main content
Effective Date: January 3, 2025
This General Privacy Statement (also referred to as our "Privacy Statement") explains how Elasticsearch, Inc., and our subsidiaries and affiliated companies ("Elastic," "we," "our," or "us") collect, use, share and otherwise process information that identifies or could be identifiable to you ("personal data" or "personal information").
Residents of the EEA, United Kingdom, and Switzerland
If EEA, UK, or Swiss data protection law applies to the processing of your personal data, you can review the "Your Privacy Rights" section below to learn more about your rights and Elastic's compliance with applicable laws.
California Residents
If you are a California resident, the
California Privacy Rights Statement
supplements this General Privacy Statement and provides an explanation of how Elastic "discloses" for "business purposes," but does not "sell" or "share" your "personal information," as those terms are defined under California law.
Interaction Specific Statements
We supplement this Statement with the following specific statements based on how we interact with you:
Product Privacy Statement
. This statement applies to the information we collect and use in connection with customer deployments of our products and services.
Applicant Privacy Statement
. This statement applies to the personal data we collect and use in connection with our employment recruiting process.
California Privacy Rights Statement
. This statement explains the privacy rights of California residents.
Cookie Statement
. This statement explains how we use cookies and similar technologies.
General Privacy Statement: Contents
Scope & Responsibilities
Information We Collect & How We Collect It
How We Use the Information
How We Share the Information
Cookies and Website Automatic Data Collection
Legal Basis for Processing Your Personal Data
International Data Transfers
Data Privacy Framework
Your Privacy Rights
U.S. State Law Requirements
Security
Other Information
How to Contact Us
Scope & Responsibilities
This General Privacy Statement explains your rights and choices related to the personal data we collect when:
You visit, interact with or use any of our websites, social media pages, marketing or sales communications, or register for our products and services ("Online Properties"); and
You visit, interact with or use any of our offices, events, sales, marketing and other offline activities ("Offline Properties")(collectively, the "Properties");
This General Privacy Statement does not cover:
Automatic collection from our products and services:
This Statement does not cover the information we automatically collect in connection with your use of Elastic products and services. Please see our
Product Privacy Statement
for that information.
Applicant Information:
This Statement does not cover information related to our employment recruiting efforts. Please see our
Applicant Privacy Statement
for that information.
Customer Content:
Certain Elastic products permit customers to ingest or upload and submit content to the products ("Customer Content"). This notice does not cover Customer Content, including any personal data about you that may be contained in Customer Content, because the Customer, rather than Elastic, controls how Customer Content is processed. Any questions about the processing of Customer Content should be addressed to the Customer directly.
Organizational Use:
When you use our products or services on behalf of an organization (e.g., your employer), your use is administered and provisioned by your organization under its policies regarding the use and protection of personal data. If you have questions about how your data is being accessed or used by your organization, please refer to your organization's privacy policy and direct your inquiries to your organization's system administrator.
Elastic determines the purposes and means for the processing (i.e., we are the data controller) of your personal data as described in this Privacy Statement unless expressly specified otherwise.
Information We Collect & How We Collect It
Elastic collects personal data and other information from you directly, through automated means, and from third parties. More information on each category follows:
From You
We collect personal data when you voluntarily provide it to us (including to our service providers or other parties who collect it on our behalf). For example, we collect personal data when you order, register to use, or request information about Elastic products and services, subscribe to marketing communications, complete surveys, provide such data in product feedback, or sign up for an Elastic event or webinar. We may also collect personal data from you when you attend one of our events, during phone calls with sales representatives, or when you contact customer support.
The personal data we collect may include contact information (such as your name, address, telephone number, or email address), professional information (such as your employer name, address, job title, department or job role), user IDs, and passwords, and contact preferences. We collect information you choose to provide when completing any "free text" boxes in our forms (for example, for event sign-up, product feedback, or survey requests), and we collect personal data disclosed by you on message boards, chat features (such as Elastic Bot), blogs, and other services or platforms to which you can post information and materials (including third party services and platforms). We may also collect billing and transactional information.
Automatically
We use technology that is integrated into our Online Properties such as cookies, web beacons, and embedded URLs to provide us with automated data collection.
Online Properties
We automatically collect certain information when you use, access, or interact with our Online Properties. This information may include unique identification numbers and other information about the specific device you are using, such as the hardware model, operating system version, web-browser software, your Internet Protocol (IP) address/MAC address/device identifier, device event information (such as crashes, system activity, and hardware settings, browser language, the date and time of your request and referral URL), broad geographic location (e.g., country or city-level location) and other technical data that uniquely identifies your browser. We may also collect information about how your device has interacted with our Online Properties, such as the pages accessed and other statistical information. To learn more, please read the
Elastic Cookie Statement
.
Elastic Products
Elastic may automatically collect information in connection with your organization's deployment of certain products. See our
Product Privacy Statement
for more information.
From Third-Party Sources
We may also acquire data from other sources including affiliates in our corporate group, our partners, or others that we use to make our information better or more useful. For example, we may compare the geographic information acquired from commercial sources with the IP address collected by our Automatic Data Collection Tools (see our
Cookie Statement
) to derive your general geographic area. Information may also be linked via a unique identifier, such as a cookie or account number.
How We Use the Information
Depending on the situation, we may use your information for the following purposes:
Communications and Transaction Processing.
We use your information to communicate with you, respond to your requests, and provide the information you requested. We also use personal data, including financial, credit card, and payment information, to process transactions.
Provision, Administer, and Support Your Account.
We use your information to provide our products and manage your account. Examples include managing product downloads, updates and fixes, providing support and recommendations, and sending other administrative or account-related communications, including release notes.
Manage Your Customer Experience.
We use your information to maintain accurate contact and registration data, deliver support, and to offer products, services, and features. We also use your data to deliver personalized communications and create recommendations based on your use of Elastic products, services, features, and your visits on our websites.
Advertising.
We use your information to provide personalized advertising to you per your privacy preferences settings and applicable law. We might also share some of your information with marketing service providers and digital marketing networks to present advertisements that might interest you. This may involve the use of Automatic Data Collection Tools. To learn more about how Elastic uses Automated Data Collection Tools please see our
Cookie Statement
.
Facilitate and Evaluate Use of the Online Properties.
We use your information to provide the Online Properties, to facilitate your use of the Online Properties (such as facilitating navigation and the login process, preserving information between sessions and enhancing security), to improve quality, to evaluate page response rates and personalize and determine content.
Business Operations.
We use your information to conduct ordinary business operations, e.g., business research and analytics, corporate reporting and management, staff training and quality assurance purposes, and outreach.
Security.
We use the information to maintain the integrity and security of our websites, products and services and preventing and detecting security threats, fraud, or other criminal or malicious activity that might compromise your information or the information of other customers or website visitors.
Third Party Social Networks.
We may use personal data to interact with you on third party social networks (subject to that network's terms of use).
Conferences and Events.
Elastic and our partners may use your information to communicate with you about our events or our partner events. After the event, Elastic may contact you about the event and related products and services. We may share information about your attendance with your company, and our conference sponsors and partners, where legally permitted to do so. If a partner or conference sponsor directly requests your personal data at their conference booths or presentations, your information will be handled per their privacy practices. We recommend that you review the privacy practices of such partners and sponsors.
Education and Training:
If you sign up for an Elastic certification course or training, Elastic will use your information to facilitate the delivery of such course or training.
Research & Innovation.
We use your information to develop new products, features, and services using research and development tools and incorporating data analysis activities.
Comply with Law.
We use your information as required to be compliant with applicable laws, regulations, court orders, government, and law enforcement requests.
Other Legitimate Business Purposes:
We may use your information when it is necessary for other legitimate purposes, such as protecting Elastic's confidential and proprietary information.
How We Share the Information
We share your personal data with the following categories of recipients and only with the appropriate contractual obligations in place:
With Elastic Companies
We may transfer your personal data to other Elastic entities in the US and worldwide for the purposes outlined in this Privacy Statement. We protect your personal data per this Statement wherever it is processed and take appropriate contractual or other steps to protect it under applicable laws. These steps include participating in the U.S. Department of Commerce's Data Privacy Framework, implementing the European Commission's
standard contractual clauses
along with supplementary measures, implementing the Information Commissioner's Office
international data transfer addendum
to the European Commission's standard contractual clauses, and relying on the European Commission's and the Information Commissioner's Office's
adequacy decisions
about certain countries, as applicable, for data transfers from the EEA, UK, and Switzerland to the United States and other countries. We have implemented similar appropriate safeguards with our service providers, partners, and affiliates. Furthermore, our privacy guidelines are communicated to our employees on an annual basis as part of our mandatory training.
With Service Providers
We may share your information with third parties, such as vendors, consultants, agents and other service providers who provide services such as IT and system administration and hosting, credit card processing, research and analytics, marketing, targeted advertising, training and certifications, customer support, and data enrichment for the purposes and according to the legal bases described below. Our service providers are required by contract to safeguard any personal data they receive from us and are prohibited from using the personal data for any purpose other than to perform the services as instructed by Elastic. These service providers may be located in the US or other global locations.
With Business Partners
We may share your information with our partners, such as distributors and resellers, and to other business partners, to fulfill product and information requests, to effectively deliver unified support, to provide customers and prospective customers with information about Elastic, and for event purposes. From time to time, Elastic may engage in joint sales, product promotions, or events with selected business partners. If you purchase or express interest in a jointly-offered product, promotion, service, or event, we may share relevant personal data with those partners. Such partners are responsible for managing their use of the personal data collected in these circumstances, including providing information to you about how they use your personal information. We recommend you review the privacy policies of the relevant partner to find out more about their handling of your personal information.
With Competent Authorities
We may share your personal data when we believe, in good faith, that we must: (i) respond to duly authorized information requests of law enforcement agencies, regulators, courts, and other public authorities, including to meet national security or other law enforcement requirements; (ii) comply with any law, regulation, subpoena, or court order; (iii) investigate and help prevent security threats, fraud or other criminal or malicious activity; (iv) enforce/protect the rights and properties of Elastic or our affiliates; or (v) protect the rights or personal safety of Elastic's and our affiliates' employees, and third parties on or using Elastic property when allowed and in line with the requirements of applicable law.
Elastic may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
For Corporate Transactions
We may share your information where, whether for strategic or other business reasons, Elastic decides to sell, buy, merge, or otherwise reorganize its businesses. In such transactions, we may disclose or transfer your personal data to prospective or actual purchasers or receive your personal data from sellers. Our practice is to seek appropriate protection for your personal data in these types of transactions.
Cookies and Website Automatic Data Collection
Please see our
Cookie Statement
for detailed information on our use of cookies and Automatic Data Collection Tools.
Legal Basis for Processing Your Personal Data
We only use your personal data in a lawful, transparent, and fair manner. Depending on the specific personal data concerned and the factual context, we rely on the following legal bases:
As necessary to prepare and enter into a contract;
Consistent with specific revocable consents;
As necessary to comply with our legal obligations;
To protect your vital interests or those of others; and
As necessary for our (or others') legitimate interests, including our interests in, unless those interests are overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms, which require protection of personal data.
International Data Transfers
Elastic operates globally, which means personal data collected in the European Economic Area ("
EEA
"), UK, or Switzerland may be transferred to all other countries in which Elastic or its affiliates, service providers, and business partners operate. We protect your personal data in accordance with this Privacy Statement wherever it is processed and take steps to carry out these transfers in compliance with applicable laws. These steps include putting data transfer agreements in place to help protect your personal data, participating in the U.S. Department of Commerce's
Data Privacy Framework
, implementing the European Commission's
standard contractual clauses
along with supplementary measures, implementing the Information Commissioner's Office international data transfer addendum to the European Commission's standard contractual clauses, and relying on the European Commission's and the Information Commissioner's Office's
adequacy decisions
about certain countries, as applicable, for data transfers from the EEA, UK, and Switzerland to the United States and other countries. We have implemented similar appropriate safeguards with our service providers, partners and affiliates.
Data Privacy Framework
Elastic complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Elastic has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Elastic has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy statement and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. Elastic's commitments under the Data Privacy Framework are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit the
Data privacy framework website
.
As set out above, Elastic uses a limited number of third-party service providers to assist us in providing our services to our users and business customers, and in otherwise conducting our business. These third parties may access, process, or store personal data in the course of providing their services. Elastic maintains contracts with these third parties restricting their access, use and disclosure of personal data in compliance with our Data Privacy Framework obligations, including the onward transfer provisions, and Elastic remains liable if they fail to meet those obligations and Elastic is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
Your Privacy Rights
Depending on where you live, you may have certain rights such as:
Access:
To request and obtain a copy of your personal data that is held by Elastic;
Rectification:
To request the correction of your personal data held by Elastic in order to update any incomplete or inaccurate information;
Deletion:
To request to have your personal data held by Elastic deleted;
Restrict Processing:
To request that we restrict the processing of your personal data where:
You dispute the accuracy of the data;
The processing is unlawful, but you do not wish to have it delete; or
Elastic no longer needs the data, but you need it to assert, exercise, or defend legal claims.
Objection:
To object to the further processing of your personal data at any time;
Portability:
To request to receive the personal data you have provided to Elastic in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format; and
Withdrawal of consent:
To request to withdraw consent at any time, where previously given.
If your personal data is to be used for a new purpose that is materially different from that for which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized, or is disclosed to a non-agent third party in a manner that is not specified in this Statement, we will provide you with an opportunity to choose whether to have your personal data used or disclosed in such a manner. Requests opt-out of such uses or disclosures should be sent to us as specified in the "How to Contact Us" section of this Statement below.
Certain personal data, such as information about medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, and religious or political beliefs may be considered "Sensitive Personal Data." Elastic will not process Sensitive Personal Data for a purpose other than for the purpose it was originally collected or subsequently authorized unless we have received your affirmative and explicit consent.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Elastic also commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal data. Individuals located in the EU, UK, or Switzerland with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of their personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Elastic by submitting this
form
. Please identify yourself and specify your request. We use commercially reasonable efforts to delete your personal data as required, but retain records necessary to comply with a governmental authority or applicable federal, state, or local law. Where legally permitted, we may decline to process requests that are unreasonably repetitive or systematic, require disproportionate technical effort, or jeopardize the privacy of others.
You may also have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal data. In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Elastic commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If Elastic itself, or through cooperation with the relevant DPA, does not resolve your complaint, you may have the possibility to engage in binding arbitration through the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information on this option, please see
Annex I
of the Data Privacy Framework Principles.
Subscription Communications and General Communications
You have the option of subscribing to communications from us. Elastic subscription communications include email newsletters, software updates, and maintenance notifications that may be expressly requested by you or which you consented to receive.
After you consent to such communications, you may opt-out of receiving them by following the instructions in the email. To unsubscribe from all Elastic email lists, please
click here
.
U.S. State Privacy Law Requirements
ome U.S. state privacy laws like the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) and Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (VCDPA) require specific disclosures for state residents.
This Privacy Statement is designed to help you understand how Elastic handles your personal data:
We explain the categories of personal data we collect and the sources of that personal data in
Information We Collect & How We Collect It
.
We explain how we use personal data in
How We Use the Information
.
We explain when we may share information in
How We Share the Information
.
We do not sell your personal data to any third parties. We also do not "share" your personal information as that term is defined in the CCPA.
We explain how we retain personal data in the Data Retention section of this Privacy Statement.
State laws like the CCPA and VCDPA also provide the right to request information about how we collect, use, and disclose personal data. And they give you the right to access and correct personal data, and to request that Elastic delete that personal data.
To exercise your rights, you may raise a request by submitting this
form
. Please identify yourself and specify your request. We use commercially reasonable efforts to delete your personal data as required, but retain records necessary to comply with a governmental authority or applicable federal, state, or local law. Where legally permitted, we may decline to process requests that are unreasonably repetitive or systematic, require disproportionate technical effort, or jeopardize the privacy of others. If you disagree with the decision on your request, you can ask us to reconsider it by responding to the team's email.
For additional information related to your rights and for other required disclosures for residents of California, please see our
California Privacy Rights Statement
.
Security
Elastic is committed to protecting the security of personal data. We use appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect personal data from unauthorized access, use, or disclosure. Despite these measures, Elastic cannot eliminate security risks associated with personal data, and mistakes and security breaches may happen. We retain the data only as required or permitted by law, and while the data continues to have a legitimate business purpose. Please contact us with security questions at
security@elastic.co
.
Other Information
Data Retention. We retain information collected in connection with the Properties for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Statement or where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so.
Changes to this Privacy Statement. This General Privacy Statement is subject to occasional revision. If we make any substantial changes in the way we use personal data, we will take appropriate measures to inform our customers, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. We will provide notice of any material changes if and where required by applicable data protection laws.
The date of the most recent update to this General Privacy Statement can be found by checking the "effective" date displayed at the top of this Statement.
How to Contact Us
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Statement, you may call us at +1.650.458.2620, submit your request through our
form
, or send your request by postal mail to:
Elasticsearch, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Team
88 Kearny Street
Floor 19
San Francisco, CA 94018 USA
Or
Elasticsearch B.V.
Attn: Privacy Team
Keizersgracht 281
1016 ED Amsterdam
The Netherlands
Data Protection Officer. Elastic has appointed an external Data Protection Officer for German data subjects. For questions about how information is gathered, stored, shared, used, or to exercise any data subject rights, please contact our Data Protection Officers
here
.
If we are unable to resolve your concerns, you have the right to contact your local data privacy supervisory authority or seek a remedy through the courts if you believe your requests to exercise your rights have not been honored.
Notice
We and selected third parties use cookies or similar technologies for technical purposes and, with your consent, for other purposes as specified in the
cookie policy
.
Use the “Accept” button to consent. Use the “Reject” button to continue without accepting.
Press again to continue 0/1
Learn more and customize
Reject
Accept
Sub-policy 4
https://vercel.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Privacy Policy
Last Updated
April 22, 2024
On this page
About Vercel
Applicability
Information We Collect
That You Provide Directly
From Third Parties
From Customers
Automatically
How We Use Information
How We Retain Information
How We Disclose Information
How We Secure Information
Third-Party Services
How We Transfer Information
Data Privacy Framework
Your Privacy Rights
Minimum Age
Changes
Contact
Jurisdiction
United States
EEA and UK
Previous Versions
Download PDF
At Vercel, we respect customers' need for privacy. We offer our Sites and Services (defined below) to customers and users either directly or via a reseller. Where we refer to our "Customers" in this Privacy Notice, we refer to customers that have entered into an agreement with us or our resellers to use the Services (each, an "Agreement"). Each Customers' respective website users or applicable visitors are referred to as their "End Users."
By using or accessing our Sites and Services in any manner, you accept the practices and policies outlined in this Privacy Notice and you acknowledge that we may process and share your information.
About Vercel Products and Services
Vercel is a frontend cloud for deploying and scaling frontend applications. Our Developer Experience Platform and Managed Infrastructure services provide Customers the ability to build applications and create, share and collaborate on deployments. Customers can preview changes, make Customer content immediately available through our global Edge Network, and test from the perspective of its End Users around the world.
Vercel offers tools, workflows, and infrastructure products that Customers need to build and deploy their websites and applications. We may provide relevant privacy-specific information about our products and services in our
Documentation
.
Applicability
This Privacy Notice ("Notice") explains Vercel's practices regarding the collection, use, disclosure, and processing of your information; the rights and choices you may have with respect to such information; how you may contact us; and how we protect your information when you:
Visit Vercel's websites, such as:
vercel.com
,
nextjs.org
,
turbo.build
and other Vercel affiliated websites, such as blogs, event registrations, community discussions, forums, and social media platforms (collectively our "Sites");
Access or use the products, services, and any related applications offered by Vercel, engage directly with us, or use third-party partners, products, professional services, or interfaces that employ Vercel technology, including our web-based platform, (collectively, the "Services") as a Customer or authorized user, including but not limited to:
Host and deploy websites;
Optimize content and images;
Develop an integration or template;
Purchase a domain;
Analyze website performance, track website traffic and metrics;
Scan source code for potential code issues;
Interact with us in any way, including registering for, attending, or otherwise partaking in our events, accelerators, learning portals, or webinars (collectively, "Marketing Activities").
This Privacy Notice does not apply to:
Any information that Customers process to provide their services to End Users. Customers are solely responsible for ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations with respect to their End Users, including notifying their End Users of their personal information collection, use, and disclosure under their own terms of service and privacy policies. If your personal information is contained in Customer Content (defined below) and you have any questions about the specific settings and privacy practices the relevant Customer has made to share your personal information with us, please contact the relevant Customer directly or review their privacy notice.
Third-party products, services, businesses, or any software accessible via the Service or that integrates with the Service. If you have any questions about the specific settings and privacy practices of such third parties, please contact the relevant third-party product, service, or business to review its privacy notice.
Job applicants. To learn more about our privacy practices related to personal information collected and used for recruiting purposes, please see our
Job Applicant Privacy Notice
.
Information We Collect
The information that we collect depends on your interactions with us, the choices that you make, the products and features you use, your location, and applicable laws. We may collect or receive information directly from you, such as your name and email address when you or your organization sign up for our Services or Marketing Activities. In other cases, we receive information through your use of our Services, such as IP address and telemetry data.
Information You Provide Directly
We collect the following information directly from you when using our Sites and Services.
Contact Information
. We collect your contact information when you use, inquire about, or purchase our Services or engage in our Marketing Activities. This information may include your full name, email address, phone number, and location.
Professional Information
. We collect professional information about you, including your company name, company website, job title, and industry.
Account Information
. We collect information you provide to us to create, update, or administer your account on the Sites & Services, such as email, phone number, and username. We also provide you the option of submitting a profile picture and social media profiles. By voluntarily providing us with such account information, you represent that you are the owner of such information or have the requisite consent to provide it to us.
Transactional Information
. We collect payment and other transactional information related to our Services, such as hashed payment card values and billing address.
Domain Registration Information
. We collect registration data when you purchase a domain, such as domain name and registrant contact information. This data may be made publicly available per ICANN policies.
User Content and File Information
. We collect your website information that you upload, post, deliver, or otherwise provide to the Service, such as source code, text, photographs, document, or other files including videos or recordings (collectively, "Customer Content"), Git information, and other files that you provide us.
AI Product Information
. We collect information when you interact with certain features or Services related to our AI products, such as user chat prompts, uploaded images, design or text generations. Please see our
AI Policy
for more information on the development, deployment, and usage of our AI products and features.
Marketing Information
. When you engage and interact with our Marketing Activities or one of our sales or customer support representatives we collect information, including through form submissions, surveys, email communications, or phone calls to inquire about Vercel and our Services, such as the nature of your communication, contact preferences, and any information you choose to provide to us when completing any "free text" boxes.
Image and Audio Information
. We may collect your image or audio recordings. If you contact us by phone or video, we may record those calls. If you attend an event hosted or sponsored by Vercel, we may capture your image and/or voice in any video, photograph, or audio recording taken at the event. For more information, please see our
Event Terms and Conditions
.
Troubleshooting and Support Information
. We collect information about your account preferences or information you provide when you contact us for support, such as the solution you use, the content of chats and other communications with Vercel, and other details that help us provide support or comply with legal obligations. Support information includes content of a message or attachments that you send to us.
Social Media Information
. Our Sites and Services may use social media features, such as the "X" button and other sharing widgets. Vercel is not responsible for how these social media features collect, process, and disclose your information so we encourage you to review the social media platforms' privacy policies.
Any Information You Voluntarily Provide to Us
. For example, when you provide feedback on your experience with our Services or join a public discussion forum as part of our Marketing Activities.
Information We Collect from Third Parties
We receive information about Customers from third parties or Vercel partners that provide services or support our business operations. We limit our use of your information to the purposes described in this Notice. Information that we receive from third parties includes:
Organization Information
. We collect information from referral partners, such as company name, contact name, job title, and company address.
Transaction Information
. We collect information from our payment providers and partners, such as fraud metrics (i.e., financial risk scores) and details about failed payments.
Information We Collect from Customers
We receive information from our Customers about their authorized users (i.e., account holders) and their End Users when they interact with our Customers' websites, web applications, and APIs. Information that we receive from our Customers includes:
Contact Information
. We collect information when a Customer adds you to their account and/or designates you as an authorized user, such as name, email address, and username.
Website Information
. We collect information about traffic to and from Customers' websites, such as End User IP address, location information derived from IP address, and system configuration information.
Customers are responsible for the content transmitted across our network (e.g., images, written content, graphics, runtime logs, etc.), any personal information they process, and following acceptable behavior practices when using our Services. For more information about Vercel's shared responsibility model, please see our
Documentation
.
Information We Collect Automatically
When you use or interact with our Sites and Services, we automatically collect or receive certain information about you, your device, and your usage of our Site and Services. This information includes:
Usage Information
. We collect information about how you interact with our Sites, Marketing Activities, and Services, such as clicks, pages viewed, searches, web browser used, page response times, errors, date/timestamps associated with your usage, request information (e.g., speed, frequency, the site from which you linked to us ("referring page"), and the name of the website you choose to visit immediately after ours ("exit page"), the amount of time spent on our Sites, and information about other websites you have recently visited.
Device Information
. We collect information about how your devices interact with our Sites, Marketing Activities, and Services, such as browser type and settings, device details (e.g., device type, screen size, operating system, model, model number), language preferences, Internet Service Provider, mobile network, push notification tokens, and device event information (e.g., system activity and hardware settings, application version, and unique device identifiers, such as device ID).
Service-Generated Information
. We collect and use information generated from using our Services and Sites, such as log files, Internet Protocol (IP) address, location information derived from your IP address, proxy server, diagnostics, capacity and usage information to determine storage requirements, performance information from our servers, data settings, and system configurations, including your elected privacy and security settings.
Location Information
. We collect Customers' and End Users' city and country based on IP address. We do not identify precise location.
Telemetry Information
. We collect anonymized statistical and telemetry information as well as aggregated, de-identified information about how you use our Sites and Services.
API Information
. We collect functional data and customer-initiated events (i.e., authentication token, database URL, etc.) from Third-Party Services that connect or integrate with Vercel's Services.
Cookies
. We collect information from your browser by using cookies (which may use a cookie ID) and similar tracking technologies, depending on your settings or preferences in connection with our Sites, Marketing Activities, and Services. Where required by applicable law, we obtain your consent for the use of cookies. You may choose to delete or not accept our cookies as described in our
Cookie Notice
.
From time to time, except as restricted by applicable law or our data processing addendums with our customers, we may combine information that we collect as described above with information we obtain from different sources. For example, we may combine information entered through a Vercel sales submission with information we receive from a third-party sales intelligence platform to enhance our ability to market our Services to potential Customers. We may combine usage information with feedback to improve our Services or inform Customers about products that may be relevant to them.
How We Use Information
We use your information as described in this Notice to provide our Sites and Services. For example, we may use your information in the following ways:
Service Operation
: To operate and administer our Sites and provide, operate, deliver, monitor, and maintain our Services, including troubleshooting, system maintenance and upgrades.
Product Development and Improvement
: To improve functionality, quality, user experience, and develop new features.
Support
: To provide Customer assistance and technical support, such as responding to your requests and inquiries. Vercel personnel are prohibited from viewing Customer Content, except when instructed by you, as necessary to resolve Customer support issues, or for security, Services integrity, or legal purposes.
Communication
: To send you marketing and administrative messages, such as technical or legal notices, invoices, product updates, surveys, security alerts, marketing promotions, newsletters, training, event reminders, and/or provide other news or information about Vercel and/or our partners. Please see
Your Privacy Choices and Rights
to learn how to manage your communication preferences.
Account Administration
: To create and manage your account, complete transactions, and send billing, tax and other administrative information, such as purchase confirmations, receipts, and invoices.
Marketing Activities
: To develop and improve our Marketing Activities, such as to review and analyze trends, usage, and interactions with our Services, Site, and to personalize and improve our Marketing Activities. We may also use your information to provide you with content and/or features that match your interests and preferences.
Security
: To detect, investigate, prevent, protect against and respond to potential threats, fraudulent transactions, unauthorized access, and other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity.
Legal, Safety, and Compliance
: To comply with applicable laws and regulations or a court or legal order, and to review compliance with applicable terms.
For Any Other Purposes with Your Consent
.
How We Retain Your Information
We retain your information for the minimum necessary period to fulfill our legal and contractual obligations, develop our Sites and Services, resolve disputes, enforce our rights, for legitimate business purposes, such as tax or accounting requirements, as described in this Notice and as recommended by industry standards.
When we no longer have an ongoing legitimate business need to process your information, we will either delete or anonymize it. When we choose to anonymize information, we strive to make sure that the information cannot be linked back to you or any specific user. If deletion is not possible (e.g., backups), we will store it securely.
How We Disclose Information
We disclose information as necessary to provide the Sites and Services, as required by law, or as part of our business practices as follows. We only disclose information on a need-to-know basis where appropriate safeguards and contractual arrangements are in place and as described below.
Corporate Affiliates
. We may share or transfer information to any person or entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by or is under common control with Vercel, whether by ownership or otherwise ("Corporate Affiliate"). Any information relating to you that we provide to our Corporate Affiliates will be treated by those Corporate Affiliates in accordance with the terms of this Notice.
New Owner and Other Corporate Transactions
. We may disclose or transfer your information to relevant third parties in the event of, or as part of the due diligence or during negotiations of, any proposed or actual reorganization, sale, merger, consolidation, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceeding). Personal information may be part of the transferred assets. You may be notified thereafter of any such change in ownership or control through email or other means as applicable.
Vercel Customers
. We disclose information with our Customers when using our Services, in accordance with our contractual obligations. For example, if you join a Vercel Customer team within our Services, certain information about you including your name, contact information, and profile image may become accessible to that Customer and other individuals with whom the Customer shares access. If you are a Customer managing authorized users within our Services, such as an account administrator or team owner, we may share authorized user information for the purpose of facilitating Services-related requests.
Vercel Partners and Event Sponsors
. We engage with several partners, such as third-party advertising networks, integration service partners, event sponsors, and resellers. We may share information with them to provide and support our Services, and to conduct our Marketing Activities.
Third-Party Service Providers
. We disclose information with third-party service providers that require access to information to support our operations and delivery of our Sites and Services. The third parties that Vercel discloses your information with may include:
Professional services advisors to protect and manage our business interests.
Cloud providers to provide data hosting, data storage and content delivery network services.
Billing and payment providers to authorize, record, settle and clear transactions.
Customer support providers to respond and resolve Customer inquiries and support requests.
Security, abuse, and fraud service providers to monitor and protect the Services and Customers from illegal, deceptive, or malicious activity.
Domain registrars, registries and other domain name service providers for the purposes of domain registration and listing via the WHOIS protocol.
Corporate and information technology services to facilitate business operations and communications.
Analytics companies to review and report on our Marketing Activities and Services.
Any other suppliers, sub-contractors, partners, vendors, and other service providers acting on our behalf.
These service providers are authorized to use your information only as necessary to provide Services to Vercel. We may use and disclose aggregate information that does not identify or otherwise relate to an individual for any purpose unless we are prohibited from doing so under applicable law.
Legal or Public Authorities
. We only disclose your information when:
It is reasonably necessary to comply with any applicable law or regulation;
We are required by law to comply or respond to any court order, legal process, government and/or regulatory request;
Necessary to enforce our agreements and this Notice;
Necessary to protect the security or integrity of our Sites and Services;
Necessary to protect against harm to the rights, property, or safety of Vercel, its agents and affiliates, you, or the public as required or permitted by law; and
Necessary to respond to an emergency which we believe in good faith requires us to disclose information to assist in preventing the death or serious bodily injury of any person.
Any Other Party with Your Consent
. We may disclose your information with other third parties with your consent.
How We Secure Your Information
We use reasonable and appropriate administrative, technical, and physical safeguards designed to protect the information that we have about you from unauthorized or unlawful access, use, modification, destruction, loss, alteration and/or disclosure.
We require third parties acting on our behalf or with whom we disclose your information to provide security measures in accordance with industry standards and in compliance with contractual obligations, their privacy and security obligations, and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. We are not responsible for the privacy and security practices of such third parties outside of the information we receive from or disclose to them.
Notwithstanding our security safeguards, it is impossible to guarantee absolute security in all situations. For information on our shared responsibility model with Customers, please see our
Documentation
.
If you have any questions about the security of our Sites and Services, please contact us as provided in
Contact Us
.
Third-Party Services
Our Sites and Services may contain links to or integrations with other websites or applications not operated or controlled by Vercel ("Third-Party Services"). Certain Third-Party Services used to navigate to and from our Sites and Services have separate user terms and privacy notices that are independent of this Notice. We are not responsible for the content, accuracy, or opinions expressed in such Third-Party Services. We do not monitor or check these Third-Party Services for accuracy or completeness. We recommend carefully reviewing the terms and privacy notices of each Third-Party Service prior to use in alignment with your specific compliance, privacy, and security requirements.
How We Transfer Your Information
If you are accessing or using our Sites and Services or otherwise providing your information to us, you consent to the processing of your information in the United States and other jurisdictions in which we operate.
To provide our Sites and Services, Vercel may store, process and transmit your information outside of your country of residence, which may have different data protection laws and may not offer the same level of protection or guarantees as in your country or the country where you initially provided the information. To the extent required by applicable law, whenever we transfer your information, we take the appropriate steps to protect your information, including the use of standard contractual clauses or other appropriate legal mechanisms.
Data Privacy Framework
Vercel complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and, upon entering into force, the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Vercel has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Vercel has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that, upon entering into force, it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Notice and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit the
Data Privacy Framework website
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Vercel commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, should first contact us at
privacy@vercel.com
.
For transfers of personal information to a third party acting as a controller, Vercel complies with the DPF
Notice Principle
and
Choice Principle
. For onward transfers, Vercel is responsible for the processing of personal information it receives under the DPF Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. Vercel remains liable under the DPF Principles if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Vercel proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Vercel commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Vercel's compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Vercel is obligated to arbitrate claims and follow the terms as set forth in
Annex I of the DPF Principles
. You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms. For additional information please see
Annex I
.
Your Privacy Rights and Choices
You have certain choices and rights available when it comes to how we collect and use your information. Below is a summary of those choices and rights and how to exercise them:
Opt-out of Marketing Communications.
You may opt-out of receiving marketing communications by clicking the "Unsubscribe" link within each email or by contacting us as provided in
Contact Us
. If you are a Customer, you will continue to receive transactional and administrative communications from us regarding our Sites and Services.
Account Preferences.
You may update and correct certain account information at any time by logging into your account or contacting our
support services
. If you wish to delete your account, please follow the instructions in our
Documentation
. You may also update certain communication preferences, such as receiving SMS notifications, by logging into your account. We may retain certain information as described in
How We Retain Information
.
Managing Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies.
Relevant browser-based cookie controls are described in our
Cookie Notice
.
Depending on where you are located, you may have certain rights in connection with your personal information that we obtain. These rights vary depending on your jurisdiction. To learn more about your rights, please see
Jurisdiction-Specific Information
.
Minimum Age Requirements for Our Sites and Services
The Sites and Services are not directed or intended for use by individuals under the age of 16. To use Vercel's Sites and Services, you must be old enough to consent to the processing of your information in your jurisdiction. We do not knowingly collect personal information from anyone under the age of 16. If you are a parent or guardian and you become aware that your child has provided us with personal information, please contact us. If we become aware that we have collected personal information from anyone under the age of 16 without verification or parental consent, we take steps to remove such information.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
We periodically review and update this Notice to describe new Services or changes to our practices. You can determine when this Notice was last revised by referring to the "Last Update" date at the bottom of this Notice. We encourage you to review the Notice whenever you interact with us to stay informed about our privacy practices and the ways that you can help protect your privacy.
Contact Us
If you have questions about this Notice, please contact us at
privacy@vercel.com
or write to us:
Vercel Inc.
440 N Barranca Avenue #4133
Covina, CA 91723
United States
Jurisdiction-Specific Information
United States
This section applies to individuals based in the U.S. and supplements our Privacy Notice with respect to the processing of your personal information in accordance with all applicable privacy and data protection laws and regulations and in each case, as amended, superseded, or replaced from time to time ("Data Privacy Laws").
Data Collection, Use, and Disclosure
We act as a service provider to businesses (or equivalent terms as defined by U.S. Data Privacy Laws) when we collect and process personal information on behalf of our Customers who use our Sites and Services.
We collect the following categories of information as classified by Data Privacy Laws:
Personal Identifiers.
We collect your email address, billing address, login credentials, and IP address.
Personal Information.
We collect your contact information and billing address.
Professional Information.
We collect your company name and industry.
Characteristics of Protected Classifications.
When you communicate with us using your social media account, you may share with us, or direct others to share with us, your age, gender, and other protected information that we do not request.
Commercial Information.
We collect information about the Sites and Services you request and records of Services purchased.
Internet or Other Network Activity Information.
We collect browsing and search history, information collected from cookies and similar technologies, and analytics data.
Geolocation Information.
We collect location information of your city and country derived from IP address.
Other Inferences Drawn from Personal Information.
We draw inferences from the categories of information collected to understand a consumer's preferences, characteristics, or predispositions.
Please see
Information We Collect
in our Notice to see the full description of the information that we collect.
We use your personal information to:
Interact with you;
Facilitate transactions;
Provide our Sites and Services;
Conduct internal research and development;
Improve the quality and safety of our Sites and Services; and
Detect security incidents and prevent fraud.
Please see
How We Use Information
in our Privacy Notice for a full description of how we use your personal information.
We disclose your personal information collected with third-party service providers, such as suppliers, vendors, business partners, advertising partners, resellers and consultants to operate our business and provide you with our Sites and Services as well as help us with our Marketing Activities. These third parties may use tracking technologies, such as cookies, to gather information about your activities on our Site to deliver our Marketing Activities to you.
Under certain U.S. laws (e.g., California Consumer Privacy Act), "sharing" may refer to the targeting of advertising to a consumer based on that consumer's personal information received from the consumer's activity across websites. We may "share" your information for these purposes to provide more relevant and tailored advertising to you regarding our Sites and Services. Similarly, while we are not in the business of selling your information, under such laws and the broad definition of "sale," we may "sell" your personal information relating to your browsing activities and our Marketing Activities.
Your Privacy Rights
U.S. Data Privacy Laws grant individuals certain rights in connection with the personal information that we collect, as described below.
Right to Access.
You have the right to request access and receive certain information that we have collected about you.
Right to Know.
You have the right to know the categories and specific pieces of your personal information we have collected in the previous 12 months.
Right to Rectify or Update.
You have the right to request correction of your personal information where it is inaccurate or incomplete. We generally recommend first making any changes in your
Account Settings
.
Right to Delete or Limit.
You have the right to request that we delete or limit the processing of your personal information.
Right to Object.
You have the right to object to our processing of your personal information as allowed by applicable laws.
Right to Withdraw Consent.
You have the right to withdraw consent where you have provided your consent for us to process your personal information.
Right to Request Information.
You have the right to request information about the collection, sale, and disclosure of your personal information from the previous 12 months.
Right to Opt-out of the Sale of Information.
You have the right to opt-out of the sale of personal information we have collected about you. Please complete
this form
to opt out.
Right to Opt-out of the Sharing of Information for Cross-contextual Advertising Purposes.
You may opt out of sharing data for cross-contextual advertising purposes by completing
this form
.
Right to Non-Discrimination.
You have the right to not receive discriminatory treatment for exercising any of your rights. We do not treat anyone differently for exercising any of the rights described above.
Right to Data Portability.
You have the right to request a copy of your personal information in a structured, commonly-used, machine-readable format to facilitate the transfer to another company when technically feasible.
Exercising Your Privacy Rights
You, or an authorized individual acting on your behalf, may submit a verifiable request relating to your personal information.
If you wish to exercise any of the above rights please complete:
This form
to opt out of the sale or sharing of information.
This form
for any other rights listed above that apply to your jurisdiction.
We may need you to provide certain identifying information related to your account (i.e., user ID) or your recent interactions with us to verify your identity or the identity of any individual for whom you are requesting information. We cannot respond to your request if we cannot verify your identity and/or authority to make the request on behalf of another and confirm that the personal information relates to you.
If you wish to use an authorized agent to submit a request to exercise your rights on your behalf, you must provide the authorized agent written permission signed by you. We may deny a request from an authorized agent if the agent cannot provide Vercel your signed permission demonstrating that the agent is authorized to act on your behalf.
We fulfill requests within 45 days of receiving your request. Please note that your request may be limited in certain cases, for example if complying with your request would conflict with:
Federal, state, or local law;
Regulatory inquiries;
Subpoenas; or
Exercising or defending legal claims.
EEA and UK
This section applies to individuals based in the EEA and UK and outlines the processing of your personal information under Data Privacy Laws, including the General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR").
Vercel acts as a data controller for personal information that we collect about you while using our Sites, Services, or interacting with our Marketing Activities as described in this Notice. We act as a data processor on behalf of our Customers for the personal information contained in Customer Data.
This Notice does not apply to any personal information that we process as a data processor, as we only process that information on behalf of our Customers and in accordance with our agreements with them. A Customer that has entered into an agreement to use our Services (e.g., an individual or organization that uses our platform to deploy their websites) controls its instance of the Service and any associated data. If your personal information is contained in Customer Data, and you have any questions about the specific settings and privacy practices the relevant Customer has made to share your personal information with us, please contact the relevant Customer or review the Customer's privacy notice.
Data Collection, Use, and Disclosure
We collect and process personal information about you only where we have a legal basis for doing so under Data Privacy Laws. Our legal bases for processing personal information include:
Your Consent.
Where appropriate or legally required, we collect and use your personal information subject to your consent.
Performance of Contract.
We collect and use your personal information to contract with you or to perform a contract that you have with us.
Legitimate Interests.
We collect and use personal information about you for our legitimate interests to deliver content, optimize your experience, secure, and improve our Sites and Services.
Compliance with Laws.
We may also collect and use personal information about you:
As required by law, such as to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process;
When we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights or property, protect your health and safety or the health and safety of others, investigate fraud, or respond to a government request; or
If we participate in a merger, acquisition, or sale of all or a portion of its assets.
Your Privacy Rights
You have certain rights related to the personal information that we process when you use our Sites and Services. Some of these rights only apply in certain circumstances, as set out below.
EEA and UK Data Privacy Laws provide individuals with the following rights:
Right of Access.
You have the right to request access and receive certain information about how we use your personal information and with whom we share it.
Right to Rectification.
You have the right to request correction of your personal information where it is inaccurate or incomplete. We generally recommend first making any changes in your
Account Settings
.
Right to Data Portability.
You have the right to request a copy of your personal information in a structured, machine-readable format and to ask us to share this information with another entity.
Right to Erasure.
You have the right to request deletion of your personal information:
Where you believe that it is no longer necessary for us to hold your personal information;
Where we are processing your personal information based on legitimate interests and you object to such processing and we cannot demonstrate an overriding legitimate ground for the processing;
Where you have provided your personal information to us with your consent and you wish to withdraw your consent and there is no other ground under which we can process your personal information; or
Where you believe your personal information is being unlawfully processed by us.
Right to Restriction of Processing.
You have the right to ask us to stop any active processing of your personal information:
Where you believe your personal information is inaccurate and while we verify accuracy;
Where we want to erase your personal information as the processing is unlawful, but you want us to continue to store it;
Where we no longer need your personal information for our processing, but you require us to retain the data for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims; or
Where you have objected to us processing your personal information based on our legitimate interests and we are considering your objection.
Right to Object.
You can object to our processing of your personal information based on our legitimate interests. We will no longer process your personal information unless we can demonstrate an overriding legitimate purpose.
Objection to Marketing, Automated Decision Making, and Profiling.
You have the right to object to our processing of personal information for marketing communications, automated decision making and profiling. We will stop processing your personal information for that purpose.
Right to Withdraw Consent.
You have the right to withdraw consent where you have provided your consent for us to process your personal information.
Exercising your Rights
You, or an authorized individual acting on your behalf, may submit a verifiable request to exercise your rights relating to the personal information that we process about you.
To exercise the rights above, please complete
this form
.
Depending on the Sites and Services provided, End Users seeking to access, correct, amend, or delete personal information should directly contact the Customer, who has transferred such data to us for processing (data controller), directly to fulfill any requests. If our Customer receives a data subject request and sends the request to us, we will respond to the Customer's request within the agreed timeframe outlined in our Customer agreements. The Customer is responsible for responding to data subject requests as determined under the applicable local data protection laws.
We may need to provide certain identifying information, related to your account (i.e., user ID) or your recent interactions with us to verify your identity, or the identity of any data subject for whom you are requesting information. We cannot respond to your request if we cannot verify your identity and/or authority to make the request on behalf of another and confirm that the personal information relates to you.
We will fulfill your request within 30 days of receipt. Please note that the above rights may be limited in the following situations:
Where fulfilling your request would adversely affect other individuals, company trade secrets or intellectual property;
Where there are overriding public interest reasons; or
Where we are required by law to retain your personal information.
If you have unresolved concerns, we encourage you to come to us in the first instance, but you are entitled to address any grievance directly to the relevant Supervisory Authority. In certain instances, if you are an End User, we encourage you to reach out to the relevant Customer first to address any complaints.
Contact Us
If you have questions or to update or request changes to your personal information, please see
Contact Us
.
Previous Versions
The previous version of our privacy policy can be
found here
.
Sub-policy 5
https://www.twilio.com/en-us/legal/privacy:
Print this page
Customer and Partner Agreements
Terms of Service
Acceptable Use Policy
Service and Country Specific Requirements
Data Protection Addendum (DPA)
Security Overview
Service Level Agreements
Advisory Services Terms
Professional Services Terms
Twilio Marketplace Terms
Twilio Segment Customer Data Platform Destination Integration and Listing Terms
AI/ML Terms
European Electronic Communications Code Rights Waiver
Customer Name Changes and Assignments
Updates to Legal Terms and Conditions
Privacy
Data Privacy at Twilio
Privacy Notice
Binding Corporate Rules
Customer Proprietary Network Information (CPNI)
Sub-processors
GDPR
Customer Data Protection Addendum
Supplier Data Protection Addendum
Global Applicant Privacy Notice
Mobile Application Terms
Twilio Frontline End User App Terms
Twilio Authy App Terms
Supplier Agreements
Supplier Purchase Order Terms and Conditions
Country-Specific Terms
Supplier Data Protection Addendum
Supplier Code of Conduct
Intellectual Property
DMCA Policy
Trademark
Resources for Law Enforcement
Government Requests
Transparency Report
Civil Requests
Submit a request or subpoena
Code of Conduct & Ethics Hotline
Twilio Code of Conduct
Ethics and Whistleblower Hotline
Digital Promotions General Rules
Sweepstakes Rules
Customer Research and User Experience
Acknowledgement and Waiver
Legal Notices for Twilio's Web Site
Impressum (Germany)
Italy ALIAS Database Code of Conduct
Code of Conduct (Italy)
Twilio Privacy Notice
Last Updated
:
February 6, 2025
(View the prior version of our privacy notice
here
An icon of a outbound link arrow
)
Introduction
The Privacy program of Twilio Inc. and its
group companies
(‘Twilio’, ‘we’ or ‘our’) is built on our
Binding Corporate Rules
('BCRs'), which serve as our code of conduct that governs our global processing of personal data.
In order to provide products and services ('Services') to our customers and conduct our day-to-day business operations, including the operation of our websites, we collect, use and share, or otherwise process personal data about our customers, our customers’ authorized users ('end user') and their customers, our website visitors and business contacts.
Personal data
is any information that directly identifies you, such as your name and email address, or that indirectly identifies you, for example a phone number or device identifier.
The personal data we may collect and process about you varies depending on our relationship with you. We may have a direct relationship with you because you have set up an account or consented to receive marketing communications from us, or we may have an indirect relationship with you via your relationship with one of our customers; for example you may be their employee or their customer.
We take privacy, data protection and our legal obligations very seriously. We are committed to being transparent with you about how we use personal data. This Privacy Notice ('Notice') aims to describe our privacy practices in a clear, accessible and easy to understand way and to let you know how you can exercise your rights in relation to your data.
This Notice applies where Twilio processes personal data as a
data controller
, in connection with the Services we provide to our customers and the operation of our business, including our websites.  As a data controller, we determine the purpose (why) and means (how) of personal data processing and are ultimately responsible for the correct handling of your data, in accordance with applicable law.  This Notice describes our general privacy practices. Depending on how you interact with us or the specific services you use, additional privacy notices may apply. These supplemental notices will be provided to you at or before the time we collect your personal data. These supplemental notices should be read together with this Notice and are incorporated by reference.
This Notice
does not apply
to the Personal Data we process in relation to job applicants. This is covered by our
Global Applicant Privacy Notice
.
We also process personal data for most of our Services as a
data processor
. As a data processor, we process personal data related to our customers' employees, end users and customers on behalf of our customers to provide Services to them in accordance with their instructions. These instructions are set out in our customer agreements,
Data Protection Addendum
, service specific terms or through a customer's use or configuration of a product feature.  You should contact these organizations directly for information about how they process your personal data as a
data controller
and to exercise your rights in relation to that data.
Contents of our Privacy Notice
Personal Data We Process
How We Process Personal Data
How We Disclose Personal Data
International Data Transfers
How We Secure Personal Data
How Long We Retain Personal Data
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
How To Exercise Your Rights and Choices
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Children
Automated Decision-Making
How to Contact Us
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
Twilio Product Privacy
Personal Data We Process
The personal data we collect about you depends on your relationship with us and the purposes for which we process that personal data. The following describes the types of personal data that we collected and disclosed for a business purpose in the preceding 12 months.
Personal Data You Share With Us Directly
Contact Information -
When you sign up for a Twilio, Sendgrid or Segment account and use any of our Services, request product information, ask for a call from our sales team, or participate in events, we ask you to provide us with your name, company name, business address, phone number, email address and other contact information. We also ask you to create a password and name your account (or accounts, if you have more than one).
Customer Account Data -
We process certain personal data to manage our relationship with you and administer you or your company’s account. This includes purchase history, names or contact information of individuals authorized to manage the Twilio account on behalf of our customer to set up, access and manage billing. We also collect personal data required to administer use of your account and the Services, and information to allow us to verify your identity for Know Your Customer or other identity verification purposes.
Customer Content -
We receive and store the content of communications received from you or our customers and other personal data uploaded to the Services or generated for our customers’ use as part of the Services, which we may be authorized by you or our customer to use, where necessary for specific legitimate business purposes and in accordance with applicable law.
Marketing and Contact Preferences -
We use information about how you would like to be contacted and choices you have made to send you marketing communications.
Payment Information -
In connection with Services you pay for, we ask you to provide our payment processor with your payment method information like a credit card or your Paypal account and your billing address. Our payment processor, acting on our behalf, gathers this so we can bill you for your use of our Services. Our payment processor will share your billing address with Twilio for this purpose.
Personalization Details -
Some of our products, such as our short code service, may require you to complete an application form by providing details about your or your company’s  intended use of the product to determine eligibility for these products.
Professional Information -
The information we process about you with respect to your employment or profession, including company, job title, email address, phone number and online business networking profile.
Subscriber Records -
For some of our communications products, we may also obtain proof of identity from you or our customer that includes a proof of address, name, physical address, or other identification information. For example, to use our
Trust Hub
or to obtain a phone number in certain countries, local law may require us to have a physical service address on file for the individual who will be using that Twilio number, whether that’s you or our customer's end user.
Support and Feedback -
When you interact with us on our websites including through our AI chatbots (e.g. our Help Center Assistant), over the phone or via email, we process the phone number or email address that you use, the content of your interaction and the feedback you provide about our Services. You may also provide us with feedback about our Services in surveys and questionnaires. We will let you know when a call may be recorded, in accordance with applicable law.
Personal Data We Generate or Collect Automatically
Communications Usage Data -
When you or our customers use Twilio communications products, we collect electronic communications metadata, such as phone numbers and routing information, the source and destination of a communication, location of the device generated in the context of delivering the communication, date, time, duration and type of communication, status of the message, error data and traffic records.
Device Information and IP Addresses -
When you use our account portal, we collect your IP address and device information through tracking technologies like cookies, web beacons, pixels, and similar technologies. We also collect IP addresses when you make requests to our APIs and in our server logs. Additionally, we collect information about your device, such as your computer or mobile device operating system type and version number, manufacturer and model, browser type, screen resolution, unique identifiers, and general location information such as city or town when you use our account portal.
We do not collect precise geolocation information.
Online Activity Information -
When you visit Twilio websites, including our web forms, we use tracking technologies such as cookies, web beacons, and pixels to collect the following data: your device and browser, time zone setting, web pages visited, products you view or search for, page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information, IP address.
Security Identifiers or SIDs -
When you sign up for an account with Twilio, we’ll automatically assign you and each of your accounts a unique security ID and generate an API token for each account. We keep a record of these credentials so we know it is you making the requests when your application makes requests to our API using these credentials.
Customer Proprietary Network Information -
When you use certain US voice-based communications services, Twilio collects information associated with your service usage. This includes information such as the number of phone calls, call destinations, call locations, type, and service configuration, and is known as Customer Proprietary Network Information ('CPNI'). CPNI does not include information such as your name, address, phone number, or the content of phone calls. We use CPNI to market Twilio-related Services to which you are not already subscribed unless you have exercised your right to opt out. For information about your CPNI choices, see the section “
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
” below.
Personal Data Collected From Other Sources
Add-On Service Data -
In the event you purchase our Services through one of our
Add-On Partners
, they may share your personal data with us to fulfill their contractual obligations. Add-On Partners may share your personal data in the form of leads when you download Twilio content on the Add-On Partner’s website or you participate in events and webinars of which Twilio is a sponsor.
Professional Data -
We collect certain personal data such as employment or professional information from sources other than you. We may combine this data with other personal data that you share with us.
Publicly-Available Sources -
We may also use publicly-available information about you that we have gathered through services like LinkedIn, or we may obtain information about you or your company from third party providers, such as your industry, the size of your company, and your company’s website URL.
Social Media Data -
Social media service providers such as Google, LinkedIn, and Meta may provide us with information about you, in accordance with your privacy settings on those sites.
Telecommunication Data -
We receive communication-related data from telecommunications operators, aggregators and carriers that may include phone type, carrier history, SIM status and history, city and/or country where phone was first registered, contract and account type, IP address city and/or country and a validation result of personal data provided by our customer and whether it matches data held by the carrier.
How We Process Personal Data
The purposes for which we process personal depends on your relationship with us. We only use personal data that is necessary to fulfill the specified purposes listed below as applicable to you and in accordance with applicable data protection law.
Purpose
Personal Data Processed
Legal Basis for Processing
Creating and managing accounts, including verification of the identity of our customer’s end user for Know-Your-Customer (KYC) or identity verification purposes.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Online Activity Information
Payment Information
Professional Information
Subscriber Records
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Carrying out Twilio’s core business operations, such as account administration, accounting, auditing and compliance, business analytics, filing taxes, finance, forecasting, consolidated management and reporting, product strategy and revenue planning.
Add-On Service Data
Professional Information
Customer Account Data
Support and Feedback
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Payment Information
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Billing and relationship management.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Communications Usage Data
Payment Information
Legitimate Interest
Providing, optimizing and maintaining our Services and, platform, including debugging and troubleshooting.
Add-On Service Data
Subscriber Records
Online Activity Information
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Preventing, detecting and investigating security incidents and managing the security of Twilio’s platform, services, websites and accounts.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Online Activity Information
Payment Information
Subscriber Records
Telecommunication Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Preventing, detecting, or investigating abuse or misuse of Twilio’s platform or Services , including spam, fraud, illegal activities, or violations of the
Twilio Acceptable Use Policy
,
or assisting telecommunications service providers, regulators, or law enforcement agencies with combating spam, fraud, or illegal activities.
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Customer Account Data
Contact Information
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Telecommunications Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Determining eligibility for certain Services.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Payment Information
Personalization Details
Subscriber Records
Legitimate Interest
For routing and connectivity purposes to send messages on behalf of our customers, including transmitting, distributing and exchanging communications using phone numbers, either through the public switched telephone network or other communications networks.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Legitimate Interest
Providing customer support, including responding to your requests and communicating with you about your account and use of the services, including suspicious activity or security alerts.
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Professional Information
Support and Feedback
Security Identifier
Other personal data provided by requestor
Legitimate interest
Sending important notifications about our Services.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Legitimate Interest
Complying with legal and regulatory obligations, telecommunication service provider requirements and communications industry codes of practice.
Subscriber Records
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Customer Account Data
Legitimate Interest
Sending marketing communications in accordance with your marketing preferences.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Analyzing your interest in our Services and delivering marketing campaigns that are relevant to you.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Deploying cookies and other tracking technologies in accordance with your online settings.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Understanding how visitors navigate our websites, and tracking and optimizing the performance of our advertising activities.
Device Information
Online Activity Information
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Understanding how customers are using our platform and improving the website navigation experience.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Online Activity Information
Professional Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Conducting questionnaires and surveys to improve our Services and provide training to our employees.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Personalization Details
Professional Data
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Managing your participation in our events and webinars and granting you access to whitepapers and on-demand resources.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Collecting sales insights and performing lead scoring.
Contact Information
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Developing our business by updating, expanding, and analyzing our customer relationship records.
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Payment Information
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Identifying potential job candidates.
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Developing or improving our Services, including anonymizing, de-identifying, pseudonymizing and aggregating personal data for this purpose.
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Customer Account Data
Personalization Details
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
As otherwise authorized by you or our customer in Service specific terms or through your or our customer’s use and configuration of features in a product.
Data used will vary based on customer authorization
Legitimate Interest
Protecting the health and safety of our employees, visitors and our properties.
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Legal Obligation
Protecting the rights and freedoms of individuals, meeting legal or regulatory obligations, including complying with valid court orders, disclosure requests, subpoenas, and other appropriate legal mechanisms.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Online Activity Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Payment Information
Subscriber Records
Telecommunication Data
Security Identifier
Legal Obligation
Legitimate Interest
How We Disclose Personal Data
We disclose personal data to third parties in limited circumstances in order to provide the Services and to otherwise run our business. Below are the different scenarios under which we may disclose your data to third parties.
Telecommunications Service Providers
Twilio’s communications products provide an easier way for developers to build applications that make use of the publicly switched telephone network ('PSTN') to send communications. Therefore, we engage with a global network of telecommunications operators, aggregators, carriers and other communication service providers (collectively, “telecommunications service providers”) as necessary to route and connect those communications from the sender to the intended recipient. How telecommunications service providers handle this data is generally determined by their own policies and local regulations.
Where telecommunications service providers transmit the content of a communication, they function neither as data controllers nor data processors, instead they act simply as a conduit to transmit communication content. In the event telecommunications services providers process any personal data for their own purposes such as communications metadata required to transmit the message, or for billing or fraud prevention purposes, they also act as data controllers.
We may have to share Subscriber Records with local government authorities or local telecommunications carriers that provide connectivity services. However, we don’t share subscriber records for purposes other than this, and we treat these records with our highest confidentiality.
Other Communications Service Providers
For proper routing and connectivity, Twilio also enables sending or receiving communications through communications service providers that do not use the PSTN, these are referred to as Over-the-Top ('OTT') communications service providers. If you or our customer chooses to use Twilio to send or receive communications by way of these providers, Twilio will disclose communications content and other data to these providers as necessary to route and connect those communications from the sender to the intended recipient. How those OTT communications service providers, as data controllers, handle this data is determined by their own policies and local regulations.
Third Party Service Providers
Twilio engages third-party vendors and service providers to carry out certain personal data processing functions on our behalf. These providers are limited to only accessing or using personal data to provide services to us and must provide reasonable assurances they will appropriately safeguard the data.
Add-On Partners
Add-ons are additional features, functionality or services offered by Twilio’s Add-on partners (who are third parties not affiliated with Twilio). Twilio may make Add-ons available through the Twilio Marketplace. Some Add-ons may need to access or collect some of your information, including personal data. If you choose to use an Add-on, Twilio will disclose your information to the Add-on partner so you can use the Add-on. Twilio does not control Add-on partners’ use of your information and their use of your information will be in accordance with their own policies. If you do not want your information to be disclosed to an Add-on partner, then you should not use the Add-on.
Twilio Group Members
We may disclose your personal data among Twilio Group Members. Twilio Group Members will only use the information as described in this Notice. Twilio Group Members are listed in Appendix 1 in our
Binding Corporate Rules
.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
We may disclose your personal data to a third party if:
If we reasonably believe that disclosure is compelled by applicable law, regulation, legal process, or a government request (including to meet national security, emergency services, or law enforcement requirements);
to enforce our agreements and policies;
to protect the security or integrity of our Services;
to protect ourselves, our other customers, or the public from harm or illegal activities, including security threats, spam and fraud; or
to respond to an emergency which we believe in good faith requires us to disclose data to assist in preventing a death or serious bodily injury.
For more details, please see the procedure laid out in our
Binding Corporate Rules
.
If Twilio is required by law to disclose any personal data about you, we will notify you or our customers of the disclosure requirement to the extent legally permitted and where Twilio determines such disclosure will not interfere with an ongoing investigation. Further, we object to information requests we do not believe were issued properly.
Business Transfers
In connection with a corporate sale, merger, reorganization, dissolution or similar event, personal data about you may be part of the assets transferred or disclosed in connection with the due diligence for any such transaction. If required by law, we will notify you prior to such a transfer and provide you with information about any choices you may have with respect to your personal data.
Aggregated, Anonymized or De-identified Data
Aggregated, anonymized and de-identified data may be derived by Twilio from your personal data but is generally not considered personal data under data protection law as this data does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. We may use and disclose de-identified, anonymized or aggregated data to third parties. We do not disaggregate or reidentify de-identified data.
International Data Transfers
As a global organization, we may need to transfer your personal data to Twilio affiliates, contractors, service providers and third parties in various countries and jurisdictions around the world. When we transfer your personal data, we take care to use appropriate safeguards to ensure your personal data remains protected.
Data Transfers to the United States and Elsewhere
When you use our account portal, or our other Services, your personal data may be transferred to the United States, where our primary processing facilities are located, and possibly to other countries where we or our service providers operate.
Safeguards for Data Transfers
Twilio employs appropriate safeguards for cross-border transfers of personal data, as required by applicable local law.
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF“)
As set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce Twilio is officially certified under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF and relies on these certifications as its primary transfer mechanisms for transfers of personal data from the EU and Switzerland to the U.S. Twilio adheres to the DPF principles for onward transfers of personal data to third parties and remains liable for damages caused by third parties under the DPF unless Twilio did not cause the event giving rise to damage. The U.S. Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Twilio’s compliance with the DPF. To learn more about the DPF Program, and to view our certifications, please visit the
DPF website
.
Twilio’s Binding Corporate Rules
Twilio has established and implemented a set of
Binding Corporate Rules
for internal transfers of personal data between Twilio Group Members in the European Union and Twilio Group Members elsewhere as a data controller. Twilio’s BCRs have been approved by European Union Data Protection Authorities and are a commitment by Twilio to adequately protect personal data that Twilio processes regardless of where the information resides. You can access Twilio’s BCR-Controller Policy
here
.
Where neither the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Swiss-EU DPF nor Twilio's BCRs apply, we rely instead on other data transfer mechanisms to transfer personal data outside the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, such as Standard Contractual Clauses and the UK’s International Data Transfer Agreement.
APEC CBPR & PRP Participation
Twilio’s privacy practices, described in this Notice, comply with the APEC Cross Border Privacy Rules (“CBPR”) and Privacy Recognition for Processors (“PRP”) Systems. The APEC, CBPR and PRP systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating APEC economies. More information about the APEC framework can be found
here
.
How We Secure Personal Data
To protect personal data from loss, or unauthorized use, access or disclosure, Twilio uses reasonable and appropriate security measures designed to protect the security of your personal data both online and offline. These measures vary based on the sensitivity of the personal data we collect, process and store and the current state of technology.  All systems used to support our business are governed by Twilio’s Information Security Policy and Standards which are built on industry standards and best practices such as the ISO 27001 and NIST standards. More information about our security measures can be found in our
Security Overview
.
How Long We Retain Personal Data
We endeavor not to retain personal data in a form which permits identification of individuals for longer than is necessary for the purposes for which that data is processed. We retain personal data in accordance with Twilio's record retention policies and guidelines as revised and updated from time to time.
Twilio will store your Customer Account Data as long as needed to provide you or our customer with the Services and to operate our business. If you ask Twilio to delete specific personal data from your Customer Account Data (see ‘
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
’ below), we will honor this request, unless deleting that information prevents us from carrying out necessary business functions, such as billing for our services, calculating taxes, or conducting required audits.
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
Depending on the data protection laws applicable to you, you may have the following rights in relation to your personal data that we process as a data controller:
that we provide details about the categories of personal data that we collect about you, including how we collect and share it;
that we provide you access to, and a copy of, the personal data we collect about you;
that we update or correct any inaccurate personal data we have about you;
that we delete the personal data we have about you;
that we restrict processing of personal data about you;
that we provide you with your personal data in a structured, commonly used format and to transmit that information to another controller, and where feasible, transmit the information directly;
that we provide you with the right to object to the processing of personal data, including profiling;
that we provide you with a free, easy mechanism to object to use of your personal information for direct marketing purposes;
that you not be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, that produces legal effects or similarly affects your individual rights;
to withdraw your consent; and
to complain to a competent supervisory authority and/or to commence proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction.
Twilio will honor your rights subject to limitations in certain situations, such as where Twilio can demonstrate that it has a legal requirement or legitimate interest to process your data or can legitimately apply an exemption to the exercise of a right under applicable law. More information about these rights can be found in our Binding Corporate Rules Controller Policy
Rule 10
and
Appendix 3
.
If you are a
US resident
interested in what personal data we have disclosed lately for our business purposes, here’s a list:
Identifiers
Commercial information
Financial information
Internet or other electronic activity information
Geolocation information
Professional or employment information
By “our business purposes,” we mean that we only disclose personal data as we describe in the section "
How We Disclose Personal Data
" above.  Also, as described in the “How We Use Cookies & Other Tracking technologies” section below, we process personal data to deliver ads targeted to your interests on other companies’ websites and mobile apps. Some of these activities may be considered “sharing” or “targeted advertising” under certain laws. You have the right to opt out of the processing of your personal data for targeted advertising, and can do so by adjusting your preferences using our Cookie Preferences Tool located on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting. Any choices concerning cookies are browser and/or device specific. If you clear your cookies from your browser on any of your devices, your choices will need to be reset.
You also have the right to request the restriction of processing of your sensitive personal information. Where applicable, the respective sensitive personal information will be marked accordingly and may only be processed by us for certain purposes. At the current time, however, we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those expressed in this Privacy Notice or otherwise permitted by applicable law, and these uses cannot be limited under California law.
You may have additional rights under our
Binding Corporate Rules
in the EU. For example, where you believe your personal data has been transferred by an EU-based Twilio company to our US headquarters and processed by the US company in breach of the Binding Corporate Rules, you may have a right to:
Lodge a complaint with the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe;
Lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority in the same country as the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe; and
Bring a court action against the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe.
If Twilio processes your personal data as a data processor on behalf of a customer, we will either direct you to contact our customer to exercise your rights.
How To Exercise Your Rights and Choices
The following sections provide information about how to exercise certain rights in relation to your personal data. To exercise any other rights, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
.
Accessing and Controlling Account Data
As part of our Services, we provide you with a number of self-service features at no additional cost within the Twilio console itself, including the ability to access your data, update any incorrect data, download a copy of your data, delete your data, or restrict the use of your data. You can make various choices about your Customer Account Data through the account portal when you log into your Twilio account or through the marketing preferences center. Any other requests about your data you cannot make through these self-service tools, you can request by contacting
Customer Support
.
Closing Your Account and Deletion
To request closure or deletion of your Twilio account, you can contact
Customer Support
. Please be aware that closure or deletion of your Twilio account will result in you permanently losing access to your account and the data in the account. After closure of your account, certain information associated with your account may remain on Twilio’s servers in an aggregated form that does not identify you. Similarly, after you close your account, we will retain data — including personal data — associated with your account that we are required to maintain for legal purposes or for necessary business operations (see “
How Long We Retain Personal  Data
” section above) until it’s no longer needed.
Identity Verification
In some instances, we will need to verify your identity before honoring your request. We will generally verify your identity by asking you to provide personal data related to your recent interactions with us. Thereafter, we will process your request and inform you of any decisions we have made about your request.  Additionally, you may exercise your privacy rights through an authorized agent. If we receive your request from an authorized agent, we may ask for evidence that you have provided such agent with a power of attorney or that the agent otherwise has valid written authority to submit requests to exercise rights on your behalf. If you are an authorized agent seeking to make a request, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
.
We won’t discriminate against you or change the price of our services if you make a request, but if you ask us to delete your data, it may affect your ability to use our Services.
Customer Proprietary Network Information (CPNI)
As an individual Twilio account holder or as an authorized representative of a Twilio customer in the US, you have the right to restrict Twilio’s use of
CPNI
. To opt-out of the use of CPNI data related to your Twilio account to market other Twilio Services based on your usage of our Services, click
here
.  Please note that, if you have subscribed for the services on behalf of an organization, the CPNI relates to the service usage by that organization and not you individually. Opting-out of the use of CPNI for marketing will not unsubscribe you from other types of marketing contacts from Twilio and will not affect the status of the services you currently have with us. Your approval or opt-out of the use of your CPNI outside of the services to which you are already subscribed is valid until you affirmatively revoke or limit such approval.
Communication Preferences
You can opt out of receiving marketing communications from us at any time through your marketing preferences page by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of any marketing email you receive from Twilio. You can also
update your communication preferences
using our online form or contact our
Customer Support
Team to communicate your choice to opt out. Please note that it may take up to three days to remove your contact information from our marketing communications lists, so you may receive correspondence from us for a short time after you make your request. You will not be able to opt out of service emails from us, such as password reset emails, billing emails, or notifications of updates to our terms, unless you deactivate your account.
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Twilio uses common information gathering tools such as cookies, web beacons, pixels and other similar tracking technologies to automatically collect information as you navigate our websites, your account or when you interact with emails we send to you.
Cookies
A cookie is a small text file that is stored in your browser or elsewhere on your hard drive. Cookies allow Twilio to identify your device as you navigate our websites or your account. This makes navigating and interacting with our websites or your account more efficient, easy and meaningful for you.
Twilio uses both session and persistent cookies. Session cookies are cookies that disappear from your computer or browser when you turn off your computer. Persistent cookies stay on your computer even after you’ve turned it off.
The cookies on our websites fall into three categories: (1) Required Cookies, (2) Functional Cookies, and (3) Advertising Cookies. To learn more about each category of cookie, you can visit our cookie consent tool by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting.
Manage Your Cookie Preferences
Twilio uses a cookie consent tool, which you can utilize to customize your cookie preferences. When you visit our website for the first time, a cookie consent banner will pop up and ask you to customize your cookie preferences. If you decide to change your preferences at a later date, you can easily do so by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting. Please note that Required Cookies cannot be disabled and if you decide to opt-out of Functional Cookies, certain functionality of our websites or your account may be impacted.  Any choices concerning cookies are browser and/or device specific. If you clear your cookies from your browser on any of your devices, your choices will need to be reset.
Manage Cookies Using Your Browser
In addition to using our Cookie Consent tool, you can use your browser settings to opt out of Functional Cookies and Advertising Cookies. For more information on how to do that, click
here
. To manage privacy and storage settings for cookies, click
here
.
Universal Opt-Out Mechanisms
Global Privacy Control (GPC) and Do Not Track (DNT) are tools that you can use to inform websites of your privacy preferences in regard to ad trackers. To set up GPC, you can visit the
Global Privacy Control
page. To set DNT, you can visit the
All About DNT
page. Please note that this may impact the functionality of our websites or your account.
Opt Out of Advertising Cookies
To learn more about how to opt out of targeting and advertising cookies, you can go to the
Your Online Choices
page, the
Network Advertising Initiative
page, and the
Digital Advertising Alliance’s Consumer Choice
page. These opt-out tools are provided by third parties, not Twilio. We do not control or operate these tools or the choices that advertisers and others provide through these tools.
Web Beacons
Twilio also uses web beacons to gather data about your use of our websites, your account, and how you interact with emails we have sent to you. Web beacons are clear electronic images that can recognize certain types of data on your computer, like when you view a particular website tied to the web beacon, and a description of a website tied to the web beacon. Additionally, we may put web beacons in marketing emails that notify us when you click on a link in the email that directs you to a Twilio website.
Children
Our Services are not directed to or intended to be used by children (under the age of 13 in the US and UK, or 16 in the EEA). We do not knowingly permit children to sign up for a Twilio account. If we become aware that a child has signed up for an account, we will take reasonable steps to deactivate the account and remove their personal data from our records as quickly as possible. If you believe an underage person has signed up for a Twilio account, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
with the subject line “Children”.
Automated Decision Making
Automated decision-making occurs when an electronic system uses personal data to make a decision about you, without human involvement. Twilio uses automated decision-making leveraging a variety of signals derived from records we collect or obtain from third party vendors, to help monitor, identify, and suspend accounts sending spam or engaging in other abusive or fraudulent activity.  We may also use this information to evaluate your account application and make decisions about whether to approve or decline. If your account is suspended or not approved under these circumstances you will be notified and given an opportunity to request human review of the decision.
We may rely on other automated decision-making where:
We have notified you of the decision and provided you with the opportunity to request a human review of the decision
It is necessary to perform a contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
We have your consent and we have put in place appropriate measures to safeguard your rights
How to Contact Us
If you have any questions, concerns or complaints about this Notice or our data protection practices, please do not hesitate to contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing us at
privacy@twilio.com
or by writing to us at any of the following addresses:
Worldwide Headquarters
Twilio Inc.
101 Spear Street, 5th Floor
San Francisco CA 94105
EEA Headquarters
Twilio Ireland Limited
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay
Dublin 2
D02 R296, Ireland
Complaints
We will endeavor to resolve questions, concerns or complaints you raise with us in accordance with our
Complaints Handling Procedure
. In the unlikely event that we are unable to resolve your concern, you can find information about your options to seek assistance through independent dispute resolution mechanisms or complaints to your local data protection authority
here
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Twilio commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States, the European Union, the United Kingdom, and/or Switzerland. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance that are not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms. You can find more information in the DPF
ANNEX-I-introduction.
If your question or complaint relates to personal data we process as a data processor on behalf of a customer, we will direct you to contact our customer to address your question or complaint.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
We will periodically review this Notice and may change it to address legal, technical or business development requirements or make clarifications. When we change this Notice, the most current version will be available at
https://www/twilio.com/legal/privacy
with the date indicating when it was last updated. If we make material changes that affect your rights, we will provide you with advance notice, such as by posting a message in the Twilio console or sending an email to the address we have on file for you. We will comply with applicable law with respect to any changes we make to this Notice. We will also seek your consent to material changes, where required by applicable law.
Twilio Product Privacy
Twilio offers a range of industry-leading communications and customer data platform services to our customers. Depending on the Service, Twilio may be a data controller and data processor of personal data used to provide the Services.
Twilio processes personal data (Communications Usage Data and Customer Content) for most of our Services as a data processor acting on the instruction of our customer and in accordance with the terms of our agreement with a customer, our
Data Protection Addendum
, and service specific terms. Our Services provide customers with ways to control, access and secure their data.
We also offer customers the ability to store, delete, access, or exercise other choices about their personal data. The ability to make these choices depends on the Service being used and how it is being used by a customer. Customers are referred to our
API docs
for each of our Services, along with SendGrid’s
documentation
and Segment’s
documentation
to find more detailed information about managing personal data collected and stored in connection with their use of our Services. We also provide an overview of our retention and deletion practices, including how to delete data you control in our
support documentation
. We provide information about the security measures we use to protect our customer’s data  in our
Security Overview
, and if you are located in a country that requires you to obtain information about our supplemental measures, you may read more about those measures
here
.
For some of the Services we also act as a data controller where disclosed and agreed to by our customer in the agreement, Data Protection Addendum, product specific terms or via the customers’ use and configuration of a product or feature.As a data controller, Twilio is responsible for the processing of the personal data.
For more detail on our Services, please find information below or by visiting our
products page
.
Authy
The Authy service is our standalone two-factor authentication (2FA) service for desktop and mobile. The Authy apps generate one time passwords and push notifications that can be used as a part of a two-step verification process with your Authy-compatible accounts to add another layer of security. Authy’s 2FA can be used on its own or with applications that directly integrate with Authy’s 2-factor authentication API.
Due to the nature of the Authy service, Twilio collects the following additional personal data elements to our other Services:
Identifiers
Once you open the Authy app, we ask you to provide us with a phone number to create your Authy account. We send a verification code to that phone number to be sure that the person creating the Authy account also has control over the phone number entered. This phone number is considered your “primary device,” and will be the identifier for your Authy account. We use that phone number to identify you, to provide you 2FA services, and to maintain logs for security and anti-fraud purposes. We also collect your email address, and we use it for identity verification and account recovery purposes.
Device Information
When you download and open the Authy desktop or mobile app, we automatically collect information about the type of device you have downloaded the app on and your device identifier. We collect this to ensure we deliver the right version of the app for your device and so that we can provide appropriate follow up support as necessary. We also use your device information to ensure proper delivery of our service and to provide and deliver support and maintenance of the Authy app.
Login History and Authy Account History
When you use an Authy token to log into an account, whether the token was generated on the app or one sent to you via your phone number, we collect and keep information associated with your login activity including information like your IP address, what application you logged in to, that you logged in, and when. If you change your phone number or email associated with your Authy account, we will also keep a log of that. We collect this information to monitor for suspicious activity and also as another piece of information that could be used to verify your identity if we suspect your account may be compromised.
Geolocation information
If you have location services turned on, we collect your location based on your IP address. We use this information for anti-fraud purposes, to check for suspicious activity and as another piece of information we can use to verify your identity if we suspect your account may be compromised.
Frontline Services
To use the Frontline services, you must log in to the Frontline app using a third party account (through your Single Sign-On provider). The authentication of your login details is handled by that third party and we only collect the information you expressly agree to share with us at the time you give permission to link the Frontline app with the third party account. We only gather the information you and our customers give us access to, and we only use it for the purposes for which you and our customers have provided it to us. Please see the
Frontline App Terms
for specific details about your relationship with us.
SendGrid Services
The SendGrid services also collect additional data in the form of web beacons placed in the body of emails delivered using the SendGrid platform. This allows us to keep track of whether or not an email has been delivered, opened, clicked on, whether it bounced or was treated as spam. You can learn more about web beacons in the section titled “
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
” above.
Voice Intelligence
Voice Intelligence incorporates artificial intelligence and machine learning to transcribe and analyze voice calls into a structured format that allows our customers to drive their business processes. To translate voice calls into structured content, Twilio processes certain data as a controller, including personal data contained in voice calls disclosed to us by our customer through their use of the service.
Sub-policy 6
https://uk.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/privacy/:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
1. Introduction
2. Personal Data we collect and the sources
3. How we use the Personal Data we collect
4. How we share or disclose Personal Data
5. Data Retention
6. Personalized marketing and cookies
7. Security
8. Minors
9. Data Transfers
10. Who is my data controller?
11. Your rights
12. Changes to our Privacy Notice
13. Information specific to other services
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
Privacy Notice
Versions:
December 5, 2024 (current)
November 7, 2024
July 15, 2024
February 15, 2024
November 1, 2023
September 22, 2023
August 1, 2023
June 15, 2023
October 10, 2022
August 16, 2021
July 1, 2021
November 2, 2020
August 6, 2020
July 7, 2020
November 20, 2019
September 26, 2019
January 2, 2019
April 11, 2018
LAST UPDATED: December 5, 2024
1. Introduction
1.1 Scope
This Privacy Notice applies to all the products, services, websites and apps offered by  SurveyMonkey Inc., SurveyMonkey Europe UC, SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Ltda., SurveyMonkey Netherlands B.V., and other SurveyMonkey affiliates (collectively “SurveyMonkey”), except where otherwise noted. The services include SurveyMonkey, SurveyMonkey Apply, SurveyMonkey Audience, SurveyMonkey Rewards, SurveyMonkey Contribute, Wufoo, TechValidate, GetFeedback Direct, and GetFeedback Digital. We refer to those products, services, websites, and apps collectively as the “services” in this Privacy Notice. Unless otherwise noted in your contract, our services are provided by SurveyMonkey Inc. inside of the United States, by SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Ltda. inside of Brazil, and by SurveyMonkey Europe UC everywhere else.
US residents: Please visit our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
for more information on our privacy practices specific to individual states.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees or job applicants in their capacity as employees or candidates. Employees and candidates should refer to our Employee Privacy Notice or
Candidate Privacy Notice
, respectively.
1.2
Quick Links
If you want to identify your data controller please see the “
Who is my data controller?
” section below.
For a quick snapshot of how SurveyMonkey treats personal information see our
Privacy Basics
.
2. Personal Data we collect and the sources
2.1 What do we mean by 'Personal Data'?
References in this Privacy Notice to data, personal information, or information, are all references to Personal Data. Personal Data means information relating to a living individual (a "Data Subject") who is, or can be, reasonably identified from the information, either alone or in conjunction with other information.
2.2 Who do we collect data about?
We group consumers or businesses into the following categories:
Creator
: the business or consumer that holds an account within a SurveyMonkey service that either directly creates surveys, forms, applications, or questionnaires or that can collaborate, commenting, or review surveys, forms, applications, or questionnaires within an account.
Respondent
: the individual that receives a survey, form, application, or questionnaire powered by a SurveyMonkey service.
Panelist
: the individual that uses Contribute or Rewards to take surveys sent by SurveyMonkey on behalf of Creators, or an individual that receives surveys through a third party panel provider. Privacy information specific to panelists can be found in our
Contribute Privacy Notice
,
Rewards Privacy Notice
, and
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
.
Visitor
: you are just visiting one of our websites because you are curious,  have been invited to review a survey as a guest, or you have heard about us from our marketing and sales channels!
2.3 Types of Personal Data We Collect
(a) Contact information.
You might provide us with your contact information (for example: name or email address), whether through use of our services, a form on our website, an interaction with our sales or customer support team, or a response to one of SurveyMonkey’s own surveys or forms.
(b) Cookie information.
We use first party and third party cookies and tracking services that employ cookies and page tags (also known as
web beacons
) to collect data about visitors to our websites. This data includes usage and user statistics. Emails sent by SurveyMonkey or by users through our services also include page tags that allow the sender to collect information about who opened those emails and clicked on links in them. We provide more information on cookies in our
Cookies Notice.
(c) Customer support information.
We collect information submitted through our Customer Support portal, such as name, email, and message text. We also record the content of Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales calls.
(d) Usage information.
We collect usage information about you whenever you interact with our websites and services. This includes which webpages you visit, what you click on, when you perform those actions, what language preference you have, what you buy and so on.
(e) Device and browser data.
We collect information from the device and application you use to access our services. Device data mainly means your IP address, operating system version, device type, device ID/MAC address, system and performance information, browser type, and other device, network and browser signals. If you are on a mobile device we also collect the UUID for that device. We also infer your geographic location based on your IP address.
(f) Event data.
Like most websites today, our web servers keep log files that record data each time a device accesses those servers. The log files contain data about the nature of each access, including originating IP addresses, internet service providers, the files viewed on our site (e.g., HTML pages, graphics, etc.), operating system versions, device type and timestamps.
(g) Referral information.
If you arrive at a SurveyMonkey website from an external source (such as a link on another website or in an email) or have been invited to review a survey as a guest, we record information about the source that referred you to us.
(h) Integration data.
We collect information from third parties with whom SurveyMonkey enables integrations in order to allow you to use both services.
(i) Account information.
Registration information.
You need a SurveyMonkey account before you can use SurveyMonkey services. When you register for an account, we collect your first and last name, username, password and email address.
Billing information.
If you make a payment to SurveyMonkey, we require you to provide your billing details, a name, address, email address and financial information corresponding to your selected method of payment (e.g., a credit card number and expiration date or a bank account number). If you provide a billing address, we will regard that as the location of the account holder to determine the SurveyMonkey entity with whom you contract and the sales tax, if applicable, to be applied to your purchase.
Account settings.
You can set various preferences and personal details on pages like your
account settings page
(or on your account settings page for our other products as applicable). These may include, for example, your default language, time zone and communication preferences (e.g., opting in or out of receiving marketing communications from SurveyMonkey).
(j) Address book information.
We may allow you to import email addresses and other contact information into an
Address Book
so you can easily invite people to take your surveys or fill in your form via our collectors. We do not use this data for our own purposes or to contact anyone, except at your direction.
(k) Survey/form/application data.
We store your survey/form/application data (questions and responses) for you and provide analysis tools for you to use with respect to this data.
(l) First party profile information.
When you sign up for our services you are asked to provide us with information about yourself and to give us more detailed insights into who you are. If you are in a SurveyMonkey Enterprise account this may include providing your photo so your administrator(s) and colleagues can identify you.
(m) Third party profile information.
We may combine information about you from third party sources (such as LinkedIn, ZoomInfo, and other data brokers) with information we hold about you to create a user profile.
3. How we use the Personal Data we collect
3.1 Creator
We process Personal Data about you as a Creator where:
You have consented;
We need to
f
ulfill our contractual responsibility;
We have a legitimate interes
t; and
We have a legal obligation.
3.1.1
Consent
We rely on your consent to process the following data elements:
(a)
Cookies and similar technology.
We or third party data and advertising platforms that we work with collect data from and advertising cookies, page tags, mobile identifiers and IP addresses. We use this data to infer users’ common identities across different services and multiple devices. We may do so, for instance, to tailor ads, personalize marketing, to enable us to determine the success of our advertising campaigns and to improve upon them. You can withdraw your consent at any time.
These third party data and advertising platforms may sometimes use data that we provide to them in order to improve their technologies and their ability to match common devices to users.
To learn more about interest-based advertising and how to opt-out of it, please see our
Cookies Notice
in Section 6. By clearing your cookies in your browser settings, you will no longer see personalized messages in this way but you continue to see ads over the internet that are not based on the information you provided to SurveyMonkey. Depending on your geographic location you can also withdraw your consent using our in-product cookie management tools.
(b) Contact information.
We use contact information to respond to your inquiries, send you information as part of the services, and send you marketing information. In jurisdictions where opt-in is required, we will only send you marketing materials based on your consent.
3.1.2
Contract
We collect and use the following data elements on the basis that we have to use this information in order to fulfill our contract with you:
(a) Account information.
We need to use your account information to run your account, provide you with services, bill you for our services, resolve disputes such as chargebacks and refund requests, provide you with customer support, and contact you or your organization about your service or account. These communications are of a transactional nature (e.g., service-related announcements, billing-related matters, changes to our services or policies, a welcome email when you first register). You cannot opt out of these communications since they are required to provide our services to you.
We may also use billing information in aggregate to adjust or manage pricing at the individual level or across all service users.
(b) Customer support information.
We will use information submitted through our Customer Support emails, chats, or phone calls, such as name, email, and message content, in order to provide you with customer support.
(c) Usage information.
We use data about how you use our services and how our services are performing to ensure that we’re meeting our service-level agreements (SLAs) or other contractual obligations to you.
(d) Device and browser data.
We use device data both to troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it. We will also use this data to facilitate account verification and sign in and to enforce our password sharing and security policies. We collect this to help us improve your service experience through a specific device/browser by optimizing how the website looks in a particular browser, how your screen brightness affects your experience and to ensure the service operates optimally and as it should on different devices and browsers.
(e) Integration data.
We collect and use information from third parties and integration partners, where applicable to one of our services, to:
Ensure you can sign-up to our service from a third party integration like Facebook/LinkedIn/Microsoft/Google/SSO;
Ensure you can use our service in conjunction with other services.
See further information
here
on our API partners – for other SurveyMonkey services see below or on the website for that service.
(f) Survey questions and survey responses.
We use machine learning techniques on survey data in order to provide users with useful statistics and more relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services. For example, if you have used open text questions in a survey, our machine learning may provide you with useful insights into sentiment and/or the trends in responses to that question in our Analyze survey tool. You have a choice as regards whether or not to use some of these features. For further information see our Respondent Section.
(g) Aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses.
We use aggregated or de-identified information to provide users with useful benchmarking statistics and more relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services.
We also use this data to enforce our agreements, where applicable.
3.1.3
Legitimate interests
We process your personal information in the following categories of data for legitimate interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Contact information.
Where consent is not required, we use contact information to send you marketing information based on our legitimate interests for as long as you do not opt out. You can opt out of marketing communications at any time by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link in emails or changing the relevant setting on your
My Account
page.
(b) Customer support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support for you. This data is de-identified where possible.
(c) Usage information.
We use information about how you use our services to improve our services for you and all users and to make recommendations to you and your organization about our other services.
For example: We collect information about the types of surveys/forms/applications you create (e.g., HR surveys), the types of plans you purchase and your account transactional behavior to build a profile about you so as to help direct you and your organization to other relevant features and services we offer and to optimize user experience, for example by making recommendations to you or your organization.
We may also use usage information such as levels and nature of activity in your account and number of responses you are receiving to personalize the features and services we highlight for you and your organization in our Sites, improve user experience and to make recommendations to you and your organization about our services through our sales and marketing efforts.
(d) Event data.
We use events contained in log data for many different business purposes to include:
To create new services, features, content or make recommendations.
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services.
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
To investigate security issues.
For example: Your IP address is used to determine where an unknown/unauthorized access may have occurred in your account (abuse monitoring).
(e) First party information.
We process other aspects of your account information (like the personal information you provide about your job, your job title, and your marketing preferences) as well as information obtained from public sources, to provide you with a personalized experience and relevant and useful marketing information as well as to make other product, feature and service recommendations to you and your organization to optimize the use of the services we offer (where permitted by law).
You can object to us using your information as described above but in some cases, our ability to fully and properly provide our services to you may be impacted if you do not want us to collect or use the above data. Furthermore, if you are a SurveyMonkey Enterprise account holder, your organization controls some of the data which you include in your profile and they can also edit or remove that information through the primary administrator(s) of that account.
(f) Third party information.
We combine information about you from third party sources (such as LinkedIn and ZoomInfo) with information we hold about you to create a user profile, which will help us to make our sales and marketing efforts more relevant to you and to personalize and improve your service experience.
(g) Referral information.
We use referral information to track the success of our integrations and referral processes.
(h) End page data.
If you use our survey tool, depending on the package you are on and the settings you have selected, your Respondents may reach the standard
survey end page
on completion of a survey. The end page is part of the SurveyMonkey website. We may include our own
research surveys
and polling on this end page. These surveys are optional for any Respondent to take or skip.
(i) De-identified Device Data.
We use aggregated or de-identified Device Data to extract usage patterns and to improve our services.
(j) De-identified Survey Data.
We use machine learning techniques on aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses to understand usage and improve our services.
3.1.4
Legal obligation.
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to use and disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use usage data, event data, and aggregated or (where possible) de-identified survey questions and responses:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To investigate security issues;
To prevent or address potentially unlawful activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity. For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
3.2 Respondent
We process Personal Data about you as a Respondent where:
We need to fulfill our contractual responsibility to deliver the services to the Creator of the survey;
We have a legitimate interest; and
We have a legal obligation.
3.2.1
Contract
(a) Contact information.
We only use contact information to respond to an inquiry on behalf of a Customer if you, as a Respondent, contact us.
(b) Cookies.
We use required cookies to ensure the operation of a Creator’s survey, form, application, or other SurveyMonkey product. These cookies are used to ensure that all aspects of the survey operate appropriately and optimally. For more information please read our
Cookies section below
and our
Respondent Cookies Notice
.
Examples: We use page tags to allow the email sender (for a survey or form for example) to measure the performance of email messaging and to learn how to improve email deliverability and open rates. We also use cookies to ensure a respondent can only take a survey once (where the Creator has set this function) and to track completion rates of surveys.
After completion of a survey, in most cases, you will be redirected to our website and treated as a website visitor where other cookies may be used so you should read our Website Visitor section if this is of interest to you.
(c) Device and browser data.
We use device data both to troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it.
We use your device and browser data to provide our services to the Creator. For example: your IP address is used to ensure that you do not complete the same survey, form, application or questionnaire twice if the creator has included settings to avoid this (ballot stuffing).
(d) Inferred geographic location.
We also may infer your geographic location based on your IP address. This allows Creators to filter responses by inferred geographic location. Note: we do not collect precise (GPS) location.
(e) Event data.
We use event data for many different business purposes including the following:
To create and improve services, features, content or make recommendations;
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services; and
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
(f) Third parties and integration data.
We will collect and use information from third parties and integration partners to facilitate Creators in sending surveys/forms/applications/questionnaires to you.
(g) Survey response data.
SurveyMonkey may use first party machine learning or third party artificial intelligence tools on data around the type of survey the Creator has sent you, the question type, survey responses (at an aggregated and de-identified/pseudonymized level only), and device and event data associated with responses to  fulfill our contract with Creators and provide Creators with useful and relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services. Specifically, we use machine learning on survey data to help Creators by:
identifying trends in their responses;
ongoing training of models to optimize responses;
making product recommendations and providing guidance on which products and services work best in different scenarios (For an example of this check out how SurveyMonkey Genius works here);
Extracting and analyzing usage patterns, for example, we might identify when respondents prefer multiple choice versus open text questions and make predictive response suggestions when certain question types are selected. We might also use this data to help improve analysis of responses;
undertaking personalization for survey Creators;
improving user experience (for example, by collecting and using device and browser information from Respondents to improve how our survey service operates on those devices and in those browsers or by altering questions to match the responses being provided by a Respondent); and
identify insightful data trends (which do not disclose Personal Data) and make recommendations to Creators based on those trends.
A Creator has some controls over how we use responses and may have opted-out of applying machine learning to responses where it is
linked to a specific product feature
in some cases.
3.2.2
Legitimate Interest
s
We process your personal information in the following categories of data for legitimate interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Usage information.
We use information about how you use our services to improve our services for you and all users and to make recommendations to our customers about usage of our services.
For example: We collect information about the types of questions you answer. This data will be aggregated and/or de-identified where possible, so we can examine patterns in terms of respondent preferences when submitting responses. We collect and use all this data to help us improve our product so that questions are easier to answer and to help improve the completion rates on surveys/forms.
We will also use information such as the type of survey, form, questionnaire or application that you answered to personalize products we show you on completion of a survey and to understand trends in our service adoption. See more about
Customizing Survey End Page here
).
(b) Responses (in aggregated and/or de-identified form).
To build new product features.
(c) Inferred geographic location.
We may infer your geographic location based on your IP address to produce aggregated data around Respondent location trends. We will use this information to compare and look at trends on how our service operates and how you interact with surveys, on different browsers and devices. Note: we do not collect precise (GPS) location.
(d) Email address.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present personalized advertisements such as display, videos, and content on the web or connected devices. You can opt out via
this portal
.
(e) Customer support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support for our Customer. This data is de-identified where possible.
3.2.3
Legal obligation
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use usage data, event data, and aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To investigate security issues;
To prevent or address potentially unlawful activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity . For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
3.3 Visitor
We process Personal Data about you as a Visitor where:
You have consented;
We need to fulfill our contractual responsibility;
We have a legitimate interest; and
We have a legal obligation.
In some cases, as a former website visitor, we may not have any personal information about you (for example if you have not interacted with our site or have cleared your cookies).
3.3.1
Consent
When you have consented, we collect and use the following information about you:
(a) Contact Information.
We use contact information to respond to your inquiries or send you information about our services, either where you have agreed to this at the point of providing your information or where you operate in a business which may be interested in our services and for as long as you do not opt-out. opt-out of this marketing at any time.
(b) Cookies and similar technology.
We or third party data and advertising platforms that we work with may use or combine multiple technologies, such as non-required cookies, page tags, mobile identifiers and IP addresses to infer users’ common identities across different services and multiple devices such as tablets, browsers, and mobile phones. We may do so to tailor ads to users, personalize marketing, to enable us to determine the success of our advertising campaigns and to improve upon them. We use this data to personalize online marketing campaigns to be relevant to you and your interests in our services. You can withdraw your consent at any time on our Cookie Banner.
If you do not want SurveyMonkey to use this information to serve you targeted ads about our services, you may indicate your preferences at
https://www.aboutads.info
,
https://preferences-mgr.truste.com/
or, if you are located in the European Union, at
https://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. You may continue to receive ads over the internet that are not based on information you provided to SurveyMonkey.
These third party data and advertising platforms may sometimes use data that we provide to them in order to improve their technologies and their ability to match common devices to users.
3.3.2
Contract
(a) Device and event data.
We use device data to fix bugs and troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it.
(b) Comments/Content.
Any comments or content linked to you which you share if you are a guest invited to collaborate on a survey.
3.3.3
Legitimate Interest
s
We also carry out the following processing for legitimate business interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Third party profile information.
Where permitted by law, we combine information about you from third party sources with information we hold about you to create a user profile, which will help us to make our sales and marketing efforts more relevant to you and to personalize and improve our marketing/sales campaigns and website experience
(b) Email address.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present targeted and personalized marketing and sales information online. You can opt out via
this portal
.
(c) Usage information.
We use information about how you have interacted with our websites to improve our website services for you and all users. Some examples relevant to you:
Examples: We collect information about the webpages you have visited and your activity on our sites at an aggregate level. We collect this information so that we can track the most visited and most useful parts of our website to identify what are our most popular services.
(d) Event data.
We use event data for many different business purposes including the following:
To monitor abuse and troubleshoot;
To track your preferences and create new services, features, content or make recommendations personalized for you;
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services; and
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
(e) Customer Support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support. This data is de-identified where possible.
(f) Referral information.
We use referral information to track the success of our integrations and referral processes. For example, if you clicked on an advertisement for one of our brands, presented by one of our partners on the web, which brought you to one of our websites, we will record this information to help us track the success of advertising campaigns.
3.3.4
Legal obligation.
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use event data:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To prevent potentially illegal activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity. For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
4. How we share or disclose Personal Data
4.1 Information you share
Many of our services let you share information with others. Remember that when you share information publicly, it can be indexable by search engines. Our services provide you with different options on sharing and deleting your content but we cannot delete content from search engines so you need to be careful about information you make public.
4.2 Information we share
We do not share your information or data with third parties outside SurveyMonkey except in the following limited circumstances:
(a)
If you are a Creator that is part of a SurveyMonkey Enterprise or team plan, your account information and data will be shared with the primary administrator(s) and your survey data may also be visible to other members in your team with whom you share your surveys or with whom you collaborate. Your administrator(s) will be able to view your account data, change your passwords, suspend, transfer or terminate your account or restrict your settings. Please refer to your organization’s internal policies if you have questions about this.
(b)
If you are the primary administrator of a SurveyMonkey team plan, the team name and the domain of the email address on your account may be shared with an individual who has been invited to preview a survey created by one of the members of your team in order to facilitate their request to join the team. You can learn more about how to adjust Team Discovery settings
here.
(c)
If you are part of a SurveyMonkey Enterprise or team plan, your plan’s administrator(s) can transfer your survey questions and responses to, or share them with, other members in your team, including your plan’s administrator(s) themselves.  Your plan’s administrator(s) can also delete your survey questions and responses.  Your plan’s administrator(s) may also have the ability to make changes to any aspects of your survey questions and analysis.  Please refer to your organization’s internal policies if you have questions about this.
(d)
If your organization has purchased a SurveyMonkey Enterprise plan and you are using an email address on a domain owned by your employer or organization linked to your individual account, you may be asked to migrate to the SurveyMonkey Enterprise Account and your email address, name and account data will subsequently be visible to the primary administrator(s) for that account once you have been migrated. You may be notified in advance of this migration and given an opportunity to change the email address linked to your account if you are not using your account for business purposes.
(e)
To help us provide certain aspects of our services we use our affiliates and trusted key partners – in particular, we engage third parties to:
facilitate our collectors for sending surveys by email or text to Respondents. For email delivery, we use
SparkPost
and for text/SMS services we use
Twilio
. We share the relevant contact information for respondents (email address or phone number as applicable) with these third parties.
facilitate Creators in making
payments
.
to facilitate the delivery of certain features, for example if you use the “Create a survey using AI” we will send your survey prompts to our AI vendor. We recommend that you do not include Personal Data in these prompts but if you do they will be shared with the AI vendor.
to detect fraud (to include, for example, performing identify checks or verify malicious IPs).
deliver and help us track our marketing and advertising content.
help us track website conversion success metrics.
manage our sales and customer support services to you, including for resolving any disputes.
We enter into confidentiality and data processing terms with partners to ensure they comply with high levels of confidentiality and best practices in privacy and security standards and we regularly review these standards and practices. You can find more information in our
Subprocessor Statement
.
(f)
On your instructions, we share your information or data if you choose to use an integration in conjunction with SurveyMonkey services, to the extent necessary to facilitate that use. See further information
here
on our API partners.
(g)
We also may have to share information or data for the following purposes:
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request;
To enforce applicable policies, including investigation of potential violations;
To detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues;
To protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of our users, the public or to SurveyMonkey and/or as required or permitted by law; and
To facilitate a sale, merger or change in control of all or any part of our company or business or in preparation for any of these events.
5. Data retention
If you are a Creator, we generally do not delete the data in your account as long as your account is active – you are responsible for and control the time periods for which you retain this data. You can read about this
here
for account use. Here are some exceptions:
If you are a SurveyMonkey Basic (free) user on our platforms and you have not engaged with the service actively for some time, we reserve the right to delete your account and data in accordance with our data retention policy.
If you have exceeded your response limit as a SurveyMonkey Basic (free) account holder, we will delete the overages if you do not upgrade within a fixed timeframe.
We also encourage Creators to actively review their data retention practices in their account and take care to retain data only as long as is strictly necessary.
We also describe the expiry periods for cookies on our websites in our
Cookies Notice
.
6. Personalized marketing and cookies
We and our partners use cookies and similar technologies on our websites. For more information see our
Cookies Notice
. For information about cookies used in our surveys please see
Cookies used on Survey Pages
. If you are a customer of SurveyMonkey and separately use cookies or similar technologies in conjunction with any of our products and services, then you yourself will be responsible for complying with any laws related to the use of those technologies and this Privacy Notice is not applicable to that use by you.
You can also choose to remove or disable cookies via your
browser settings
and, depending on your geographic location you can withdraw consent to non-essential cookies using the in-product cookie preferences tool.
You can opt-out from direct marketing in your account and we provide opt-out options in all direct marketing emails. Finally, if you do not wish to see personalized marketing content on the web related to our service you can clear the cookies in your browser settings. See our Help Center article on how to do this
here
.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present targeted and personalized marketing and sales information online. You can opt out via
this portal
.
7. Security
We have a security statement related to our self-serve businesses (SurveyMonkey and Wufoo) available to view
here
. For information about security related to our other business lines you can speak to a sales representative by completing the form
here
.
8. Safety of Minors
Our services (including creating and responding to surveys) are not intended for and may not be used by minors. “
Minors
” are individuals under the age of 16 (or under a higher age as provided in certain countries or territories). SurveyMonkey does not knowingly collect Personal Data from Minors or allow them to register. If it comes to our attention that we have collected Personal Data from a Minor, we may delete this information without notice. If you have reason to believe that this has occurred, please contact customer support.
9. Data Transfers
Your information and data may be processed in and transferred or disclosed in the United States and countries in which our affiliates are located and in which our service providers are located or have servers. You can view a list of these locations in our
EU Data Transfer Statement
. You can also read about data that is stored in our other data centers here in our
International Data Center Overview
. We ensure that the recipient of your Personal Data offers an adequate level of protection, for instance by entering into the appropriate back-to-back agreements with standard contractual clauses or other transfer mechanisms as approved by the European Commission or relevant data protection authority.
We have also provided a
help article
which answers some additional questions about data transfers to the US.
9.1
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles.
SurveyMonkey Inc. has self-certified its compliance under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles. SurveyMonkey Inc. is committed to subjecting all personal information received from the European Union (EU) member countries, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland to the Framework’s applicable Principles. SurveyMonkey Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. SurveyMonkey Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Notice and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
SurveyMonkey Inc. also complies with the onward transfer liability provisions of the DPF.
When SurveyMonkey Inc. receives personal information under the DPF and then transfers it to a third-party service provider acting as agent on SurveyMonkey Inc.'s behalf, SurveyMonkey Inc. has certain liability under the DPF if both (i) the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF and (ii) SurveyMonkey Inc. is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. In certain situations, SurveyMonkey Inc. may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
With respect to Personal Data received or transferred pursuant to the DPF, SurveyMonkey Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.  Please contact SurveyMonkey Inc. as described in Section 11 below if you have any concerns or complaints of any nature. If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider, (free of charge) at
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the DPF website
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/How-to-Submit-a-Complaint-Relating-to-a-Participating-Organization-s-Compliance-with-the-DPF-Principles-dpf
, you may invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted.
10. Who is my data controller?
If you have provided survey responses, filled out a form, submitted an application, or provided website feedback to a Creator using SurveyMonkey services, that Creator is the controller of your data, and SurveyMonkey is the processor of that data.
For SurveyMonkey Enterprise account holders, your organization’s primary administrator controls some basic account level information which you input when setting up your account like name, email address, and profile photo.
If you have provided survey responses, filled out a form, submitted an application, or provided website feedback directly to SurveyMonkey, then SurveyMonkey is the controller and our use of that data is described by this Notice and in our
SurveyMonkey Research Privacy Notice
.
If you are a Creator and have received more responses than your plan allows (“overage data”), SurveyMonkey is the controller over the overage data until you change your plan type, or the overage data is deleted in accordance with section 12.4 of our
Terms of Use
or per the terms of your negotiated contract.
SurveyMonkey is a controller for the account-level data provided by its Creators and panelists from Contribute and Rewards. More information can be found in section 13.6 of this Privacy Notice.
11. Your rights
You may wish to exercise a right to obtain information about yourself or to correct, update or delete that information. For more information about these rights you can read about it
here
. Some of these rights may be subject to some exceptions or limitations in local law. Please note your rights and choices vary depending upon your location. We will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and we will respond to your request to exercise these rights within a reasonable time (and in all cases within 30 days of receiving a request) subject to the below for specific categories of person.
11.1
Apply Applicants
For SurveyMonkey Apply users please see
information on how to exercise your rights here
.
11. 2 Creator
Where you hold an account with any SurveyMonkey service, you are entitled to a copy of all Personal Data which we hold in relation to you. You also may be entitled to request that we restrict how we use your data or object to some aspect of our treatment of your data. You can access a lot of your data in your own account when you log in. If you want to exercise your rights, please contact us
here
.
Depending on your plan type, SurveyMonkey also enables you to export your own response data from our system in a variety of formats so that you can back it up or use it with other applications. Alternatively, for assistance in exporting or deleting responses, you can contact us.
11.3 Respondent
Where you have responded to a survey, form, questionnaire or application sent to you by a Creator using a SurveyMonkey service, you will need to reach out directly to that individual or organization to discuss managing, deleting, accessing, restricting access to or otherwise withdrawing consent for use of the information which you provided to them in your responses. SurveyMonkey does not control your response data and, accordingly, is not in a position to directly handle these requests in relation to that data. If you are having difficulties finding this Creator or if you have any other questions after reading this Privacy Notice, you can
contact us
through
our support team
and we will try our best to help you.
11.4 Panelist
If you have created a Rewards or Contribute account with us, you can request a copy of your Personal Data, delete your Personal Data, or correct it.
11.5 Visitor
Where you have visited our website and you want to exercise any of the above rights please contact our support team
here
. Alternatively, if your request is for the right to be forgotten as it relates only to our use of cookies you can achieve this by clearing the cookies in your browser settings. See our Help Center article describing how to do this
here
.
11.6 Authorized Agent
If you are a third party organization acting on behalf of a data subject (or class of data subjects) to exercise data subject rights, we do work with you. In this case:
We ask you to follow our process outlined in this Privacy Notice for security reasons so that we can independently verify the Creator (if it is a Creator) making any requests to exercise their rights.
Where applicable, we directly interact with a Creator’s registered email address, because we authenticate users with username and unique password and not with other identifying information (e.g., photo ID or similar).
Please do not share other forms of personal identification for data subjects with us when submitting requests.
11.7
Other rights and choices
For rights and choices specific to US consumers, please refer to our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
. Please note we will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and the authenticity of your request as described in that Notice.
11.8
Contact
Except as explicitly provided herein, please use the following contact information for privacy inquiries
SurveyMonkey Inc.
910 Park Pl, Suite 300
San Mateo, California 94403
United States
Or contact us
here
.
SurveyMonkey Europe UC
Ella House, Suite 40.4
40 Merrion Square East
Dublin 2
D02 NP96
Ireland
Or contact us
here
.
Data Protection Officer
: SurveyMonkey's Data Protection Officer is registered with the Irish Data Protection Commission.  Contact our DPO at
dpo@surveymonkey.com
.
Note that our contact form is the
best
way to make a rights request with us.
11.9
Complaints
If you are a resident in the European Union and you are dissatisfied with how we have managed a complaint you have submitted to us, you are entitled to contact your local data protection supervisory authority. As SurveyMonkey Europe UC operates its business in Ireland, it operates under the remit of the Irish Office of the Data Protection Commissioner (see:
IDPC Website
).
12. Changes to our Privacy Notice
We can make changes to the
Privacy Basics
and this Privacy Notice from time to time. We will identify the changes we have made on
this page
. In circumstances where a change will materially change the way in which we collect or use your personal information or data, we will send a notice of this change to all of our account holders.
13. Privacy information specific to other services
Although this Privacy Notice applies to all our Services, some information may be specific to individual Services. Please see below for more information
13.1
TechValidate
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our TechValidate users except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool.
13.1.1
TechFacts
TechFacts are published on an anonymous basis – that is, no Respondent Personal Information is displayed in a TechFact unless your Respondents authorize the use of their name and company affiliation. You are able to see the individual respondent’s identity in your account and, if you give a SurveyMonkey employee permission to view that response, then SurveyMonkey will also see this. However, we never publish or disseminate this information (unless you explicitly ask us to do so).
We assign a unique identification number to each TechFact. The ID will appear on each copy of the TechFact. Our site is designed so that visitors may look up and view TechFacts without the collection of any personal information (except for such visitor's internet protocol (IP) address).
13.2
SurveyMonkey Apply
SurveyMonkey Apply is an online application system that helps organizations collect applications, manage subscriptions and facilitate reviews. Our main Privacy Notice applies to
apply.surveymonkey.com
(“SurveyMonkey Apply”) except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is applicable only to our survey tool. Responses and Respondents in this section are intended as reference to applicants and their applications for the purposes of use of SurveyMonkey Apply.
When an applicant submits an application through SurveyMonkey Apply, their login information can be used for multiple applications across the SurveyMonkey Apply site.
If you have any questions about your personal information in the context of our SurveyMonkey Apply service, you can contact us
here
.
13.3
Wufoo
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our Wufoo users except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool.
13.3.1
Your control over your form data
We store your form data (form content and responses) for you. You have the following controls over your form data:
Download/backup your form data. We provide you with the ability to export, share and publish your form data in a variety of formats. This allows you to create your own backups or work with your data offline. See
here
for data exporting instructions.
Delete your form data. You can delete your form data (including parts of forms, entire forms, and responses to forms) through your account's user interface. See
here
for how to delete form entries.
Cancel your Wufoo account. You can cancel your Wufoo account at any time through your account management page. Any cancellation of your Wufoo account will result in the deletion of your account and all form data stored in it. This data cannot be recovered once your account is cancelled. Please be aware that we may for a time retain residual information in our backup and/or archival copies of our database for up to 90 days.
We would like to emphasize that we will not use your form data to compete with you, market to your clients, or contact them for any other means of profit. We will also not sell your form data to anyone.
13.4
GetFeedback Digital (formerly Usabilla)
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our GetFeedback Digital users, except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool, or information in this section distinguishes our treatment of data and information in the case of GetFeedback Digital’s service, in which case this Section takes precedence.
Information about GetFeedback Digital APIs is provided
here
.
Information about GetFeedback Digital partners is provided
here
.
We do not delete customer data unless the customer has instructed us to do so. You can delete your data at any time. You can also set a data retention period between 1-36 months after which data is automatically deleted.
Sentiment Analysis and other additional machine learning features are auto-implemented for all customer accounts and cannot be switched off. If you do not wish to collect sentiment on your response data you should avoid use of open text response questions.
To adjust your preferences and settings around data and information you must be logged into your account and/or can contact GetFeedback Digital’s team at privacy@getfeedback.com for assistance or you can read about this more
here
.
To exercise your data rights (as described in our main Privacy NoticeSection 14 above) you can use our
contact form
(please specify that this is a GetFeedback Digital request) or you can contact GetFeedback Digital’s team at privacy@getfeedback.com.
13.5
GetFeedback Direct
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our GetFeedback Direct users, except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool, or information in this section distinguishes our treatment of data and information in the case of GetFeedback Direct's service, in which case this section takes precedence. If you are part of any of our early adopter programs our main Privacy Notice will apply to you.
13.5.1
Sentiment Analysis
Sentiment Analysis and other additional machine learning features are auto-implemented for all customer accounts and cannot be switched off. If you do not wish to collect sentiment on your response data you should avoid use of open text response questions.
13.5.2
Salesforce
GetFeedback Direct is a Salesforce ISVforce partner. If you have created a GetFeedback Direct account, the registration information you provide will be disclosed to Salesforce.com, Inc. and will be used by Salesforce.com, Inc. pursuant to its privacy policy (see
Salesforce Privacy Policy
). More information about how to automate emails in GetFeedback Direct using Salesforce is available
here
. Information about displaying a Post Chat Survey in Salesforce Chat can be found
here
.
13.5.3
Suppression Lists
You can manage your suppression lists and map these to Salesforce so as to ensure you comply with unsubscribe requests from your Respondents by following the steps outlined
here
. For clarity, we are not responsible for how you manage your suppression lists.
13.5.4
Contact Us
To exercise your rights (as described in Section 11 of the Privacy Notice), please contact the GetFeedback Direct support team at
help@getfeedback.com
.
13.6
Audience
If you are a panelist using our Rewards or Contribute apps, please read the following notices as they apply to your use of those Services:
SurveyMonkey Contribute Privacy Notice
SurveyMonkey Rewards Privacy Notice
If you are a panelist responding to a SurveyMonkey survey through a third party, please read the following notice as it applies to your use of those Services:
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
Sub-policy 7
https://cloud.google.com/terms/cloud-acquisitions-privacy-notice:
cloud.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Back to Google Cloud Terms Directory
Current
Google Cloud Acquisitions Privacy Notice
Effective Date: February 6, 2025
This Google Cloud Acquisitions Privacy Notice (“Privacy Notice”) explains how the Google Cloud Acquisitions, (“we”, “our”, “us” or “Google Cloud Acquisition”), as defined herein in
Annex 1
, collects and processes the personal information of its users (“user”, “you” or “your” ) in relation to our website (“Website”) and our products and related services, as applicable (collectively, the “Services”). Where we refer to “Google'' in this notice, we mean the Google entity that is our parent company or any entity that is directly or indirectly controlled by or under common control with Google (collectively, “Google”). Where we refer to “Google Cloud Services” (or “Cloud Services”), we mean the services described
here
. (The data handling practices described herein do not refer to Google’s or Cloud Services’ activities unless the terms “Google” or “Cloud Services” is specifically used.)
We offer the Services either directly or via our authorized partners, including but not limited to resellers, distributors, or other similar representatives. Where we refer to our “customers” in this notice, we also mean our partners, resellers, distributors, or our other similar representatives and their customers.
If European Union (EU), UK or Swiss data protection law applies to the processing of Service Data relating to you, you can review the
EU Privacy Standards and GDPR
section below to learn more about your rights and compliance with these laws by us and by Google.
Expand all
Service Data We Collect
We process Customer Data and Service Data in order to provide the Services. This Privacy Notice applies solely to Service Data and
does not
apply to Customer Data. “Customer Data” is defined as data provided by or on behalf of Customer or Customer End Users for processing via the Services, unless it is otherwise defined in the specific product’s Terms of Service, in which case, that definition applies. For additional information related to Customer Data processing, please refer to your relevant Customer agreement for information about processing Customer Data and to
Annex 1
for information about subprocessors.
Service Data is the personal information we collect or generate during the provision and administration of the Services, excluding any Customer Data. Service Data includes:
When you engage us to use our Services or sign-up to the Services, and to provide support as agreed.
We collect and process your contact information and billing information when you engage us to use our Services or sign-up to the Services and to provide support as agreed between the parties. If you are a representative of a business that wishes to use, or is already using, our Services, we will collect your contact information such as your name, title and company name, contact information, i.e., email address and phone number, and information relating to the potential or existing engagement and any support agreed between us and that business.
Payments and transactions.
We keep reasonable business records of charges, payments, and billing details and issues.
Settings and configurations.
We record your configuration and settings, including usernames, resource identifiers, and attributes. This includes service and security settings for data and other resources.
Technical and operational details of your usage of the Services.
We collect information about usage, operational status, software errors and crash reports, authentication details, quality and performance metrics, and other technical details necessary for us to operate and maintain the Services and related software. This information includes device identifiers, identifiers from cookies or tokens, and IP addresses.
Your direct communications.
We keep records of your communications and interactions with us and our partners, for example, when you send us an inquiry, provide feedback, or sign up to get a demo or to receive news and updates from us.
When you visit the Website.
We collect analytics information about your interaction with the Website, such as device identifiers and identifiers from cookies or tokens.
Why We Process Service Data
We process Service Data for the following purposes:
Provide the Services you request.
Service Data is primarily used to deliver the Services that you and our customers request. This requires processing of Service Data for purposes such as billing for the services you use, ensuring those Services are delivered or working as intended, detecting and avoiding outages or other problems you might experience, and securing your data and Services.
Make recommendations to optimize use of the Services.
We use Service Data to provide you and our customers with recommendations. This includes suggesting ways to better secure your account or data, options to reduce service charges or improve performance, and information about new or related products and features. We also evaluate your response to our recommendations.
Maintain and improve the Services and Cloud Services.
We evaluate Service Data to help us improve the performance and functionality of the Services. As we optimize the Services for you, this will improve them for our customers and vice versa.
Provide and improve other services you request, including Cloud Services.
We use Service Data to deliver and improve other Services that you and our customers request, including Google or third-party services that are enabled via the Services, administrative consoles, marketplaces, or APIs.
Assist you, including support.
We use Service Data to provide the technical support that you and our customers request, and to assess whether we have met your needs. We also use Service Data to improve our online support, and to communicate with you and our customers. This includes sending notifications about updates to the Services, and responding to support requests.
Protect you, our users, the public, us, and Google.
We use Service Data to improve the safety and reliability of our services by detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm us, our users, our customers, the public or Google. These activities are an important part of our commitment to secure our services.
Comply with legal obligations.
We use Service Data to comply with our legal obligations and Google’s legal obligations, for example, where we are responding to a legal process or an enforceable governmental request, or to meet our financial record-keeping obligations.
To achieve these purposes, we use Service Data together with information we collect from other Google products and services you use. In particular, we combine Service Data with this other information because:
It helps us evaluate the use of the Services and other Google products to inform product development decisions.
It helps us detect fraud and abuse, such as fraudulent login attempts.
It enables us to comply with enforceable legal requests seeking data about a particular user's interactions across Google’s products.
It enables us to provide specific features of the Services (for example, to inform rankings for surfacing relevant contacts in Gmail).
We use algorithms to recognize patterns in Service Data. Manual collection and review of Service Data may also occur, such as when you interact directly with our billing or support teams. We also use Service Data for internal reporting and analysis of applicable product and business operations for which we aggregate and anonymize Service Data to eliminate personal information.
Where Service Data Is Stored
We maintain servers around the world and Service Data may be processed on servers located outside of the country where our users and customers are located from these
locations
, or as otherwise specified. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others.
Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this privacy notice. We also comply with certain legal frameworks relating to the transfer of data, such as the frameworks described below.
Adequacy decisions
The European Commission has determined that certain countries outside of the European Economic Area (EEA) adequately protect personal data, which means that data can be transferred from the European Union (EU), Norway, Liechtenstein, and Iceland to that third country without any further safeguard being necessary. The UK and Switzerland have approved similar adequacy decisions. We rely on the following adequacy decisions in some cases:
1.
European Commission adequacy decisions
2.
UK adequacy regulations
3.
Swiss adequacy decisions
Data Privacy Frameworks
As described in the
certification
table, Google complies with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks (DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from European Union member countries (including EEA member countries), Switzerland and the UK respectively.
Regarding
Google Cloud Acquisitions
, certain entities have certified their respective adherence to these
DPF Principles.
The respective entities remain responsible for any of your personal information that is shared under the Onward Transfer principle (see DPF Principles for more details) with third parties for external processing on their behalf, as described in the
How We Share Service Data
section of this notice. To learn more about the DPF, please visit the
DPF website
.
If you have an inquiry regarding our relevant DPF certifications, we encourage you to contact us. Google is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC). You may also refer a complaint to your local data protection authority and we will work with them to resolve your concern. In certain circumstances, the DPF provides the right to invoke binding arbitration to resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in
Annex I to the DPF Principles
.
Standard contractual clauses
Standard contractual clauses (SCCs) are written commitments between parties that can be used as a ground for data transfers from the EU to third countries by providing appropriate data protection safeguards. SCCs have been approved by the European Commission and can’t be modified by the parties using them (you can see the SCCs adopted by the European Commission
here
,
here
, and
here
). Such clauses have also been approved for transfers of data to countries outside the UK and Switzerland. Where required, we rely on SCCs for data transfers. If you want to obtain a copy of the SCCs, you can contact us via
our contact email address
below.
How We Secure Service Data
Our Services are offered with strong security features to protect your data. We work hard to protect you from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
Encrypting Service Data at rest and while in transit between our facilities.
Regularly reviewing our Service Data collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems; and
Restricting access to Service Data to our employees, contractors, and agents, including Google employees, contractors, and agents, who need that Service Data in order to process it for us. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
How We Share Service Data
We do not share Service Data with companies, organizations, or individuals outside the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google except in the following cases:
When you procure third-party services
We share your information outside of the Google Cloud Acquisitions when you or our customer choose(s) to procure a third-party service through Google Cloud Platform, the Google Cloud Platform Marketplace, the Google Workspace Marketplace, or choose(s) a third-party application that requests access to your information.
With your consent
We’ll share your information outside of the Google Cloud Acquisitions where we have obtained your consent to do so.
With your administrators and authorized resellers
When you use the Services, your administrator and resellers authorized to manage your or your organization’s account will have access to certain Service Data. For example, they may be able to:
View account and billing information, activity and statistics
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Access your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We do not sell your Service Data to any third parties.
We share your Service Data with trusted third-party providers to process it for us as we instruct them, in compliance with this Privacy Notice and appropriate confidentiality and security measures. In particular, we share your Service Data with our third-party providers when you request technical support services (we share the information you provide in the support ticket) and professional services (we share your contact details to enable communication and collaboration).
For legal reasons
We share Service Data outside the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google if we have a good-faith belief that access to, or use, preservation, or disclosure of the Service Data is reasonably necessary to:
Comply with applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request.
Enforce applicable agreements, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of us, Google, our customers, users, and the public as required or permitted by law.
If we or Google are involved in a reorganization, merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your Service Data and give affected users notice before Service Data becomes subject to a different privacy notice.
Access to Service Data
Your organization may allow you to access and export your data in order to back it up or transfer it to a third-party service. Some Services may enable you to directly access and download the data you have stored in the services.
You may be able to access certain categories of Service Data directly from the Services, such as your billing contact information, payment and transaction information, or certain product and communication settings and configurations.
If you’re unable to access your data, you can always request access via
our contact email address
below.
Deletion Or Retention Of Service Data
We retain Service Data for different periods of time depending on the type of data, how we use it, and how you configure your settings. When we no longer need such data, we delete or anonymize it.
For each type of Service Data and processing operation, we set retention timeframes based on the purposes for which we process it, and ensure that the information is kept for no longer than necessary. We retain most types of Service Data for a set period of up to 180 days (the exact number depends on the specific type of data). However, some data may be kept for longer periods where there is a business need. We generally have longer retention periods (which can be over a year) for Service Data that is kept for the following purposes:
Security, fraud and abuse prevention.
We retain Service Data to protect the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google, users, customers, and the public from security threats (including when it is necessary to protect against fraudulent attempts to gain access to user accounts), or to investigate violations of applicable Google Cloud Acquisitions agreements. Usually, the Service Data retained where there is reason to suspect fraud or abuse would include device identifiers, identifiers from cookies or tokens, and IP addresses, as well as log data about usage of the Google Cloud Acquisitions Services.
Complying with legal or regulatory requirements.
We retain Service Data when required by an enforceable legal process, such as when the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google receives a lawful subpoena.
Complying with tax, accounting or financial requirements.
When the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google processes a payment for you, or when you make a payment to the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google, we retain Service Data about those transactions (including billing information), typically for a minimum of five years, as required for tax or accounting purposes, or to comply with applicable financial regulations.
At the end of the applicable retention period, we follow detailed protocols to make sure that the Service Data is securely and completely deleted from our active systems (the servers the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google uses to run applications and store data) or retained only in anonymized form. After completion of these steps, copies of the data will remain for a limited period in our encrypted backup systems (which we maintain to protect this information from accidental or malicious deletion and for outage and disaster recovery purposes), before being overwritten by new backup copies.
EU Privacy Standards and GDPR
Exercising your data protection rights
If European Union (EU), UK, or Swiss data protection law applies to the processing of Service Data relating to you, you have certain rights, including the rights to access, correct, delete and export that information, and to object to or request that we restrict processing of your personal information.
The entities listed in
Annex 1
below. will be the data controllers responsible for your personal information. However, where you or our customer has entered into an agreement covering the Services with a different Google affiliate, that affiliate will be the data controller responsible for processing your Service Data, but only in connection with billing for the Services.
If you want to exercise your data protection rights with regard to Service Data we process in accordance with this Privacy Notice, and you are not able to do so via the tools available to you or your organization’s administrator, you can contact us via
our contact email address
below.
You can always contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Our grounds for processing your Service Data
When we process Service Data for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice (see
Why We Process Service Data
above), we rely on the following legal grounds:
Purpose
Types of Service Data Processed
Legal Grounds
Provide the Services you request.
The following types of Service Data, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the contractual obligations which we owe to our customer to provide the Services.
Make recommendations to optimize use of the Services and Cloud Services.
The following types of personal information, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
When we’re pursuing
legitimate interests
in offering the best service we can, and ensuring our customers know how to get the most out of our services.
In some cases we will seek your
consent
to send you marketing communications.
Maintain and improve the Services and Cloud Services.
The following types of personal information, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in offering the best services we can, and continuing to improve the Services to meet our customers’ needs.
Provide and improve other services you request, including Cloud Services.
The following types of Service Data, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the contractual obligations we owe to our customer to provide the Services; and where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in offering the best services we can; and continuing to improve the Services to meet our customers’ needs.
Assist you, which includes support.
The following types of Service Data, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the contractual obligations we owe to our customer to provide the Services.
Protect you, our users, customers, the public, the Google Cloud Acquisitions, and Google.
The following types of Service Data, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for the Google Cloud Acquisitions’ or Google’s
legitimate interest
to protect against harm to the rights, property and safety of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google; and where necessary for the Google Cloud Acquisitions’, Google’s, and third parties’
legitimate interests
to protect against harm to our users, our customers and the public, including criminal acts and rights violations.
Comply with legal obligations.
Depending on the specific legal obligations, following types of Service Data:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
When we have a legal obligation to do so. For example, where we’re responding to legal process or an enforceable governmental request, or retaining information relating to your purchases and communications to meet our record-keeping obligations.
Purpose
Types of Service Data Processed
Legal Grounds
Provide the Services you request.
The following types of Service Data, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the contractual obligations which we owe to our customer to provide the Services.
Make recommendations to optimize use of the Services and Cloud Services.
The following types of personal information, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
When we’re pursuing
legitimate interests
in offering the best service we can, and ensuring our customers know how to get the most out of our services.
In some cases we will seek your
consent
to send you marketing communications.
Maintain and improve the Services and Cloud Services.
The following types of personal information, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in offering the best services we can, and continuing to improve the Services to meet our customers’ needs.
Provide and improve other services you request, including Cloud Services.
The following types of Service Data, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the contractual obligations we owe to our customer to provide the Services; and where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in offering the best services we can; and continuing to improve the Services to meet our customers’ needs.
Assist you, which includes support.
The following types of Service Data, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the contractual obligations we owe to our customer to provide the Services.
Protect you, our users, customers, the public, the Google Cloud Acquisitions, and Google.
The following types of Service Data, as necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for the Google Cloud Acquisitions’ or Google’s
legitimate interest
to protect against harm to the rights, property and safety of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google; and where necessary for the Google Cloud Acquisitions’, Google’s, and third parties’
legitimate interests
to protect against harm to our users, our customers and the public, including criminal acts and rights violations.
Comply with legal obligations.
Depending on the specific legal obligations, following types of Service Data:
Account information
Services payments and transactions
Services settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your use of the Services
Your direct communications
When we have a legal obligation to do so. For example, where we’re responding to legal process or an enforceable governmental request, or retaining information relating to your purchases and communications to meet our record-keeping obligations.
Additional information (Switzerland)
If Swiss data protection law applies to the processing of your Service Data, the following additional information is relevant.
Please see the section titled ‘
Where Service Data is Stored
’ (above) for information on where we and our affiliates process Service Data. We also disclose your Service Data to service providers, partners and other recipients (see the section titled ‘
How We Share Service Data
’) that are located or process information in any country in the world.
We comply with certain legal frameworks relating to the transfer of information as set out in the sections titled ‘Model contract clauses’ and ‘Standard contractual clauses’ . We may also transfer your information to a third country based on an exception provided for by the
Swiss Federal Data Protection Act
.
An exception may apply in the event of legal proceedings abroad; in cases of overriding public interest or if the performance of a contract with you or in your interest requires disclosure; if you have consented; if the information has been made generally available by you and you have not objected to the processing; if the disclosure is necessary in order to protect the life or the physical integrity of you or a third party and we can't get consent within a reasonable period of time; or if the information originates from a register provided for by Swiss law which is accessible to the public or to persons with a legitimate interest, provided that the legal conditions for the consultation of such register has been met in the specific case.
Brazil Requirements
If Brazilian data protection law applies to the processing of your personal information, you have certain rights, including the rights to access, correct, delete or export that information, as well as to object to or request that we restrict processing of that information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or to export your information to another service.
For users based in Brazil, the data controller responsible for information we collect under this Privacy Notice is Cloud Brasil Computação e Serviços de Dados Ltda. The Data Protection Officer is Kristie Chon Flynn. If you want to exercise your data protection rights with regard to personal information we process in accordance with this Privacy Notice and are not able to do so via the tools available to you or your organization’s administrator, you can always contact us via our contact email address. And you can contact your data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under Brazilian law.
In addition to the purposes and grounds described in this Privacy Notice, we may process personal information on the following legal grounds:
Where necessary for the performance of a contract with you
We may process your information where necessary for us to enter into a contract with you or to comply with our contractual commitments to you.
When we’re complying with legal obligations
We’ll process your information when we have a legal obligation to do so.
When we’re pursuing legitimate interests
We may process personal information based on our legitimate interests and those of third parties while applying appropriate safeguards that protect your privacy. This means that we process your information in the interests of providing the Services you request; making recommendations to optimize use of the Services; maintaining and improving the Services; providing and improving other services you request; assisting you; and protecting against harm to the rights, property or safety of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google, our users, our customers, and the public, as required or permitted by law.
U.S. State Privacy Law Requirements
Some U.S. state privacy laws require specific disclosures for state residents.
These laws may include:
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) (as amended by the California Consumer Privacy Act Regulations (CCPR);
Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (VCDPA);
Colorado Privacy Act (CPA);
Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring (CTDPA);
Utah Consumer Privacy Act (UCPA);
Florida Digital Bill of Rights (FDBR);
Texas Data Privacy and Security Act (TDPSA);
Oregon Consumer Privacy Act (OCPA); and
Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act (MTCDPA).
This Privacy Notice is designed to help you understand how we handle Service Data:
We explain the categories of Service Data we collect and the sources of that Service Data in
Service Data We Collect
.
We explain the purposes for which Google collects and uses Service Data in
Why We Process Service Data
.
We explain when we may disclose Service Data in
How We Share Service Data
. We do not sell your Service Data to any third parties. We also do not “share” your personal information as that term is defined in the CCPA, as amended by the CCPR.
We explain how we retain Service Data in
Deletion Or Retention of Service Data
. Google may also de-identify personal information about you so that the information can no longer be linked to you. When we de-identify personal information, we maintain policies and technical measures to avoid re-identifying that information.
U.S. state privacy laws also provide the right to request information about how Google collects, uses, and discloses Service Data. And they give you the right to access your Service Data, sometimes in a portable format; correct Service Data; and to request that Google delete that Service Data. They also provide the right to not be discriminated against for exercising these privacy rights.
We provide the information and tools described in
Access to Service Data
so you can exercise these rights. When you use them, we’ll validate your request by verifying your identity.
If you have questions or requests related to your rights under U.S. state privacy laws, you (or your authorized agent) can also contact us via
our contact email address
below. And if you disagree with the decision on your request, you can ask us to reconsider it by responding to the team’s email.
Some U.S. state privacy laws require a description of Service Data practices using specific categories. This table uses these categories to organize the information in this Privacy Notice.
Categories of Service Data we collect
Business purposes for which Service Data may be used or disclosed
Parties with whom Service Data may be used or disclosed
Identifiers and similar information
such as your username, name, phone number, address, and job titles, as well as unique identifiers tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using.
Demographic information
, such as your preferred language and age.
Commercial information
such as records of charges, payments, and billing details and issues.
Technical and operational details of your usage of Services,
such as information about your usage, operational status, software errors and crash reports, authentication details, quality and performance metrics, and other technical details necessary for us to operate and maintain Services and related software. This includes device identifiers, identifiers from cookies or tokens, and IP addresses.
Approximate Location data
, as may be determined by IP address, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Audio, electronic, visual, and similar information
, such as audio recording of your calls with our technical support providers.
Audio, electronic, visual, and similar information
, such as audio recording of your calls with our technical support providers.
Inferences
drawn from the above, like aggregated performance metrics for a new product feature to determine product strategy.
Protecting against security threats, abuse, and illegal activity.
We use and may disclose Service Data to detect, prevent and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and for protecting against other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity. For example, to protect our services, we may receive or disclose information about IP addresses that malicious actors have compromised.
Auditing and measurement
. We use Service Data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used, and to provide you and our customers with recommendations and tips. We may disclose non-personally identifiable information publicly and with partners, including for auditing purposes.
Maintaining our services
. We use Service Data to provide Services and related technical support, and other services you request, and ensure they are working as intended, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting bugs and other issues that you report to us.
Product development
. We use Service Data to improve Services and other services you request, and to develop new products, features and technologies that benefit our users and customers.
Use of service providers.
We disclose Service Data with service providers to perform services on our behalf, in compliance with this Privacy Notice and other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we may rely on service providers to help provide technical support.
Legal reasons
. We also use Service Data to satisfy applicable laws or regulations, and discloses information in response to legal process or enforceable government requests, including to law enforcement.
We do not disclose Service Data with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google except in the following cases:
When you procure third-party services.
We disclose Service Data outside of Google or the Google Cloud Acquisitions when you or our customers choose(s) to procure a third-party service through Google Cloud Platform, the Google Cloud Platform Marketplace or the Google Workspace Marketplace, or use a third-party application that requests access to your Service Data.
With your consent.
We’ll disclose Service Data outside of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google where we have obtained your consent.
With your administrators and authorized resellers
. When you use the Services, your administrator and resellers authorized to manage your or your organization’s account will have access to certain Service Data.
For external processing
. We disclose Service Data with trusted third-party providers to process it for us as we instruct them and in compliance with this Privacy Notice and appropriate confidentiality and security measures. In particular, we disclose Service Data with our third-party providers when you request technical support services (we disclose the information you provide in the support ticket) and professional services (we disclose your contact details to enable communication and collaboration).
For legal reasons.
We disclose Service Data outside of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google when we have a good-faith belief that access to or disclosure of that Service Data is reasonably necessary to:
Comply with applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request.
Enforce applicable agreements, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of the Google Cloud Acquisitions, Google, our customers, users, and the public, as required or permitted by law.
Categories of Service Data we collect
Business purposes for which Service Data may be used or disclosed
Parties with whom Service Data may be used or disclosed
Identifiers and similar information
such as your username, name, phone number, address, and job titles, as well as unique identifiers tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using.
Demographic information
, such as your preferred language and age.
Commercial information
such as records of charges, payments, and billing details and issues.
Technical and operational details of your usage of Services,
such as information about your usage, operational status, software errors and crash reports, authentication details, quality and performance metrics, and other technical details necessary for us to operate and maintain Services and related software. This includes device identifiers, identifiers from cookies or tokens, and IP addresses.
Approximate Location data
, as may be determined by IP address, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Audio, electronic, visual, and similar information
, such as audio recording of your calls with our technical support providers.
Audio, electronic, visual, and similar information
, such as audio recording of your calls with our technical support providers.
Inferences
drawn from the above, like aggregated performance metrics for a new product feature to determine product strategy.
Protecting against security threats, abuse, and illegal activity.
We use and may disclose Service Data to detect, prevent and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and for protecting against other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity. For example, to protect our services, we may receive or disclose information about IP addresses that malicious actors have compromised.
Auditing and measurement
. We use Service Data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used, and to provide you and our customers with recommendations and tips. We may disclose non-personally identifiable information publicly and with partners, including for auditing purposes.
Maintaining our services
. We use Service Data to provide Services and related technical support, and other services you request, and ensure they are working as intended, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting bugs and other issues that you report to us.
Product development
. We use Service Data to improve Services and other services you request, and to develop new products, features and technologies that benefit our users and customers.
Use of service providers.
We disclose Service Data with service providers to perform services on our behalf, in compliance with this Privacy Notice and other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we may rely on service providers to help provide technical support.
Legal reasons
. We also use Service Data to satisfy applicable laws or regulations, and discloses information in response to legal process or enforceable government requests, including to law enforcement.
We do not disclose Service Data with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google except in the following cases:
When you procure third-party services.
We disclose Service Data outside of Google or the Google Cloud Acquisitions when you or our customers choose(s) to procure a third-party service through Google Cloud Platform, the Google Cloud Platform Marketplace or the Google Workspace Marketplace, or use a third-party application that requests access to your Service Data.
With your consent.
We’ll disclose Service Data outside of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google where we have obtained your consent.
With your administrators and authorized resellers
. When you use the Services, your administrator and resellers authorized to manage your or your organization’s account will have access to certain Service Data.
For external processing
. We disclose Service Data with trusted third-party providers to process it for us as we instruct them and in compliance with this Privacy Notice and appropriate confidentiality and security measures. In particular, we disclose Service Data with our third-party providers when you request technical support services (we disclose the information you provide in the support ticket) and professional services (we disclose your contact details to enable communication and collaboration).
For legal reasons.
We disclose Service Data outside of the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google when we have a good-faith belief that access to or disclosure of that Service Data is reasonably necessary to:
Comply with applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request.
Enforce applicable agreements, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of the Google Cloud Acquisitions, Google, our customers, users, and the public, as required or permitted by law.
APAC Requirements
Data protection laws in certain countries in this region may, in some cases, require Google to obtain your consent to collect and process your Service Data. By accessing and using any of the Services, you agree that Google may process your Service Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice. In particular, you can find information about:
The categories of Service Data Google collects and the sources of that Service Data in
Service Data We Collect
.
The purposes for which Google collects and uses Service Data in
Why We Process Service Data
.
When Google may disclose Service Data in
How We Share Service Data
.
How you can access Service Data relating to you in
Access to Service Data
.
How Google retains Service Data in
Deletion or Retention of Service Data
.
Japan Requirements
If Japanese data protection law (the Act on the Protection of Personal Information, “APPI”) applies to the processing of your Service Data, we provide the following additional information for users of the Services residing in Japan.
Controller of Service Data.
Any Service Data provided to or gathered by the Google Cloud Acquisitions is controlled primarily by the entities
listed below
.
Purpose of collection and use of Service Data.
The Google Cloud Acquisitions collects and uses Services Data for the purposes set out
here
and
here
.
Measures undertaken to protect retained personal information.
Establishment of general policy
The Google Cloud Acquisitions established and published this Privacy Notice outlining our general policy relating to Service Data.
Establishment of internal policy relating to handling of personal data
The Google Cloud Acquisitions established internal policies about handling measures and persons in charge and their responsibility etc. with regard to the acquisition, utilization, records, provision, deletion, etc., of personal data.
Internal organization as security control action
The Google Cloud Acquisitions and/or Google have large security and privacy teams responsible for developing, implementing, and reviewing internal personal data handling processes. Google Cloud Acquisitions and/or Google employees are trained to report suspected incidents involving personal data, which may be done through various channels such as through dedicated email addresses or digital platforms. A dedicated team assesses reported incidents, and as appropriate a coordinated team is assigned to manage the overall incident, including liaising with Legal and the product team as part of the investigation and response. The team on-call for an incident is assigned on a daily rotation. Incident responses may follow either a standard or an expedited route, depending on the severity and priority assigned to the incident.
Personnel measures as security control action
The Google Cloud Acquisitions and/or Google conduct periodical training for its employees about matters to consider when handling personal data.
Physical measures as security control action
The Google Cloud Acquisitions and/or Google take measures to prevent unauthorized persons from accessing personal data in any situation and to prevent theft or loss of devices and electronic media for handling personal data.
Technical measures as security control action
Please see
How we Secure Service Data
and
Deletion or Retention of Service Data
for further information on the security measures undertaken to secure, retain, and delete Service Data
.
Research of external environment
Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. The Google Cloud Acquisitions and/or Google have established a personal information protection system to ensure your information is accorded protections equivalent to APPI, as described in this Privacy Notice. We also comply with certain legal frameworks relating to the transfer of data, such as the European frameworks described above. For more detail, please see
Data Transfer Frameworks
. Further, with regard to the location of our data centers storing Service Data, please see
Where Service Data is Stored
(above). There may be cases where the Google Cloud Acquisitions or Google entrust the processing of information to subprocessors or its subsidiaries or affiliates. With regard to locations of Google offices, subsidiaries, and affiliates, please see
Google’s Office Locations
. With regard to the location of subprocessors, please see
Annex 1
(below).
Contact information.
For users of the Services residing in Japan that have any inquiries or requests about your Service Data related rights under applicable law, please email appi-inquiries-external@google.com.
When This Privacy Notice Applies
This Privacy Notice applies to Google Cloud Acquisition Service Data. This Privacy Notice does not apply to:
Products, sites, or services which are covered under a different privacy notice;
the information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services,
services offered by companies or individuals other than the Google Cloud Acquisitions.
Updates To This Notice
We may update this Privacy Notice from time to time. We will not make any significant changes without notifying you in advance by posting a prominent notice on this page describing the changes or by sending you a direct communication. We encourage you to regularly review this Privacy Notice, and we will always indicate the date the last changes were published.
Annex 1 - Applicable Google Cloud Acquisitions
Product or Service
Effective Date
Google Parent Company (Controller)
Affiliated Google Acquisition
Local
﻿
Representative(s)
Data Privacy Framework  Certification
DPO Contact
Subprocessors
Website
Looker (original)
September 14, 2023
Google LLC
Looker Data Sciences, Inc.
Google Cloud EMEA Ltd., located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (Registered Number: 660412).
Google UK Limited, located at Belgrave House, 76 Buckingham Palace Road, London, SW1W 9TQ, UK (Registered Number: 03977902)
.
Google LLC
Google Cloud Platform Data Privacy Inquiry
Subprocessors
Google.com
Cloud Skills Boost for Organizations
April 26, 2024
Google LLC
Qwiklabs Inc.
Google Cloud EMEA Ltd., located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (Registered Number: 660412).
Google UK Limited,  located at Belgrave House, 76 Buckingham Palace Road, London, SW1W 9TQ, UK (Registered Number: 03977902)
.
Google LLC
support@qwiklabs.com
Subprocessors
Google.com
Spectacles Services
December 12, 2024
Google LLC
Spectacles
Google Cloud EMEA Ltd.,  located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (Registered Number: 660412).
Google UK Limited,  located at Belgrave House, 76 Buckingham Palace Road, London, SW1W 9TQ, UK (Registered Number: 03977902)
.
*
cloud-pai @google.com
Subprocessors
Google.com
Product or Service
Effective Date
Google Parent Company (Controller)
Affiliated Google Acquisition
Local
﻿
Representative(s)
Data Privacy Framework  Certification
DPO Contact
Subprocessors
Website
Looker (original)
September 14, 2023
Google LLC
Looker Data Sciences, Inc.
Google Cloud EMEA Ltd., located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (Registered Number: 660412).
Google UK Limited, located at Belgrave House, 76 Buckingham Palace Road, London, SW1W 9TQ, UK (Registered Number: 03977902)
.
Google LLC
Google Cloud Platform Data Privacy Inquiry
Subprocessors
Google.com
Cloud Skills Boost for Organizations
April 26, 2024
Google LLC
Qwiklabs Inc.
Google Cloud EMEA Ltd., located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (Registered Number: 660412).
Google UK Limited,  located at Belgrave House, 76 Buckingham Palace Road, London, SW1W 9TQ, UK (Registered Number: 03977902)
.
Google LLC
support@qwiklabs.com
Subprocessors
Google.com
Spectacles Services
December 12, 2024
Google LLC
Spectacles
Google Cloud EMEA Ltd.,  located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (Registered Number: 660412).
Google UK Limited,  located at Belgrave House, 76 Buckingham Palace Road, London, SW1W 9TQ, UK (Registered Number: 03977902)
.
*
cloud-pai @google.com
Subprocessors
Google.com
Previous versions of Looker (original) Privacy Policy
February 14, 2022
,
September 25, 2020
,
June 17, 2020
,
March 17, 2020
,
February 17, 2020
,
February 1, 2019
,
May 31, 2018
,
July 30, 2017
Previous versions
(Last modified February 6, 2025)
December 12, 2024
July 16, 2024
September 20, 2023
Sub-policy 8
https://www.databricks.com/legal/privacynotice:
Skip to main content
Login
Why Databricks
Product
Solutions
Resources
About
Ready to get started?
Get a Demo
Login
Contact Us
Skip to main content
Overview
Terms
Master Cloud Services Agreement
Non-Disclouse Agreement
Acceptable Use Policy
External User Terms
US Public Sector Services
Community Edition Terms of Service
Partner Terms and Conditions
Website Terms of Use
Event Terms
Usage Commit Terms
Privacy
Data Processing Addendum
Amendment to Data Processing Addendum
Privacy Notice
International Data Transfers FAQ
Databricks Subprocessors
Cookie Notice
Applicant Privacy Notice
Security
Databricks Security
Security Addendum
Trust Center
Compliance and Ethics
Code of Conduct
Third Party Code of Conduct
Modern Slavery Statement
Pay Equity Report (France)
Gender Gap Report (UK)
Health and Safety Statement
Export Control Classification Number List
Subscribe to Updates
Privacy Notice
This Privacy Notice explains how Databricks, Inc. and its affiliates (“
Databricks
”, “
we
”, “
our
”, and “
us
”) collect, use, disclose and otherwise process your personal information (also known as personal data) in connection with the use of Databricks websites and applications that link to this Privacy Notice (the “
Sites
”), our data processing platform products and services (the “
Platform Services
”) and in the usual course of business, such as in connection with our events, sales, and marketing activities (collectively, the “
Services
”). It also contains information about your choices and privacy rights.
If you are a California resident, please see our
Supplemental Privacy Notice to California Residents
regarding your rights with respect to your personal information.
Our Services
We provide the Platform Services to our customers and users (collectively, “
Customers
”) under an agreement with them and solely for their benefit and the benefit of their personnel authorized to use the Platform Services (“
Authorized Users
”). Our processing of Customer data is governed by our agreement with the relevant Customer. This Privacy Notice does not apply to (i) the data we process on behalf of our customers (where we act as a data processor or service provider) that our Customers and its Authorized Users upload, submit or otherwise make available to the Platform Services, which is addressed by our agreements with our Customers; (ii) any products, services, websites, or content that are offered by third parties or that have their own privacy notice; or (iii) personal information that we collect and process in connection with our recruitment activities, which is covered under our
Applicant Privacy Notice
.
We recommend that you read this Privacy Notice in full to ensure that you are informed. However, if you only want to access a particular section of this Privacy Notice, you can click on the link below to go to that section.
Information We Collect About You
How We Use Your Information
How We Share Your Information
International Users and Transfers
Your Choices and Rights
Other Important Information
Changes to this Notice
How to Contact Us
Information We Collect About You
Information that we collect from or about you includes information you provide, information we collect automatically, and information we receive from other sources.
Information you provide
When using our Services, we may collect certain information, such as:
Identifiers: We collect your name, email address, phone number, and postal address to administer your account and provide our Services to you;
Employment-related information: We also collect information about your job title and company name.
Account information: If you create an account on the Services, we will collect your authentication information used to access the Services
Customer service and other interaction information: We will collect information that you provide through your interactions with us, for example if you request information about our Platform Services, interact with our sales team or contact customer support, complete a survey, provide feedback or post comments, register for an event, or take part in marketing activities. We may keep a record of your communications with us and other information you disclose during the course of the communications, such as a recording or transcript.
Commercial information: We keep records of your history of past purchases and transactions with us (e.g when you signed up for a free trial)
Financial information: we collect your credit card or other form of financial account information if chosen by you as a payment method, which may be collected by or disclosed to our third-party payment and billing service providers.
Information posted in public forums
Certain features of our Services make it possible for you to post content publicly or viewable by other users, such as through the Databricks Community or through other public forums. Any information you post openly in these ways will be available for viewing and use by other users.
Information we collect automatically
We use standard automated data collection tools, such as cookies, web beacons, tracking pixels, tags, and similar tools, to collect information about how people use our Sites and interact with our emails.
For example, when you visit our Sites we (or an authorized third party) may collect certain information from you or your device. This may include information about your computer or device (such as operating system, device identifier, browser language, and Internet Protocol (IP) address), and information about your activities on our Sites (such as how you came to our Sites, access times, the links you click on, browsing behavior, clicks and cursor movements, and other statistical information). We use this information to help us understand how you are using our Sites and how to better provide the Sites to you. We may also use web beacons and pixels in our emails. For example, we may place a pixel in our emails that notifies us when you click on a link in the email. We use these technologies to improve our communications. We may also use your IP address to derive your general location information.
When you use our Platform Services, we automatically collect information about how you are using the Platform Services (“Usage Data”). While most Usage Data is not personal information, it may include information about your account (such as User ID, email address, or Internet Protocol (IP) address) and information about your computer or device (such as browser type and operating system). It may also include information about your activities within the Platform Services, such as the pages or features you access or use, the time spent on those pages or features, search terms entered, commands executed, information about the types and size of files analyzed via the Platform Services, and other information relating to your use of the Platform Services. We collect Usage Data to provide, support and operate the Platform Services, for network and information security, and to better understand how our Authorized Users and Customers are using the Platform Services to improve our products and services.
We may also use the information we collect automatically (for example, IP address, and unique device identifiers) in combination with other information we collect directly from you as you interact with the Services or from other sources about you to identify the same unique person across Services to provide a more seamless and personalized experience to you.
The types of data collection tools we use may change over time as technology evolves. You can learn more about our use of cookies and similar tools, as well as how to opt out of certain data collection, by visiting our
Cookie Notice
.
Information we receive from other sources
We may obtain information about you from third party sources, including resellers, distributors, business partners, event sponsors, security and fraud detection services, social media platforms, and publicly available sources. Examples of information that we receive from third parties include marketing and sales information (such as name, email address, phone number and similar contact information), and purchase, support and other information about your interactions with our Services. We may combine such information with the information we receive and collect from you.
How We Use Your Information
We use your personal information to provide, maintain, improve and update our Services. Our purposes for collecting your personal information include:
To Provide the Services:
to provide, maintain, deliver and update the Services;
to create and maintain your Databricks account;
for billing, payment, or account management; for example, to identify your account and correctly identify your usage of our products and services;
to register and provide you with training and certification programs;
to provide you with customer service and support;
Sales and Marketing
for sales phone calls for training and coaching purposes, quality assurance and administration (in accordance with applicable laws), including to analyze sales calls using analytics tools to gain better insights into our interactions with customers;
to tailor and send you newsletters, emails and other content to promote our products and services (you can always unsubscribe from our marketing emails by clicking
here
) and to allow third party partners (like our event sponsors) to send you marketing communications about their services, in accordance with your preferences;
To Communicate with You
to send you notifications about the Services, including technical notices, updates, security alerts, administrative messages and invoices;
to respond to your questions, comments, and requests, including to keep in contact with you regarding the products and services you use;
to contact you to conduct surveys, receive your feedback, conduct audits, and for market research purposes;
Online Advertising
for online advertising purposes; for example, to display and measure advertising on third party websites;
Personalization and Service Improvement
to personalize your experience when using our Services;
to measure your use of and improve Services, and to develop new products and services;
to generate and analyze statistical information about how our Sites and Platform Services are used in the aggregate;
Legal and Security Purposes
to investigate security issues, prevent fraud, or combat the illegal or controlled uses of our products and services, including within our learning and certification programs;
to comply with our obligations under applicable law, legal process, or government regulation
With Your Consent
We will also use your information for other purposes, where you have given consent for such uses.
De-Identified/Anonymized Information.
We may de-identify or anonymize information we collect so the information cannot reasonably identify you or your device, or we may collect information that is already in de-identified or anonymized form. Except as otherwise prohibited by applicable law, our use and disclosure of de-identified and anonymized information is not subject to any restrictions under this Privacy Notice, and we may use and disclose it to others for any purpose, without limitation.
How We Disclose Your Information
We may disclose your personal information to third parties as follows:
Affiliates:
with our affiliates and subsidiaries for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice;
Service Providers:
with our service providers who assist us in providing the Services, such as billing, payment card processing, customer support, sales and marketing, and data analysis, subject to appropriate contractual prohibitions on their use of your information. We also disclose information to service providers who assist us with detecting and preventing fraud, security threats or other illegal or malicious behavior;
Third-Party Partners and Sponsors:
with third party business partners, such as resellers, distributors, and/or referral partners, who are involved in providing content, products or services to our prospects or Customers. We may also engage with third party partners who are working with us to organize or sponsor an event to which you have registered to enable them to contact you about the event or their services (but only where we have a lawful basis to do so, such as your consent where required by applicable law);
Online Advertising Partners:
with online advertising providers that tailor online ads to your interests based on information they collect about your online activity over time and across different services (known as targeting online advertising);
Sponsoring Organizations:
with the organization that is sponsoring a training or certification program that you take through the Services (e.g., your employer), for example to notify them of your registration and completion of the course;
For legal purposes:
when authorized by law or we deem necessary in good faith to comply with legal process; when required to protect and defend the rights or property of Databricks or our Customers, including the security of our Sites, products and services (including the Platform Services); or when necessary to protect the personal safety, property or other rights of the public, Databricks or our Customers;
With your consent:
when you instruct us to do so or where you have consented to the disclosure of your information with third parties; or
Business Transactions:
we may engage in transactions with other companies involving the sale of assets or parts of our business. We may disclose your information as part of, or in contemplation of, such transactions. If a portion or all of our assets are transferred to a third party in connection with such transactions, your information may be among the transferred assets, including in the course of activities leading up to such transactions.
International Users and Transfers
Databricks may transfer your personal information to countries other than your country of residence. In particular, we may transfer your personal information to the United States and other countries where our affiliates, business partners and services providers are located. These countries may have different data protection laws to the country where you reside.
Wherever we process your personal information, we take appropriate steps to ensure it is protected in accordance with this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection laws. The safeguards we use include implementing the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses for transfers of personal information from the EEA or Switzerland between us and our business partners and service providers, and equivalent measures for transfers of personal information from the United Kingdom and other global jurisdictions with similar transfer requirements. Databricks also offers our Customers the ability to enter into a
data processing addendum (DPA)
that contains standard contractual clauses, for transfers between us and our Customers. We also make use of supplementary measures to ensure your information is adequately protected.
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Databricks complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Databricks has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Databricks has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
. To learn more, visit our Data Privacy Framework Notice
here
.
Information for EU, UK, and Swiss Users
If you are located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland, the controller of your personal information is Databricks, Inc., 160 Spear Street, Suite 1300, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States.
We only collect your personal information if we have a legal basis for doing so. The legal basis that we rely on depends on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. Generally, we collect and process your personal information where:
We need it to enter into or perform a contract with you, such as to provide you with the Platform Services, respond to your request, or provide you with customer support;
We need to process your personal information to comply with a legal obligation (such as to comply with applicable legal, tax and accounting requirements) or to protect the vital interests of you or other individuals;
You give us your consent, such as to receive certain marketing communications; or
Where we have a legitimate interest, such as to respond to your requests and inquiries, to ensure the security of the Sites and Platform Services, to detect and prevent fraud, to maintain, customize and improve the Sites and Platform Services, to promote Databricks and our Platform Services, and to defend our interests and rights.
You have a right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority regarding our data processing activities.
Your Choices and Rights
We offer you choices regarding the collection, use and disclosure of your personal information and we will respect the choices you make in accordance with applicable law. Please note that if you decide not to provide us with certain personal information, you may not be able to access certain features of the Sites or use the Platform Services.
Account information
If you want to correct, update or delete your account information, please log on to your Databricks account and update your profile.
Opt out of marketing
We may periodically send you marketing communications that promote our products and services consistent with your choices. You may opt out from receiving such communications, either by following the unsubscribe instructions in the communication you receive or by clicking
here
. Please note that it may take us some time to process your request in accordance with applicable law, and that we may still send you important service-related communications regarding our products or services, such as communications about your subscription or account, service announcements or security information.
Your privacy rights
Depending upon your place of residence, you may have rights in relation to your personal information. Depending on applicable data protection laws, those rights may include asking for:
Access to, or a copy of, your information (where feasible, in a portable, machine-readable form)
Confirmation that we are processing your information
Correction or amendment of your information
Deletion of your information
Transfer of your information to a third party
Restriction or objection to certain uses of your information
The withdrawal of consent to processing your information for certain purposes that were originally based on your consent
Opt out of the processing of your personal information for profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, if applicable.
If you (or an authorized agent acting on your behalf) wish to exercise any of your rights under applicable data protection laws, submit a request online by completing the request form
here
or by calling +1 833 338 0670, our toll-free hotline. We will respond to requests that we receive in accordance with applicable laws. Databricks may take certain steps to verify your request using information available to us, such as your email address or other information associated with your Databricks account, and if needed we may ask you to provide additional information for the purposes of verifying your request. Any information you provide to us for verification purposes will only be used to process and maintain a record of your request. Depending on the laws applicable to your request, if you are not satisfied with our response to your request, you may have the ability to appeal our response. If an appeal right is applicable to you, we will let you know in our response to you.
As described above, we may also process personal information that has been submitted by a Customer to our Platform Services. If your personal information has been submitted to the Platform Services by or on behalf of a Databricks Customer and you wish to exercise your privacy rights, please direct your request to the relevant Customer.
Notice of Right to Opt Out of Data "Sales" and "Targeted Advertising"
Depending on your location, you may have the right to opt out of the "sale" of your personal information or the disclosure of your personal information for purposes of online targeted advertising (our online advertising activities are explained further in our
Cookies Notice
). We do not "sell" personal information in the traditional sense of exchanging information for monetary payment. However, because the definitions of “sale” and “targeted advertising" under applicable law may include the disclosure of your information to certain types of advertising and marketing partners, we provide the right to opt-out of these activities. To opt out of such disclosures based on cookies and similar tools, visit our "Your Privacy Choices" page accessible via a link on our website footer. To opt out of “sale” or “sharing” activities that are not based on cookies, use the following
form
. We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the Personal Information of individuals under 16 years of age.
Other Important Information
Notice to Authorized Users
Our Platform Services are intended to be used by organizations. Where the Platform Services are made available to you through an organization (e.g., your employer), that organization is the administrator of the Platform Services and responsible for the accounts and/or services over which it has control. For example, administrators can access and change information in your account or restrict and terminate your access to the Platform Services. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of an administrator's organization, which may be different from this Privacy Notice. Please contact your organization or refer to your organization's policies for more information.
Data Retention
Databricks retains the personal information described in this Privacy Notice for as long as you use our Services, as may be required by law (for example, to comply with applicable legal tax or accounting requirements), as necessary for other legitimate business or commercial purposes described in this Privacy Notice (for example, to resolve disputes or enforce our agreements), or as otherwise communicated to you.
Security
We are committed to protecting your information. We use a variety of technical, physical, and organizational security measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information. However, no security measures are perfect or impenetrable. As such, we cannot guarantee the security of your information.
Third Party Services
Our Services may contain links to third party websites, applications, services, or social networks (including co-branded websites or products that are maintained by one of our business partners). We may also make available certain features that allow you to sign into our Sites using third party login credentials (such as LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter and Google+) or access third party services from our Platform Services (such as Github). Any information that you choose to submit to third party services is not covered by this Privacy Notice. We encourage you to read the terms of use and privacy notices of use of such third party services before disclosing your information with them to understand how your information may be collected and used.
Children's Data
The Sites and Platform Services are not directed to children under 18 years of age and Databricks does not knowingly collect personal information from children under 18. If we learn that we have collected any personal information from children under 18, we will take steps to delete such information. If you are aware that a child has submitted us such information, please contact us using the details provided below.
Changes to this Notice
Databricks may change this Privacy Notice from time to time. We will post any changes on this page and, if we make material changes, provide a more prominent notice (for example, by adding a statement to the website landing page, providing notice through the Platform Services login screen, or by emailing you). You can see the date on which the latest version of this Privacy Notice was posted below. If you disagree with any changes to this Privacy Notice, you should stop using the Services and deactivate your Databricks account.
How to Contact Us
Please contact us at privacy@databricks.com if you have any questions about our privacy practices or this Privacy Notice. You can also write to us at Databricks Inc., 160 Spear Street, Suite 1300, San Francisco, CA 94105 Attn: Privacy. If you interact with Databricks through or on behalf of your organization, then your personal information may also be subject to your organization’s privacy practices and you should direct any questions to that organization.
Last updated:
March 4, 2024
We Care About Your Privacy
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Manage Preferences
Reject all cookies
Accept all cookies
Sub-policy 9
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 10
https://support.google.com/analytics/topic/2919631?hl=en&ref_topic=1008008&sjid=4571096608530273918-EU:
Skip to main content
Data privacy and security
Safeguarding your data
Privacy controls in Google Analytics
[GA4] Data redaction
Introduction to user consent management
[GA4] Verify and update consent settings in Google Analytics
[GA4] Behavioral modeling for consent mode
Google Analytics opt-out browser add-on
[UA] IP masking in Universal Analytics [Legacy]
[GA4] Policy requirements for Google Analytics Advertising Features
Data Processing Terms
We use our own products
Data retention
[GA4] Data-deletion requests
Data deletion requests (Universal Analytics) [Legacy]
ISO 27001 Certification
Google Analytics links overview
Account setup with additional privacy features
Best practices to avoid sending Personally Identifiable Information (PII)
Data Transparency Policy Against Fingerprints and Locally Shared Objects
Data controls in Universal Analytics
Data controls in Google Analytics 4
[GA4] EU-focused data and privacy
HIPAA and Google Analytics
Data sharing settings
Post to the help community
Get answers from community members
Contact us
Tell us more and we’ll help you get there
3753867952531906295
true
Search Help Center
true
true
true
Google Help
Help Center
Get started with Analytics
Collect and manage data
Report and explore
Advertising and attribution
Audiences and remarketing
Manage accounts, properties, and users
Google Analytics 360
Migrate from UA to GA4 [Legacy]
Policies and data privacy
Community
Analytics
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Submit feedback
Introduction to Analytics
Set up Analytics
Guides and videos
Troubleshoot
Glossary
Events and key events
Import data from external systems
Integrations
Measure ecommerce
Measure lead generation
[GA4] First-party data
Reports
Explorations
Dimensions and metrics
Analytics Intelligence
The Analytics app
How data is stored and displayed
Regular expressions [Legacy]
Understand advertising
Understand attribution
Manage and configure attribution
iOS conversion measurement
[GA4] Set up audiences
[GA4] Use audiences for advertising and remarketing
[GA4] Audiences for common marketing objectives
[GA4] Troubleshoot audiences
[GA4] Subproperties
[GA4] Roll-up properties
[GA4] Subproperties
[GA4] Roll-up properties
How data is stored and displayed
Data privacy and security
Search
Clear search
Close search
Main menu
Google apps
true
true
69256
Send feedback on...
This help content & information
General Help Center experience
false
Sub-policy 11
https://www.algolia.com/policies/privacy/:
Brand guidelines
Download logo pack
Privacy Policy
Relating to the use of Algolia's Website and Services.
Select Policy
Terms of Service
Service Level Agreement
Privacy Policy
Support Policy
Acceptable Use Policy
Legal Information
Cookies
Infrastructure & Sub-Processors
Effective Date: March 3rd, 2025
We take our obligation to protect the privacy of your personal information seriously.
Your personal information will be treated in a secure and confidential manner in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.
When you use Algolia Websites and Services (as defined below), we receive information that may directly or indirectly identify you (“personal information” or “personal data”).
This privacy policy (this “Privacy Policy”) governs and describes how Algolia, Inc. and its subsidiaries (“Algolia”, “we,” “us” or “our”) may collect, use, and disclose personal information that we obtain through or from:
https://www.algolia.com/
and all websites within that domain (such as
https://status.algolia.com
,
https://www.algolia.com/blog/
,
https://community.algolia.com/
,
https://algolia.com/doc/
and
https://www.algolia.com/users/sign_up
(our “Websites”) and mobile applications,
individuals that register to attend our marketing or corporate events or receive our marketing materials (“Marketing Activities”),
third-party sources such as data brokers, publicly available sources, and our partners,
our subscribers’ personnel who register to use our Services (including through our Services user interface dashboard registration forms on our Websites), and
subscriber data submitted to our hosted search or related services (the “Services”) by our subscribers or their internet clients or end users, or that we collect through our Services on behalf of our subscribers. Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and describes how Algolia collects, uses and discloses the personal information submitted to our Services by our subscribers (or their internet clients or end users) or that we collect through our Services (on behalf of our subscribers), which use by our subscribers is governed by our subscription agreements with our subscribers.
In this Policy we will explain:
What types of personal information Algolia collects and how it is used.
How Algolia collects your personal information, including whether personal information is collected automatically.
How long Algolia retains your personal information.
How and when Algolia shares your personal information with others.
How Algolia protects your personal information.
What choices and rights are available to you regarding the use of your personal information, including how to access and update personal information.
How personal information submitted to our Services or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers is treated.
How to update your communication preferences.
Whether children under the age of 13 are permitted to use our Services.
Contact Information
Depending on the context of personal information you provide, Algolia may be the data controller (“controller”) or data processor (“processor”) of your personal information under this policy. Algolia is a processor of personal information submitted to the Services or collected through the Services on behalf of or at the direction of subscribers. If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy or our privacy practices, including the processing of your personal information, if you would like to exercise your data rights under applicable laws, or if you believe your privacy rights have been violated, please contact Algolia at
privacy@algolia.com
, or:
Algolia, Inc.
3790 El Camino Real
Unit #518
Palo Alto, CA 94306
Algolia SAS
55 Rue d'Amsterdam
75008 Paris
France
Algolia Limited
1 Primrose St, London
EC2A 2EX
UK
1. What types of personal information does Algolia collect?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on which of our Websites or Marketing Activities you use. In general, we may collect information that identifies you, information about how you use our Websites, and the information that you create while you interact with our Websites.
Information that we collect from you may include the following:
Information that can personally identify you, such as name, photograph, postal address, email address, or telephone number.
Information about your Internet connection, the equipment you use to access our Websites, and your use of our Websites.
Information that you provide when you fill in forms on our Websites (e.g. name, email address or other information requested in the form).
Information that identifies you in planning and hosting corporate events related to our Marketing Activities (e.g., user conferences).
Records and copies of your correspondence (including email addresses and Twitter handles), if you contact us.
Your responses to surveys that we might ask you to complete for research purposes.
Details of transactions you carry out through our Websites or related to orders of our Services.
You also may provide information as a contributing user that is published or displayed (hereafter, referred to as "posted") on public areas of our Websites, on the Algolia Community site, or transmitted to other users of our Websites or third-parties. Your user contributions are posted and transmitted to others at your own risk.
2. How does Algolia use my personal information
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia uses personal information that you provide to us to deliver content on our Websites, plan and host Marketing Activities, and to provide our Services.
We may use this information in the following ways:
To present our Websites and their contents to you.
To allow you to participate in interactive features on our Websites.
To enhance the experience of using our Websites, Services, and Marketing Activities.
To manage your access to the Services.
To carry out our obligations and enforce our rights that arise from any contracts entered into between you and us, including for billing and collection.
To provide you with notices about your account and/or subscription, including expiration and renewal notices.
To notify you about changes to our Websites or Services.
To provide you with information or services that you request from us.
To communicate with you about Marketing Activities, which may include promotional information.
To send promotional information and other communications regarding our products or Services.
To create a list of actual and prospective users and subscribers for our products or Services.
To assemble statistics regarding the use of our Websites, product or Services.
To prevent fraud or abuse.
To comply with any legal or regulatory obligations.
For any other purpose we describe at the time we collect information.
For any reason you engage us.
For any other purpose with your consent.
3. How does Algolia collect my personal information?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia may directly collect personal information you provide us in the following ways:
When you complete forms on our Websites, such as registering an account, subscribing to a Service, or posting a comment.
When you create an account to use our Services or create a new user for that account.
When you complete transactions through our Websites, such as fulfilling an order for our Services.
When you perform search queries on our Websites.
When you post messages on our Websites, either in public areas or directly to other users or third-parties.
When you use our publicly accessible blogs.
When you contact us outside of our Websites, such via email or Twitter.
When you request assistance from our Support team.
When you respond to surveys we ask you to complete for research purposes.
When you provide information that will be posted on public areas of our Websites.
When you transmit information to other users of our Websites or third-parties as a user contribution.
When you register for or attend our Marketing Activities.
Third-Parties and Data Supplementation
To the extent allowed by law, Algolia may collect personal information about you from other third-party sources. We may maintain this information or associate it with personal information we already have about you (“data supplementation”). This information helps us to improve our Websites, to deliver better and more personalized Services, to update, expand, and analyze our records, identify new customers, and provide products and services that may be of interest to you. To the extent we combine such third-party sourced information with information we already have about you, we will treat the combined information in accordance with the practices described under this Privacy Policy and any additional restrictions imposed by the source of the data.
Third-party sources we may use vary over time, but have included or may include:
Data brokers from which we purchase demographic data to supplement the information we collect.
Social networks when you reference our Services or grant permission to Algolia to access your data on one or more of these services.
Our partners with whom we may offer co-branded services, sell or distribute our Services, or engage in joint marketing activities.
Publicly-available sources or data in the public domain.
Examples of the types of personal information that may be obtained from public sources or purchased from third-parties and combined with information we already have about you, may include:
contact information about you from third-party sources to verify your address so we can properly prevent fraud or communicate with you, or
data purchased from third-parties, such as social networking sites and conference attendee lists, that is combined with information we already have about you, to create more tailored advertising and products.
We are not responsible for the accuracy of any information provided by third-parties or third-party policies or practices.
Financial Information
We use third-party payment processors to process payments made to us. In connection with the processing of such payments, we do not retain any personally identifiable information or any financial information such as credit card numbers. Rather, all such information is provided directly to our third-party processors. Our third-party processors currently include Stripe, and Stripe’s privacy policy can be viewed at
https://stripe.com/us/privacy
.
4. Does Algolia collect personal information automatically?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
As is true of most websites, Algolia gathers certain information automatically as you navigate through and interact with our Websites. This information helps us to improve and personalize our Websites, Marketing Activities, and Services, as well as prevent fraud or abuse. This information may be gathered and stored in log files.
Information that we collect from you automatically may include the following:
Internet Protocol (IP) addresses,
Internet Service Provider (ISP),
browser type,
referring/exit pages,
operating system,
date/time stamp, and/or
browsing actions and browsing patterns.
Cookies
Algolia and our partners use cookies or similar technologies to analyze trends, administer our Websites and Services, track users' movements around our Websites and Services, and to gather demographic information about our user base as a whole. A cookie is a small piece of information that is placed on your device when you visit certain websites. You can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level, but if you choose to disable cookies, it may limit your use of certain features or functions on our Websites or Services.
For more information on how Algolia uses cookies, refer to
https://www.algolia.com/policies/cookies/
.
[ Open cookie settings ]
For more information on third-party cookies, refer to Section 6 of this Privacy Policy.
5. How long does Algolia keep my personal information?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia may retain your personal information for a period of time consistent with the original purpose of collection. For instance, we may retain your personal information during the time you have an account to use our Websites or Services, or as agreed in our subscription agreements, and for a reasonable period of time thereafter. We also may retain your personal information during the period of time needed for Algolia to pursue our legitimate business interests, conduct audits, comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
6. When and how does Algolia share my personal information with others?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia may share your personal information with certain third-parties. This sharing is based on our relationship with those third-parties, your consent, or legal or contractual obligations that require us to share such information.
We may share your personal information that we collect or you provide as follows:
To our subsidiaries and affiliates for the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy.
To contractors, service providers such as Stripe and Intercom, and other third-parties we use to support our business. These entities are bound by contractual obligations to keep personal information confidential and can use it only for the purposes for which we disclose the information to them.
When you create an account on our community forum. Please note that the information you share in public areas of our Websites may be viewed by any user of our Websites.
To a buyer or other successor in the event of a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of Algolia’s assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation or similar proceeding, in which personal information held by Algolia about our Websites users is among the assets transferred. You will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on our Websites of any change in ownership or uses of your personal information, as well as any choices you may have regarding your personal information.
To comply with any court order, law, or legal process (such as a subpoena), to investigate fraud, including responding to any government or regulatory request, lawful requests by public authorities, or to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
To enforce or apply our Terms of Service and other subscription agreements, including for billing and collection purposes.
If we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to protect the rights, property, or safety of Algolia, our subscribers or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction.
For any other purpose disclosed by us when you provide the information.
With your consent.
Algolia may disclose aggregated statistical data that does not contain Personal Data with third-parties.
Algolia partners with third-parties that serve content or applications. These partners, including (i) third-parties that either display advertising on our Websites or manage our advertising on other sites and (ii) applications providers such as Github, may collect your information as you interact with them through our Websites. Such third-party partners may also use cookies or similar technologies in order to provide you advertising based upon your browsing activities and interests. If you wish to opt out of interest-based advertising, click
here
(or if located in the European Union click
here
). Please note you will continue to receive generic ads.
You may login to our Websites using a sign-in service such as your Github profile, Google profile, or Heroku profile. These services authenticate your identity and provide you the option to share certain personal information with us such as your name and email address to pre-populate our sign-in form and collection of your personal information may occur as a result of login to our Websites using these sign-in services.
From time to time, we may include links to other websites whose privacy practices may differ from ours. If you submit personal information to any of those sites, your information will be governed by such third-party’s privacy policies. Please carefully read the privacy policy of any website you visit.
7. How does Algolia keep my information secure?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia will maintain appropriate technical and organizational security measures designed to protect your personal information from accidental loss, unauthorized use, alteration, or disclosure. Although we implement and maintain security measures that are appropriate for our business activities, please be aware that no security measures are perfect or impenetrable and any transmission of personal information is at your own risk. You may review the most up to date version of our security measures at
https://www.algolia.com/distributed-secure/security-compliance/
.
You must also make sure that your information is safe and secure. We are not responsible if you circumvent any privacy settings or security measures on our Websites. Even if we give you (or you have chosen) a password for access to certain parts of our Websites, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. Do not share your password with anyone. Please be careful about giving out information in public areas of our Websites, for example, community message boards or forums. The information you share in public areas may be viewed by any user of our Websites. We cannot control the actions of other users of our Websites with whom you choose to share your information; as such we cannot guarantee your contributed information cannot be viewed by unauthorized parties.
8. What choices and rights are available to me regarding the use of my personal information?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers. In regards to personal information we process on behalf of our subscribers, please contact the applicable subscriber directly as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
By using our Websites, Services, and Marketing Activities you expressly give your consent for the collection and use of your personal information in compliance with this Privacy Policy. This does not affect lawful processing under applicable laws based on other legal basis such as contractual obligation, compliance with applicable laws, and legitimate purposes.
If you receive a marketing communication or promotion from us, you may opt-out of these communications at any time (i) by following the unsubscribe instructions included in the promotion (if sent by email), (ii) through
Algolia preference page
, (iii) by accessing the email preferences in your account settings page in the Services user interface dashboard, or (iv) sending us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to Access or Correct Personal Information
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding the modification or correction of your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
You have the right to access and correct your personal information. If you want to review or correct your personal information, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and visit your account profile page, typically designated as “My Account”, or contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to Delete Personal Information (“Right to be Forgotten”)
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding the removal of your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
You have the right to request deletion of personal information we hold about you and we have the obligation to erase your personal information, where:
the personal information is no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which it was collected or otherwise processed,
you withdraw consent on which the processing is based and where there is no other legal ground for the processing,
you object to the processing and there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing,
the personal information has been unlawfully processed, or
the personal information has to be erased for compliance with a legal obligation in the European Union or a Member State law to which Algolia is subject.
If you want to request removal of your personal information from our Websites or Services, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above. You can also request closure of your account. We will respond to your request within 30 days.
In some cases, we may not be able to remove your personal information, in which case we will let you know that we are unable to do so and why.
Right to Data Portability
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding the data portability of your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
You have the right to receive or transfer a copy of your personal information, where:
we are relying upon your consent or the fact that the processing is necessary for the performance of a contract to which you are party as the legal basis for the processing, and
personal information is processed by automatic means.
This copy will be provided to you in a common machine-readable format. You may also require us to transmit it to another party where this is technically feasible.
If you want to request a copy of your personal information, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to Restrict Personal Information Processing
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding the restriction of processing of your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
You have the right to request the restriction of processing of your personal information, where:
you contest the accuracy of the personal information until we take sufficient steps to correct or verify its accuracy,
where the processing is unlawful but you do not want us to erase the personal information,
where we no longer need the personal information for the purposes of the processing, but you require the information for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, or
where you have objected to processing justified on legitimate interest grounds (see below) pending verification as to whether Algolia has compelling legitimate grounds to continue processing.
Where personal information is subjected to restriction in this way we will only process it with your consent or for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims. This right includes restricting the processing of your personal information to only include storage of your personal information (e.g. during the time when Algolia assesses whether you are entitled to have personal information erased).
If you want to request restriction of processing of your personal information, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to object to processing justified on legitimate interest grounds
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding objections to processing your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
Where we are relying upon legitimate interest to process personal information, you have the right to object to that processing. If you object, we must stop that processing unless we can either demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing that override your interests, rights and freedoms or where we need to process the personal information for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims. Where we rely upon legitimate interest as a basis for processing we believe that we can demonstrate such compelling legitimate grounds, but we will consider each case on an individual basis.
If you want to object to the processing of your personal information, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to be informed of the appropriate safeguards where personal information are transferred to a third country or to an international organization
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding safeguards when transferring your personal information to a third country as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
Refer to the Terms of Service for information on the safeguards that have been put in place to protect your personal information for transfer outside of the European Economic Area. For transfers to countries without an adequacy decision by the European Commission, Algolia puts appropriate safeguards through contractual obligations.
Right to Withdraw Consent
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding withdrawing consent for processing your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
Where you have provided us with your consent to process personal information, you have the right to withdraw such consent at any time, without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
You can do this by:
using certain web browser and opt-out options discussed in this Privacy Policy to limit the personal information you provide to us or our third-party partners (please see Section 4 “Does Algolia collect personal information automatically?”, Section 6 “When and how does Algolia share my personal information with others?” and Section 10 "Communication Preferences and Subscriptions”),
logging into the appropriate Website or Service and contacting us through the Support Center,
following the unsubscribe instructions included in emails,
through
Algolia preference page
,
by accessing the email preferences in your account settings page in the Services user interface dashboard, or
sending us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to Submit Complaints or Report Abuse
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority, in particular in your country of residence, if you consider that the processing of your personal information infringes applicable laws.
If you need to report abuse, please contact us by email at
abuse@algolia.com
.
California Privacy Rights
California Civil Code Section § 1798.83 permits users of our Websites and Services that are California residents to opt-out from the disclosure of your personal information to third-parties for their direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Please be advised that where California State residents opt-out from permitting their personal information to be shared, such individuals may still receive selected offers directly from us, in accordance with applicable law.
9. Subscriber Data submitted to our Services or collected through our Services (on behalf of our subscribers)
Algolia subscribers electronically submit (or cause to be submitted) data to the Services for hosting, indexing and related processing. Algolia processes data only as provided in our subscription agreements with our subscribers, such as our Terms of Service available at
https://www.algolia.com/policies/terms/
and our Data Processing Agreement available at
https://www.algolia.com/pdf/DPA-latest.pdf
. Additional information about our privacy and security practices with respect to our Services is available in our security and compliance documentation available at
https://www.algolia.com/distributed-secure/security-compliance/
.
As subscribers (or in some cases their internet clients or end users) control the data to be processed, Algolia’s network, platform, and Services may be used as a conduit for information.
The use of personal information collected through our Services at the direction of our subscribers shall be limited to the purpose of providing the Services for which the subscriber has engaged Algolia.
Although Algolia collects personal information related to subscriber personnel as they configure a subscriber’s use of our Services, Algolia has no direct relationship with individuals whose personal information is hosted or transmitted through the Services by subscribers or their permitted internet clients or end users. Subscribers are responsible for complying with any regulations or laws that require providing notice, disclosure, and/or obtaining consent prior to transferring the data to Algolia for processing purposes.
Algolia also collects, uses, and discloses personal information of individuals who visit our Websites (“Visitors”) and individual representatives of our subscribers, suppliers, and business partners (“Business Contacts”). This Section 9 does not apply to personal information associated with Visitors and Business Contacts collected, stored, and processed by Algolia which are governed by the other provisions of this Privacy Policy.
Choice
Our Services collect personal information for our subscribers. As a data processor of this personal information on our subscriber’s behalf, Algolia has limited ability to access personal information our subscribers submit to our Services. If you are a data subject for whom a subscriber has submitted personal information to the Services and would like your information not to be disclosed to a third-party or to be used for a purpose that is materially different from the purpose(s) for which the personal information was originally collected, then you should contact the subscriber directly. Concerns with personal information hosted or transmitted at the direction of our subscribers may be reported according to our acceptable use policy available at
https://www.algolia.com/distributed-secure/security-compliance/
. We will refer your requests to the appropriate subscriber.
Sub-processor Accountability
Algolia is responsible for the processing of personal information it receives, and subsequently transfers to a third-party acting as an agent on its behalf in accordance with our subscription agreements. Algolia may use from time to time third-party service providers, contractors, and sub-processors to assist in providing the Services on our behalf. Algolia maintains contracts with these third-parties restricting their access, use, and disclosure of personal information.
Security Measures
Algolia maintains administrative, physical, and technical safeguards to protect data submitted to the Services, including personal information. These security measures are set forth in our security and compliance documentation available at
https://www.algolia.com/distributed-secure/security-compliance/
.
Subscriber Data Integrity and Purpose Limitation
As a data processor, Algolia hosts, transmits, discloses, and processes data, which may include personal information about EU personnel of our subscribers administering, using or supporting the Services. Algolia may process data to provide the Services, to prevent or address technical or service problems, to follow the instructions of our subscribers and their personnel who submitted the personal information, or in response to contractual or legal requirements. Algolia does not control or own the data submitted by its subscribers, or their internet clients or end users, to the Services. Algolia may share personal information with its subsidiaries, contractors, or third-parties if Algolia undergoes a business transaction, such as a merger, acquisition by another company or sale of all or substantially all of its assets.
Data Subject Rights to Subscriber Data
Algolia acknowledges that you have the right to access your personal information. Algolia has no direct relationship with the individuals whose personal information our Services process on behalf of our subscribers. An individual who seeks access, or who seeks to correct, amend, or delete inaccurate personal information should direct his or her query to the appropriate subscriber (i.e., the data controller). Subscribers have the ability to fulfill these requests, and Algolia will provide assistance for requests that subscribers are not able to complete. If the subscriber requests that Algolia remove the personal information, we will refer your request to the applicable subscriber and we will respond to the request within 30 days.
Subscriber Data Retention
Algolia retains the personal information we process on behalf of our subscribers for as long as needed to provide the Services to our subscribers and in accordance with our subscription agreements. To the extent not deleted by our subscribers, Algolia may also retain and use certain personal information for a reasonable period of time thereafter as necessary to pursue our legitimate business interests, conduct audits, comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
10. Communication Preferences and Subscriptions
Algolia offers visitors of its Websites and Services, personnel of our subscribers whose personal information is collected through our Websites or Services, and attendees or recipients of Marketing Activities a means to choose how we use the information provided. You may choose to stop receiving or participating in Marketing Activities, including newsletters, by following the unsubscribe instructions included in emails, through
Algolia preference page
, by accessing the email preferences in your account settings page in the Services user interface dashboard, or sending us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
11. Children under the age of 13
Our Websites and Services are not intended for children under 13 years old. No one under age 13 years old may provide any personal information to or on the Websites and Services.
We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 13 years old. If you are under 13 years old, do not use or provide any information on our Websites or Services including on or through any of their features, register on the Websites or Services, make any purchases through the Websites or Services, use any of the interactive or public comment features of our Websites or Services, or provide any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, email address, or any screen name or user name you may use. If we learn we have collected or received personal information from a child under 13 years old, we will delete that information without undue delay.
If you believe we might have any information from or about a child under 13 years old, please contact us using the information in the “Contact Information” section above.
12. Dispute Resolution
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that Algolia has not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.trustarc.com/watchdog/request
.
13. Modifications
Algolia reserves the right to modify this Privacy Policy at any time. It is our policy to post any changes we make to this Privacy Policy on this page and the changes will be effective upon Algolia’s publication of the updated Privacy Policy except as described below. If Algolia makes material changes to how we treat your personal information, we will notify you by email (sent to the email address specified in your account) or by means of a notice on this page thirty (30) days prior to the change becoming effective. However, changes made to comply with applicable laws will be effective immediately. You are responsible for ensuring we have an up-to-date email address for you and periodically visiting this page to check for any changes to our Privacy Policy. Your continued use of the Websites and the Services expressly indicates your acceptance of Algolia’s then-current Privacy Policy and your consent to Algolia’s collection of personal information in accordance with the then-current Privacy Policy.
If you have questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy, please contact Algolia using the information in the “Contact Information” section above. The date this Privacy Policy was last revised is identified at the top of the page.
Previous Versions:
Version 1 (June 10, 2013)
Version 2 (August 19, 2013)
Version 3 (July 4, 2016)
Version 4 (May 25, 2018)
Version 5 (January 29, 2021)
We use cookies to improve your experience and for marketing.
Read more here.
Reject all
Accept all
Adjust settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 12
https://www.zendesk.co.uk/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-notice/#:
Skip to main content
Agreements and Terms
Policies and Guidelines
Trademarks and Intellectual Property
Procurement and Suppliers
Data Protection and Privacy
Customer Agreements and User Terms for Products and Services
Main Services Agreement
Region-Specific Terms
Professional Services Terms
How We Protect Your Service Data (Enterprise Services)
How We Protect Your Service Data (Innovation Services)
Innovation Services List
Application Developer and API Licence Agreement
Marketplace Terms of Use
Assignments and Transfers
Reseller Subscription Services Agreement
Data Protection and Privacy
Zendesk Trust Centre
Privacy Notice
Cookie Notice
Data Processing Agreement
CCPA Addendum PowerForm
LGPD Addendum Powerform
BAA Powerform
Government Data Request Policy
Policies
Data Deletion Policy
Promotional Credits Policy
Regional Data Hosting Policy
Sub-processor Policy
Zendesk User Content and Conduct Policy
Product Terms
Accessibility Policy
In-Product Cookies Policy
Service-Specific Terms
Free Trial and Beta Services Terms
Free Trials
Beta Services
Privacy Notice
Effective Date:
20 February 2024
For the prior version of our Privacy Notice, click
here
.
For the prior version of our Zendesk Events Policy, click
here
.
Hello! Zendesk is a service-first CRM company that builds software designed to improve customer relationships. We’ve developed this Privacy Notice (“
Notice
”) to explain to you how we collect, use, disclose, and store personal data.
This Notice
only
applies when Zendesk is the Controller of personal data (example: Zendesk website visitors’ personal data and business-to-business contact data).
Zendesk is a
Processor
, not a Controller, of personal data that we process on behalf of our Subscribers when they use Zendesk products and Services. For clarity, this means that this Notice does
not
apply to where Zendesk processes personal data as a processor in its products and Services. If you have questions related to how a Zendesk Subscriber utilises your personal data, please contact them directly. We are not responsible for the privacy or data security practices of our Subscribers. This Notice also does not apply to personal data about current and former Zendesk employees, job candidates, or contractors and agents acting in similar roles.
Table of Contents:
Introduction
Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
How We Process Personal Data
Sources of Personal Data
Cookies and Tracking Technologies
Security and Retention
Children’s Privacy
External Links
Contact Information
Supplemental Terms for California Residents
Supplemental Information for the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK
Supplemental Information for Other Regions
English Version Controls
Zendesk, Inc. Affiliates
1. Introduction
This Notice applies to Zendesk, Inc. and its relevant Affiliates listed in
Section 14
(“
Zendesk
”, “
us
”, “
we
”, or “
our”
). Capitalised terms that we use but are not defined in the Notice (such as Site, Services, Subscriber, Agent, Agent Contact Information, etc.) have the meaning provided in our
Master Subscription Agreement
. If you are located in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), Switzerland, or the United Kingdom (“
UK
”), please refer to
Section 11
of this Notice for more information about which specific entity or entities act as a controller of your personal data.
When Does This Notice Apply?
This Notice only applies to personal data that Zendesk handles as a Controller (meaning where Zendesk controls how and why your personal data is processed). This includes when you:
Visit or interact with the Zendesk.com Site, the Zendesk mobile applications, the Zendesk Marketplace, the Zendesk Developer Portal, our branded social media pages, and other Sites which we operate (collectively, our “
Digital Properties
”);
Register for or participate in our webinars, events, programmes, marketing and promotional activities;
Interact with us in person, such as when you visit our offices; and
Inquire about or engage in commercial transactions with us.
Changes
: We may update this Notice from time to time. Please check back periodically for updates. If you do not agree with any changes we make, you should stop interacting with us. When required under applicable law, we will notify you of any changes to this Notice by posting an update on our Site or in another appropriate manner.
2. Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
The below table describes what personal data we collect about you and to whom we disclose personal data. California individuals: This table includes the parties we disclose personal data to for a business or commercial purpose, as defined by California law.
Categories of Personal Data Collected
Disclosures of Personal Data
Identifiers
, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, and device identifiers (e.g. advertising identifiers and IP address).
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
With third parties that are necessary to complete a transaction, such as credit card processors
Business partners who we partner with to jointly market or sell our products and Services, such as channel partners
With third parties at your direction, such as event sponsors
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, accountants, and auditors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
To which you have consented to the disclosure
Commercial information
, including preferences, such as purchasing history or tendencies and transactional information, such as banking information.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
With third parties that are necessary to complete a transaction, such as credit card processors
Professional advisers, such as lawyers, accountants and auditors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
To which you have consented to the disclosure
Internet or other electronic network activity information and device information
, such as your browsing history, search history, device information, and other information (whether passive browsing or active engagement) regarding your interactions with us and use of our products, Services, emails, and other Digital Properties.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Geolocation information
, such as approximate location based on your IP address, mobile device location, or information you provide to us (such as city and state you provide through a webform). You may be able to control collection of this data through the settings of your device.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors.
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
Audio, electronic, visual, and other sensory information
, such as CCTV recordings of our premises (e.g. if you visit our offices); recordings of your interactions with our sales or advocacy teams (e.g. for quality assurance or training purposes, in accordance with applicable laws); or customer support chat or messaging logs.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors.
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Inferences as defined by California law
, such as marketing you are likely to react positively to.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as platform vendors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire or merge all or some of our assets
Sensitive Personal Data
, such as proof of vaccination or race and ethnicity (optional) (where permissible under applicable law).
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as platform vendors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire or merge all or some of our assets
To which you have consented to the disclosure
In addition to the above disclosures, we may share your personal data to respond to lawful requests by law enforcement or other government authorities in accordance with our
Government Data Request Policy
. We may also de-identify, anonymise, or aggregate personal data to use or share with third parties for any purpose, where legally permitted.
3. How We Process Personal Data
We may process your personal data for the below purposes:
Purpose of Processing
Lawful Basis
To provide our products, Services, and Digital Properties to you
, including processing and fulfilling transactions; enabling you to access the Digital Properties and our Services; operating, maintaining, and improving our Digital Properties and Services; communicating with you, such as by completing your support requests or providing security updates; and diagnosing, repairing, and tracking service and quality issues.
Legitimate interests; Contract; Legal obligations
For our own business purposes
, including maintaining internal business records and conducting internal reporting; collecting payments and performing accounting and similar business functions; auditing and managing projects related to our Services; performing IT security management and IT-related tasks, such as administration of our technologies and network; evaluating and improving our business, Services, and Digital Properties; and performing research and development of new products and services; and processing your survey and questionnaire responses.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations
For legal, safety, or security reasons
, including to comply with legal requirements; establish, exercise, or defend against legal claims; protect the safety, security, and integrity of our property and the rights of those who interact with us or others; investigate any content or conduct policy violations; and detect, prevent, and respond to security incidents or other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity.
These safety purposes may also involve collecting and processing special categories of personal data (i.e. health data), for office visits and events where necessary for public health or as required by applicable law.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations; Public interest
For marketing our products and Services or those of third parties, such as our business partners
, including to solicit or publish testimonials or feedback about our products and Services; send you marketing and promotional communications or product recommendations (via email, phone, or other online and offline channels) about our Services or those of third parties; facilitate your participation in a contest or event; assess ad impressions or engage in contextual ad customisation.
You may opt out of marketing communications
here
or by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of our marketing communications. You may also manage your email preferences
here
. Note that some of our marketing materials and information may use tracking technologies and analytics tools to help us understand your preferences. For further information, please see
Section 5
below and our
Cookie Notice
.
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
To fulfil a referral request when you use our referral service to tell a friend about our Services
, including by using the name, email address, title, and company name that you provide us to contact the person you are referring.
You must only provide others’ personal data if you have their consent to do so.
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
Diversity, equity, and inclusion
, such as promoting diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives and representation within our business (where authorised by applicable law).
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
Corporate transactions
, such as sales, mergers, acquisitions, reorganisations, bankruptcy, and other corporate events.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations
When you have voluntarily agreed
to have your personal data processed.
Consent
Zendesk will honour data subject rights to the extent required by law. You may have the right to access, correct, update, and, in some cases, request deletion of your personal data (subject to exceptions). You may submit a request
here
.
Zendesk uses a limited number of third-party service providers to assist us in processing data for certain purposes. These third-party providers help support certain site features, perform database monitoring and other technical operations, assist with the transmission of data, and provide data storage services. These third parties may process or store personal data while providing their services. Zendesk maintains contracts with these third parties restricting their access, use and disclosure of personal data in compliance with our obligations under the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. DPF, including the onward transfer provisions, and Zendesk remains liable if they fail to meet those obligations and we are responsible for the event giving rise to damage.
4. Sources of Personal Data
Information you provide to us directly
, including when you register and communicate with us directly through our Digital Properties, visit our offices, or participate in our events, marketing, and outreach activities.
Information collected from your employer
, colleagues, or friends, including information about representatives or other employees of our current, past, and prospective customers, suppliers, investors, and business partners. We may also receive your information from a friend as part of a referral for our Services.
Information automatically collected
, including technical information about your interactions with our Digital Properties (such as IP address, browsing preferences, and purchase history). More information is available in
Section 5
below and in our
Cookie Notice
.
Information from public sources
, including information from public records and information you share in public forums, such as social media.
Information from other third parties
, including information from third-party service and content providers, entities with whom we partner to sell or promote products and services, and social media networks (including widgets related to such networks, such as the “Facebook Like” button).
We may combine information that we receive from the various sources described in this Notice, including third-party sources and public sources, and use or disclose it for the purposes identified above.
5. Cookies and Tracking Technologies
We use cookies and other tracking technologies and offer you the option to manage these settings as described in our
Cookie Notice
. Some tracking technologies enable us to track your device activity over time and across devices and websites. While some browsers have incorporated Do Not Track or DNT preferences, we do not honour such signals from web browsers at this time.
6. Security and Retention
We maintain appropriate security procedures and technical and organisational measures to protect your personal data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, disclosure, alteration, or use.
Your personal data will be generally retained as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected the personal data. Once you and/or your company have terminated the contractual relationship with us or otherwise ended your relationship with us, we may retain your personal data in our systems and records to ensure adequate fulfilment of surviving provisions in terminated contracts or for other legitimate business purposes, such as to evidence our business practices and contractual obligations, to provide you with information about our products and services, or to comply with applicable legal, tax, or accounting requirements. When we have no ongoing legitimate business need nor lawful legal ground to process your personal data, we will delete, anonymise, or aggregate it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal data has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal data and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible. If you want to know more about retention periods applicable to your particular circumstance, please contact us using the details provided in
Section 9
below.
7. Children’s Privacy
Our Sites and Services are not directed to children under the age of 16, and we do not knowingly collect online personal data directly from children. If you are a parent or guardian of a minor child and believe that the child has disclosed online personal data to us, please contact us using the details provided in
Section 9
below.
8. External Links
When interacting with us, you may encounter links to external sites or other online services, including those embedded in third-party advertisements. We do not control and are not responsible for privacy and data collection policies for such third-party sites and services. You should consult such third parties and their respective privacy notices for more information or if you have any questions about their practices.
9. Contact Information
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Notice or about the Zendesk Group’s privacy practices, please contact us by email at
euprivacy@zendesk.com
or
privacy@zendesk.com
, or at:
Zendesk, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Team
989 Market Street
San Francisco, CA 94103, USA
In compliance with the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. DPF, we commit to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. DPF to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
here
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe are provided at no cost to you.
10. Supplemental Terms for California Residents
Pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”), this Section 10 applies to certain personal data collected about California individuals where Zendesk controls how and why the personal data is processed (which the CCPA calls a “business”) and supplements the rest of our Notice above. This Section 10 does not apply to current or former employees, applicants, contractors, or agents.
a. Additional Data Processing Disclosures:
The below table provides the categories of personal data we have sold, shared, or disclosed to third parties, as defined by the California Privacy Rights Act. For reference, the table in
Section 2
provides the categories of personal data collected and our disclosures of personal data.
Categories of Personal Data We Collect
California Privacy Rights Act Details: Categories of Third Parties to Whom Personal Data is “Sold or Shared”
Identifiers
, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, and device identifiers (e.g. advertising identifiers and IP address).
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Business partners who we partner with to jointly market or sell our products and Services, such as channel partners.
Commercial information
, including preferences, such as purchasing history or tendencies and transactional information, such as banking information.
Not applicable
Internet or other electronic network activity information and device information
, such as your browsing history, search history, device information, and other information (whether passive browsing or active engagement) regarding your interactions with us and use of our products, Services, emails, and other Digital Properties.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Geolocation information
, such as approximate location based on your IP address, mobile device location, or information you provide to us (such as city and state you provide through a webform). You may be able to control collection of this data through the settings of your device.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Audio, electronic, visual, and other sensory information
, such as CCTV recordings of our premises (e.g. if you visit our offices); recordings of your interactions with our sales or advocacy teams (e.g. for quality assurance or training purposes, in accordance with applicable laws); or customer support chat or messaging logs.
Not applicable
Inferences as defined by California law
, such as marketing you are likely to positively react to.
Not applicable
Sensitive Personal Data
, such as proof of vaccination or race and ethnicity (optional) (where permissible under applicable law).
Not applicable
Although we have not "sold" or “shared” personal data for money in the past 12 months, we engage in routine practices with our Digital Properties involving third parties that could be considered a "sale" or “sharing” as defined under California law. We do not knowingly sell or share any personal data of minors under the age of 16 We do not collect or process “sensitive personal information”, as defined by California law, to infer characteristics about you. Zendesk only uses sensitive personal information consistent with the exceptions to the right to limit sensitive personal information.
Financial Incentives
: We may offer a benefit or offering in exchange for you providing personal data, such as a discount or coupon to individuals who respond to a survey. As part of these surveys we may collect personal data, such as your name, contact information, preferences, experiences, beliefs, opinions, and other responses to the survey questions. Participation in surveys is governed by the applicable terms and conditions for the survey, which will describe any financial incentives associated with that survey and how to participate. The value of your data is the value of the offer presented to you. We have calculated such value by using the expense related to the benefit. You may withdraw from any financial incentive at any time by emailing us at
privacy@zendesk.com
. If we offer another type of financial incentive, we will share with you the material terms of each offer when we ask you to participate.
b. Your Data Protection Rights:
Subject to legal limitations, certain California residents may have the below rights.
Right to Know.
You have the right to request information about the categories of personal data we have collected about you, the categories of sources from which we collected the personal data, the purposes for collecting the personal data, the categories of third parties to whom we have disclosed your personal data, and the purpose for which we disclosed your personal data (“
Categories Report
”). You may also request information about the specific pieces of personal data we have collected about you (“
Specific Pieces Report
”).
Right to Delete.
You have the right to request that we delete personal data that we have collected from you.
Right to Correct.
You have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal data that we maintain about you.
Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing.
We do not sell personal data to third parties in exchange for money. However, as we explain in
Section 5
, we share information with advertising partners and allow advertising partners to collect information from our Digital Properties. This exchange may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” under California law, and you have the right to opt out of this “sale” or “sharing” of personal data.
California residents may request to exercise the Right to Know, the Right to Delete, and the Right to Correct by using our
webform
or by emailing us at
privacy@zendesk.com
. We will not discriminate against you, in any manner prohibited by applicable law, for exercising these rights.
How to Fully Exercise the Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing:
In order to fully exercise the Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing with respect to any "sale" or “sharing” of information, you must undertake both of the following steps:
Submit a Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing request using our
webform
; and
Disable the use of advertising cookies and other tracking technologies by clicking the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link in our website footer. You must complete this step on each of our Sites from each browser and on each device that you use. These steps are necessary so that we can place a first-party cookie signalling that you have opted out on each browser and each device you use.
If you block cookies, we will be unable to comply with your Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing request for device data that we automatically collect and disclose to third parties online using cookies, pixels, and other tracking technologies. If you clear the cookies in your browser, you will need to follow Step 2 above again. To the extent required by California law, we will honour “Do Not Sell or Share” opt-out preference signals sent in a format commonly-used and recognised by businesses at the browser level, such as an HTTP header field or JavaScript object.
Verification:
To process California data protection requests, we will need to obtain information to locate you in our records or verify your identity, depending on the nature of the request. In most cases, we will request information about you, which may include your name, email address, or other information. If you submit a Right to Know “Specific Pieces Report”, we may also request a signed declaration, under penalty of perjury, that you are who you say you are. We may request alternative information under certain circumstances and/or use third parties to help verify your identity.
Authorised Agents:
Authorised agents may exercise California data protection rights on behalf of California individuals, but we reserve the right to verify the individual’s identity directly as described above. Authorised agents must contact us by submitting a request through our
webform
and indicate that they are submitting the request as an agent. We may require the agent to demonstrate authority to act on your behalf by providing signed permission from you. We may also require you to verify your own identity directly with us or to directly confirm with us that you provided the authorised agent permission to submit the request.
Timing:
We will process Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing requests within fifteen business days from the date we received the request. We will respond to Requests to Delete and Requests to Know within forty-five days unless we need more time, in which case we will notify you, and it may take up to ninety days to respond to your request.
11. Supplemental Information for the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK.
The following terms supplement the Notice with respect to our processing of EEA (i.e. European Union Member States, Iceland, Liechtenstein, and Norway), Swiss, and UK personal data. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between the other parts of the Notice and the terms of this Section 11, Section 11 shall govern and prevail with regard to the processing of EEA, Swiss, and UK. Personal Data, to the extent applicable.
Data Controller:
The Zendesk entity with which you have a primary relationship (such as the entity that concluded the Services contract with you; the entity that has provided you with marketing materials and promotional communications; or the primary entity in the region where you access our Site) is the controller within the scope of this Notice. In the majority of cases, this will be Zendesk, Inc., unless we specifically inform you otherwise.
a. Legal Basis for Processing:
Please see
Section 3
for the legal basis on which we rely for the collection, processing, and use of personal data.
b. Your Data Protection Rights:
Under applicable data protection laws, you may exercise certain rights regarding your personal data:
Right to Access.
You have the right to obtain confirmation from us whether we are processing your personal data and related information, as well as the right to obtain a copy of your personal data undergoing processing.
Right to Data Portability.
You may receive your personal data, that you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly-used, and machine-readable format, and you may have the right to transmit it to other data controllers without hindrance. This right only exists if the processing is based on your consent or a contract, and the processing is carried out by automated means.
Right to Rectification.
You have the right to request the rectification of inaccurate personal data and to have incomplete data completed.
Right to Objection.
You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Restrict Processing.
You may request that we restrict the processing of your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Erasure.
You may request that we erase your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Lodge a Complaint.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In compliance with the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we commit to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-US. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. DPF.
Right to Refuse or Withdraw Consent.
In case we ask for your consent to process your personal data, you are free to refuse to give it. If you have given your consent, you may withdraw it at any time without any adverse consequences. The lawfulness of any processing of your personal data that occurred prior to the withdrawal of your consent will not be affected.
Right to Not Be Subject to Automated Decision-making.
The types of automated decision-making referred to in Article 22(1) and (4) EU/UK General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) do not take place in connection with your personal data. Should this change, we will inform you about why and how any such decision was made, the significance of it, and the possible consequences of it. You will also have the right to human intervention, to express your point of view, and to contest the decision.
You may exercise these rights by contacting us using the details provided in
Section 9
above. Please note that we may refuse to act on requests to exercise data protection rights in certain cases, such as where providing access might infringe someone else’s privacy rights or impact our legal obligations.
c. International Transfers of Personal Data:
Due to the global nature of our operations, some of the recipients mentioned in
Section 2
of the Notice may be located in countries outside the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, which do not provide an adequate level of data protection as defined by data protection laws in the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK. Transfers within the Zendesk Group or to third parties located in such third countries take place using a valid data transfer mechanism, such as the EU Standard Contractual Clauses and/or the UK. Addendum to such clauses, approved Binding Corporate Rules, approved codes of conduct and certifications mechanisms, on the basis of permissible statutory derogations, or any other valid data transfer mechanism issued or approved by the EEA, Swiss, or UK authorities. More information on (including a copy of) our Binding Corporate Rules is available
here
, and evidence of our Binding Corporate Rules approval is available on the European Data Protection Board’s website
here
. Certain third countries have been officially recognised by the EEA, Swiss, and UK authorities as providing an adequate level of protection and no further safeguards are necessary. Please reach out to us using the contact information in
Section 9
above, if you wish to receive further information about how we transfer personal data or, where available, a copy of the relevant data transfer mechanism.
Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. comply with the EU-US. Data Privacy Framework (EU-US. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF, and the Swiss-US. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-US. DPF) as set forth by the US. Department of Commerce. Zendesk, Inc.   FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. have certified to the US. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-US. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-US. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-US. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-US. DPF. Zendesk, Inc.   FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. have certified to the US. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-US. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-US. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-US. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-US. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-US. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  For complaints regarding EU-US. DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf
. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) programme, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. compliance with the EU-US. Data Privacy Framework (EU-US. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-US. DPF).
Data Protection Officer:
The contact details for our data protection officer are as follows: Zendesk, Inc., Attn: Privacy Team and DPO, 989 Market Street, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA,
euprivacy@zendesk.com
.
12. Supplemental Information for Other Regions
Australia:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Commonwealth) and the Australia Privacy Principles. If you are dissatisfied with our handling of a complaint or do not agree with the resolution proposed by us, you may make a complaint to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (“
OAIC
”) by contacting the OAIC using the methods listed on
their website
. Alternatively, you may request that we pass on the details of your complaint to the OAIC directly.
Brazil:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“
LGPD
”). Those individuals who use or access our Sites or Services expressly consent to the collection, use, storage, and processing of their personal data by us for the purposes described in this Notice.
Canada:
Personal data, as defined in the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“
PIPEDA
”) will be collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under PIPEDA.
Japan:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with Japan’s Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“
APPI
”).
Nevada:
We do not presently sell personal data as defined under Nevada law. If you are a Nevada resident, you may nevertheless email us using the information above to exercise your right to opt-out of sale under Nevada Revised Statutes §603A et seq.
New Zealand:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with New Zealand’s Privacy Act 2020 and its 13 Information Privacy Principles (“
NZ IPPs
”).
Singapore:
Personal data collected, stored, used and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“
PDPA
”).
United Kingdom:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Privacy Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under the UK Data Protection Act 2018, as amended by the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments, etc.) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019, as amended, superseded or replaced (“
UK. GDPR
”).
13. English Version Controls
Non-English translations of this notice are provided for convenience only. In the event of any ambiguity or conflict between translations, the English version is authoritative and controls.
14. Zendesk, Inc. Affiliates
Zendesk, Inc.; Zendesk Brasil Software Corporativo Ltda; Zendesk UK Limited; Zendesk International Limited; Zendesk APS; Zendesk Pty., Ltd; Kabushiki Kaisha Zendesk; Zendesk Incorporated; Zendesk GmbH; Zendesk Singapore Pte. Ltd; Zendesk France SAS; Base sp. z o. o. (Base spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością); Zendesk Technologies Private Limited; FutureSimple Inc.; Zendesk Korea LLC; Smooch Technologies ULC; Cleverly, Unipessoal, LDA.; ZD Sub Holdings (USA); Goldcup 30290 AB (Sweden); Smooch Technologies US Inc. (USA); Zendesk S. de R.L. de C.V. (Mexico); Zendesk Technologies Spain S.L.U. (Spain); Zoro TopCo, LP; Zendesk Netherlands B.V.; Zendesk Italy S.r.l.; Tymeshift Inc; Tymeshift doo Novi Sad; Tymeshift Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
We use cookies to provide visitors with the best possible experience on our website. These include analytics, functionality, and targeting cookies, which may also be used in our marketing efforts. Click the 'Accept All' button to agree to the use of cookies or click 'Cookie Settings' to manage your preferences. To opt out of non-essential cookies, click 'Reject All'.
Cookie Notice
Cookie settings
Reject all
Accept all
Privacy Preference Center
Zendesk uses web cookies to collect information about you when you visit our Site. This information might be about you, your preferences, or your device. At Zendesk, we may use this information for purposes that include ensuring basic functionality of our Sites; remembering user preferences, including your cookie preferences; measuring the effectiveness of our Sites, marketing campaigns, and email communications; and personalizing online content.
Please review the different category headings below to learn more and adjust the cookie settings on your current device. Please note that you will need to ensure that each web browser is adjusted to reflect your preferences if you use different computers or mobile devices.
For more information about how Zendesk uses web cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
Essential cookies enable core site functionality. These cookies are necessary for the Site to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. You may set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but parts of the website may not function properly.
View Vendor Details‎
Functional Cookies
Functional cookies enable the Site to provide enhanced functionality and personalization. These cookies may be set by us or by third-party providers whose services we have added to our Site.
View Vendor Details‎
Analytics Cookies
Analytics cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our Site. These cookies help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the Site.
View Vendor Details‎
Targeting Cookies
Targeting cookies, such as social media cookies, may be set through our Site by our advertising service providers, third-party advertisers, ad networks, or data exchange partners. These cookies may be used to show you relevant advertising on other third-party sites.
View Vendor Details‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 13
https://www.customerthermometer.com/privacy-policy/:
Privacy Policy
You are here:
Home
1
/
Privacy Policy
PRIVACY POLICY
(last amended 9 April 2021)
We are committed to protecting the privacy and security of personal data.  This policy tells you how we will collect and use your personal data, and what you should expect in respect of the personal information about you that we have collected.
We are
Customer Thermometer Ltd
(Registered in England & Wales with Company No:
10534307
), trading as
Customer Thermometer.
Our Registered Office is at 250 Fowler Avenue, Farnborough, Hampshire, GU14 7JP. UK.
The person with responsibility for our data protection compliance is Jim Turner (“the Data Protection Manager”), and he can be contacted via email at gdpr@customerthermometer.com or by telephone on
+44(0) 1273 092 056
.
Where we are the data controller of the personal data that we keep and use, and we are therefore responsible for making sure that our systems, processes and people comply with the relevant data protection laws in respect of that personal data.
We will act in respect of personal data to comply with the six principles of the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), which are:
Lawfulness, fairness and transparency;
Purpose limitation;
Data minimisation;
Accuracy;
Storage limitation;
Integrity and confidentiality.
You have rights in respect of how your personal data can be processed; these include the right to request:
a copy of your personal data;
that inaccurate data is rectified; and
that your personal data is, in certain circumstances, erased or restricted.
You have the right to complain to the Information Commissioner, which you can do by contacting the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) directly.  Full contact details, including a helpline number, can be found on the ICO website (
www.ico.org.uk
).  This website also has useful information on your rights and our obligations.   However, please raise any concerns or issues with us first so that we may deal with this as quickly as possible for you.
COLLECTION, USE AND DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL DATA
We collect and process data for the following reasons:
personal data collected and created in relation to our providing software-as-a-service services (“the services”) both in trial and paid-for mode; and
personal data relating to people who have asked to attend events, webinars or training run by us, receive our test surveys, newsletters and other information services or marketing materials; and
personal data relating to our people (which means those people working for our company, or providing services to us, or potentially working or providing services to us, including employees, consultants, temporary workers and contractors).
All of our people are required to abide by our Privacy Policy when handling personal data, and are provided with appropriate data protection training.  Any breach of data protection will be taken seriously, and may result in disciplinary action.  Our Data Protection Manager will provide the advice and guidance to our people on data protection issues, as is required.
Providing the services
COLLECTION:
We will collect personal information which may include names, business information and customer contacts.  This will be done for the management of the commercial relationship with our customers.
We may collect this personal data from you directly, and also from third parties, including publicly available third party sources.  Additional personal data will be collected as it is created by or supplied to us in the conduct of any matter that we are instructed on.
We will also collect personal information, including name and contact information, for individuals with whom we have a professional business relationship related to our provision of  services.
USE:
We will use the personal data in the provision of the services, including for the necessary administration of the relationship with our customers and prospective customers, and to comply with requirements that we are required or recommended to undertake.
We will only use your personal data when the law allows us to.  Most commonly, we will use your personal data in the following circumstances:
in the performance of a contract or to take steps prior to entering into a contract in respect of the services; and/or
compliance with a legal obligation; and/or
where it is necessary for our legitimate interests (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
We may also occasionally use your personal data in the following situations, which are likely to be less common:
where we need to protect your interests (or someone else’s interests);
where it is needed in the public interest or for official purposes.
DISCLOSURE:
We may share personal data with third parties as is necessary in the provision of our software services, including to third party providers who deliver services to support the operation of our company, and with our professional advisors that we refer customers to for specialist services.   We may also need to share your personal data otherwise to comply with the law.
In respect of all disclosures of personal data, we will only share the personal information which is necessary for the particular purpose for which it is provided, or where we have another legitimate interest in doing so, and we will ensure that the personal data is appropriately protected.
RETENTION PERIOD:
We will keep personal data only for as long as is necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected it, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting or reporting requirements.  Normally, our retention period for personal data collected for this purpose is a minimum of 5 years after the end of the period that we provide software to you, whether on a trial or paid-for basis.
Our events, newsletters, other information services & marketing materials (“our Information”)
COLLECTION:
We will collect information such as name, email address, IP address (or similar unique identifiers) job title and the business that you work for together with the additional information that you provide to us, if you send yourself a test survey, take up a trial account, subscribe to our newsletters or emails or attend any webinars with us.
We may collect this information from you (whether directly or via automated means such as our website) or from third parties (such as our customer).
We will collect personal data in our CRM system when you tell us that you wish to receive all or part of our Information, or otherwise give us your personal details by taking a trial, sending a test, creating a paid account or contacting our sales or customers support teams.   You may at any time tell us that you wish to stop receiving our Information.
USE:
Personal data will be used to provide you with our Information that you ask for, or that we think are relevant to the information that you may have given to us.   We may analyse what areas of information are of interest to you so that we can better target the Information that we provide.
We will only use your personal data when the law allows us to.  Most commonly, we will use your personal data in the following circumstances:
with your consent; and/or
in performance of a contract (the agreement to provide the services ); and/or
where it is necessary for our legitimate interests (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
DISCLOSURE:
We may share personal data with third parties in respect of the provision of our Information, including to third parties who provide services to us, including IT, website hosting, email delivery and other services.  In respect of all disclosures of personal data, we will only share the personal information which is necessary for the particular purpose for which it is provided, or where we have another legitimate interest in doing so, and we will ensure that the personal data is appropriately protected.
RETENTION PERIOD:
We will keep personal data only for as long as is necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected it.   Any personal data that we have from you solely for the purposes of your receiving our Information will not be used once you have asked us to stop providing these to you (except to the extent that it is necessary to stop you receiving the Information).
Our employees
COLLECTION:
We will collect names, addresses, contact details, education and employment history, identity and other background checks (which may include appropriate criminal and financial checks and confirmation of the right to work in the UK), marital status and information on next of kin and dependents, financial information (such as bank details and NI numbers), date of birth, gender, a copy of your passport and driving licence, performance information and compensation history, recruitment information (including references), salary, benefits, pension and annual leave information, disciplinary and grievance information, photographs, information about your use of our information and communications systems and CCTV footage or other information obtained through electronic means.
We may collect and use special categories of personal data as required in the carrying out of obligations and exercising specific rights of us or the data subject in the field of employment.  This may include information relating to matters such as health, racial origin, religious belief and offences or alleged offences.
Personal data may be collected from you during the selection process (for example via your application form and CV) and during your employment (including holiday forms, expense claims, performance reviews, any disciplinary or grievance processes), or from third parties, including referees, health service providers, background check providers.
USE:
Personal data of our people will be used for HR administration and management, both in respect of the selection of people to work for us (including suitability, eligibility and/or fitness to work), and those who do work for us, to include learning and development, disciplinary and security (of people, offices and data) requirements, providing and liaising with benefits providers, business management and planning (including accounting and auditing), paying you and dealing with tax and NI deductions, assessing and deciding on salary reviews and compensation, conducting performance reviews and managing performance, dealing with legal disputes involving you or others, preventing fraud, monitoring your use of our information and communications systems, ensuring compliance with our policies, and equal opportunities monitoring.
We will only use your personal data when the law allows us to.  Most commonly, we will use your personal data in the following circumstances:
In performance of a contract with you; and/or
compliance with a legal obligation; and/or
vital interests of the data subject; and/or
where it is necessary for our legitimate interests (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
We may also use your personal data in the following situations, which are likely to be less common:
where we need to protect your interests (or someone else’s interests);
where it is needed in the public interest or for official purposes.
In respect of all disclosures of personal data, we will only share the personal information which is necessary for the particular purpose for which it is provided, or where we have another legitimate interest in doing so, and we will ensure that the personal data is appropriately protected.
In respect of special categories of personal data, we may process this in the following circumstances:
in limited circumstances with your explicit written consent; and/or
where we need to carry out our legal obligations and in line with our policies; and/or
where it is needed in the public interest (such as for equal opportunities monitoring or in relation to our occupational pension scheme), and in line with our policies; and/or
where it is needed to assess your working capacity on health grounds, subject to appropriate confidentiality safeguards.
Less commonly, we may process this type of information where it is needed in relation to legal claims or where it is needed to protect your (or someone else’s) interests and you are not capable of giving your consent, or where you have already made the information public.  We may also process such information about our people (or former people) in the course of our legitimate business activities with the appropriate safeguards.
The special categories of personal data may be used in the following ways:
in relation to leaves of absence, to comply with employment and other laws;
in relation to your physical or mental health, or disability status, to ensure your health and safety in the workplace and to assess your fitness to work, to monitor, manage and administer benefits and absences;
in relation to your race, national or ethnic origin, religious, philosophical or moral beliefs, or your sexual life or sexual orientation, to ensure meaningful equal opportunity monitoring and reporting.
DISCLOSURE:
Personal data may be transferred to service providers who support the operation of our business (such as payroll service providers), to other third parties reasonably necessary in the conduct of our business (including insurers, professional advisors, regulators).  These third parties may be acting as processor, or controller of personal data in their own right.   Personal data may also be shared with our clients in offering or in the provision of legal services.
In respect of all disclosures of personal data, we will only share the personal information which is necessary for the particular purpose for which it is provided, or where we have another legitimate interest in doing so, and we will ensure that the personal data is appropriately protected.
RETENTION PERIOD:
We will keep personal data only for as long as is necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected it, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting or reporting requirements. We will normally keep personal data of applicants who we do not employ for six months after we receive it.
We will keep personal data of employees throughout your employment and normally for a minimum of six years after your employment ends.
Changes to your personal data
It is very important that the personal information that we hold about you is accurate and current.  Please tell us if your personal information changes during your relationship with us.
Data Security
We have put in place measures to prevent your personal data from being accidentally lost, used or accessed in an unauthorised way, altered or disclosed.  In addition, we limit access to your personal data to those of our people and other third parties who have a business need to know. They will only process your personal data on our instructions and where they have agreed to treat the information confidentially and to keep it secure.    We have put in place procedures to deal with any suspected data security breach and will notify you and the ICO of a suspected breach where we are legally required to do so.
Where we store your personal data
We principally store data electronically.
Personal data may be transferred outside of the EEA by processors acting on our behalf.  For transfers to countries not considered adequate by the EC, we will ensure that personal data is adequately protected, as required by the GDPR.  This would include by use of the Standard Contractual Clauses adopted by the EC to protect personal data.
Your rights
Under certain circumstances, you have the right by law to request:
access
to your personal data. This enables you to ask to receive a copy of the personal data that we hold about you and to check that we are lawfully processing it.
correction
of the personal data that we hold about you.
erasure
of your personal data.
Object to processing
of your personal data where we are relying on our legitimate interest and there is something about your particular situation which makes you want to object to processing on this ground.You also have the right to object where we are processing your personal information for direct marketing purposes.
restriction
of processing of your personal data.
transfer
of your personal data to another party.
Links from our website
Our website may, from time to time, contain links to and from the websites of third parties that we permit to make such links.  If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites have their own privacy policies and that we do not accept any responsibility or liability for these policies.  We recommend that you check these policies before you submit any personal data to these websites.
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
Any changes we may make to our privacy policy in the future will be posted on our website, so please ensure that you are viewing the correct version.
Please contact us if you have any questions, comments or requests regarding this Privacy Policy.
Scroll to top
This site uses cookies. By continuing to browse the site, you are agreeing to our use of cookies. 
You can disable cookies at any time within your browser settings.
Accept
Learn more
Cookie and Privacy Settings
How we use cookies
Essential Website Cookies
Other external services
Privacy Policy
How we use cookies
We may request cookies to be set on your device. We use cookies to let us know when you visit our websites, how you interact with us, to enrich your user experience, and to customize your relationship with our website.
Click on the different category headings to find out more. You can also change some of your preferences. Note that blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience on our websites and the services we are able to offer.
Essential Website Cookies
These cookies are strictly necessary to provide you with services available through our website and to use some of its features.
Because these cookies are strictly necessary to deliver the website, refusing them will have impact how our site functions. You always can block or delete cookies by changing your browser settings and force blocking all cookies on this website. But this will always prompt you to accept/refuse cookies when revisiting our site.
We fully respect if you want to refuse cookies but to avoid asking you again and again kindly allow us to store a cookie for that. You are free to opt out any time or opt in for other cookies to get a better experience. If you refuse cookies we will remove all set cookies in our domain.
We provide you with a list of stored cookies on your computer in our domain so you can check what we stored. Due to security reasons we are not able to show or modify cookies from other domains. You can check these in your browser security settings.
Check to enable permanent hiding of message bar and refuse all cookies if you do not opt in. We need 2 cookies to store this setting. Otherwise you will be prompted again when opening a new browser window or new a tab.
Click to enable/disable essential site cookies.
Other external services
We also use different external services like Google Webfonts, Google Maps, and external Video providers. Since these providers may collect personal data like your IP address we allow you to block them here. Please be aware that this might heavily reduce the functionality and appearance of our site. Changes will take effect once you reload the page.
Google Webfont Settings:
Click to enable/disable Google Webfonts.
Google Map Settings:
Click to enable/disable Google Maps.
Google reCaptcha Settings:
Click to enable/disable Google reCaptcha.
Vimeo and Youtube video embeds:
Click to enable/disable video embeds.
Privacy Policy
You can read about our cookies and privacy settings in detail on our Privacy Policy Page.
Privacy Policy
Customer Thermometer Live Demo
Watch Now
Best webinar platform for customer success
Sub-policy 14
https://www.tecton.ai/privacy-policy/:
Last Updated: August 28, 2024
This privacy policy (“
Policy
”) is intended to describe our privacy practices and provide information about how and why we collect, use and share personal information of consumer users (i) of
www.tecton.ai
and any of its subdomains (the “
Site
”) and/or (ii) who purchase or otherwise use solutions, applications, products, technology, and/or services of Tecton, Inc. and its related companies (“services”). This Policy does not apply to websites that post different statements. This Policy may not cover data submitted through or otherwise made available to Tecton which is subject to a written agreement in place between Tecton and our customers, including the
PaaS Terms of Service
and the
Free Trial Terms of Service
.
WHAT WE COLLECT
We get information about you in a range of ways.
Information You Give Us.
We collect your‎ email address as well as other information you directly give us on our Site or through the use of our services.
Information We Get From Others.
We may get information about you from other sources. We may add this to information we get from this Site or through the use of our services.
Information Automatically Collected Through the Use of the Site.
We automatically log information about you and your computer. For example, when visiting our Site, we log your computer operating system type, browser type, browser language, the website you visited before browsing to our Site, pages you viewed, how long you spent on a page, access times and information about your use of and actions on our Site. We may also collect data about you provided by analytics and advertising services, as well as data collected by social media platforms.
Information Automatically Collected Through the Use of the Services.
We automatically log certain information from your cloud platform. For example, data collected by the servers used to operate the services.
Information About Use of Our Service by Consumer Users and Their End Users.
If you are a consumer user of Tecton, Inc. and have subscribed to (including any non-productive evaluation/pilot use of) or licensed any of our services, we will collect certain analytics and operational data and information (including data and information regarding your access to or use of the services (e.g., performance statistics and usage data)) (“
Analytics and Operational Data
”) pertaining to content that is entered into, submitted to, uploaded to, or transmitted using the services by you, on your behalf, or by your end users and any information you submit in connection thereto (“
Customer Content
”) (i) for purposes of analyzing use of the services by you and your end users and (ii) to operate, maintain, and improve our services.
Cookies.
We may log information using “cookies.” Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website. We may use both session Cookies (which expire once you close your web browser) and persistent Cookies (which stay on your computer until you delete them) to provide you with a more personal and interactive experience on our Site.    This type of information is collected to make the Site more useful to you and to tailor the experience with us to meet your special interests and needs. We or our service providers may use cookies and other tracking technologies to track Site users across the Internet to understand how you get to the Site and for the analytics purposes disclosed in this Privacy Policy.
We may use session-replay technologies that employ software code to record users’ interactions with the Services in a manner that allows us to watch video replays of those user sessions. The replays include users’ clicks, mobile app touches, mouse movements, scrolls, keystrokes/key touches during those sessions. These replays help us diagnose usability problems and identify areas for improvement.
USE AND PURPOSE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
We use your personal information as follows:
We use your personal information to operate, maintain, and improve our sites, solutions, applications, products, technology, and services.
We use your personal information to respond to comments and questions and provide customer service.
We use your personal information to send information including confirmations, invoices, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages.
We use your personal information to communicate about promotions, upcoming events, and other news about products and services offered by us and our selected partners.
We use your personal information to protect, investigate, and deter against fraudulent, unauthorized, or illegal activity.
We use your personal information to provide and deliver products and services customers request.
SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
We may share personal information as follows:
We may share personal information when we do a business deal, or negotiate a business deal, involving the sale or transfer of all or a part of our business or assets. These deals can include any merger, financing, acquisition, or bankruptcy transaction or proceeding.
We may share personal information for legal, protection, and safety purposes.
We may share information to comply with laws.
We may share information to respond to lawful requests and legal processes.
We may share information to protect the rights and property of Tecton, Inc., our agents, customers, and others. This includes enforcing our agreements, policies, and terms of use.
We may share information in an emergency. This includes protecting the safety of our employees and agents, our customers, or any person.
We may share information with those who need it to do work for us.
We may also share aggregated and/or anonymized data with others for their own uses.
ACCESS FROM OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES
If you are accessing or using the Site or services from outside the United States, please be aware that collected information may be transferred to, stored in, and processed in the United States (where our and our service providers’ servers and databases are located and operated). The data protection and related laws and regulations of the United States might not be as comprehensive as those in the country from which you are accessing the Site or services.
LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL INFORMATION (EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA VISITORS ONLY)
If you are a visitor from the European Economic Area, our legal basis for collecting and using the personal information described in this Policy will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect personal information from you only where we have your consent to do so, where we need the personal information to perform a contract with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to process the personal information collected from you or may otherwise need the personal information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. If this is the case, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your personal information is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your personal information).
If we collect and use your personal information in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), this interest will normally be to conduct our business and communicate with you as necessary to provide our services to you and for our other legitimate interests, for instance, responding to your queries, improving our services or for the purpose of detecting or preventing illegal activities.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Information, or object to the use of your Personal Information on these grounds, please contact us at the address provided under the “CONTACT INFORMATION” heading below.
DATA RETENTION
We retain data according to relevant laws, and regulations.  The following also help us form our internal data handling policies:
The Purpose of the data
Relevant Contractual Obligations
Data Subject Requests
RIGHT TO LODGE A COMPLAINT WITH SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
Depending on applicable laws you may have a right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
AUTOMATED DECISION MAKING
Tecton does not use data it controls as part of “Automated Decision Making” as defined by GDPR.  In the event that our customers use the Tecton platform for automated decision making, Tecton will agree specific processing instructions as well as provide support for customers (data controllers) where appropriate.
CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS’ PRIVACY RIGHTS
California residents may request and receive, at no cost, certain information about any personal data that we disclosed to third parties for direct marketing purposes in the preceding calendar year. If applicable, this information would include a list of the categories of personal data that was shared and the names and addresses of all third parties with which we shared that information. If you are a California resident and would like this information, please submit your request to
legal@tecton.ai
.
CHILDREN’S ONLINE PRIVACY
We do not knowingly accept online personal information from children under the age of 16. We do not knowingly allow children under the age of 16 to become registered members of our sites or buy products and services on our sites. We do not knowingly collect or solicit personal information about children under 16.
In the event that we ever decide to expand our intended site audience to include children under the age of 16, those specific web pages will, in accordance with the requirements of applicable law (including the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA)), be clearly identified and provide an explicit privacy notice addressed to children under 16. In addition, we will provide an appropriate mechanism to obtain parental approval, allow parents to subsequently make changes to or request removal of their children’s personal information, and provide access to any other information as required by law.
INFORMATION CHOICES AND CHANGES
Our marketing emails tell you how to “opt-out.” If you opt out, we may still send you non-marketing emails. Non-marketing emails include emails about your accounts and our business dealings with you.
You may send requests about personal information to our Contact Information below. You can request to change contact choices, opt-out of our sharing with others, and update your personal information.
You can manage cookie through our cookie policy and cookie management page.
CONTACT INFORMATION.
We welcome your comments or questions about this privacy policy. You may also have the right to complain about our processing of your personal data that we process on behalf of our customers where our customers transfer your personal data to us from the European Economic Area. You may also contact us via email at
privacy@tecton.ai
or at our mailing address:
Tecton, Inc.
548 Market Street, PMB 28021
San Francisco, California 94104
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY.
We may change this privacy policy. If we make any changes, we will change the Last Updated date above.
Book a Demo
Unfortunately, Tecton does not currently support these clouds. We’ll make sure to let you know when this changes!
However, we are currently looking to interview members of the machine learning community to learn more about current trends.
If you’d like to participate, please book a 30-min slot with us here and we’ll send you a $50 amazon gift card in appreciation for your time after the interview.
CTA link
or
CTA button
Contact Sales
Interested in trying Tecton? Leave us your information below and we’ll be in touch.​
Unfortunately, Tecton does not currently support these clouds. We’ll make sure to let you know when this changes!
However, we are currently looking to interview members of the machine learning community to learn more about current trends.
If you’d like to participate, please book a 30-min slot with us here and we’ll send you a $50 amazon gift card in appreciation for your time after the interview.
CTA link
or
CTA button
Request a free trial
Interested in trying Tecton? Leave us your information below and we’ll be in touch.​
Unfortunately, Tecton does not currently support these clouds. We’ll make sure to let you know when this changes!
However, we are currently looking to interview members of the machine learning community to learn more about current trends.
If you’d like to participate, please book a 30-min slot with us here and we’ll send you a $50 amazon gift card in appreciation for your time after the interview.
CTA link
or
CTA button
Sub-policy 15
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/data/en/app-store/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Legal
Open Menu
Close Menu
Hardware
Software
Sales & Support
Internet Services
Intellectual Property
More Resources
English
Choose your preferred language
We collect your personal data so that we can provide you the content you purchase, download, or want to update in the App Store and other Apple online stores, including the iTunes Store and Apple Books.
We also use information about your account, purchases, and downloads in the stores to offer advertising to ensure that ads on the App Store, Apple News, and Stocks, where available, are relevant to you. You have choices with respect to this advertising, as described below.
We use information about your purchases, downloads, and other activities in the stores to tailor features, offer personalized recommendations, and send you notifications including for Apple marketing. You can opt out of the use of this data for this purpose, as described below.
To help identify and prevent fraud, information about how you use your device, including the approximate number of phone calls or emails you send and receive, will be used to compute a device trust score when you attempt a purchase. The submissions are designed so Apple cannot learn the real values on your device. The scores are stored for a fixed time on our servers.
To find ways to improve the stores, we use information about your browsing, purchases, searches, and downloads. These records may be stored with IP address, a random unique identifier (where that arises), and Apple Account when you are signed in to the App Store or other Apple online stores.
Providing the Stores
We use your personal data to provide the services and features in the App Store and other Apple online stores. This information includes, for example, your account and payment information, which you can access and change in settings, and your purchase history.
We may also use your personal data to provide certain services that you request, such as refund requests. These can include refund requests that you send directly to Apple or that you send to Apple as facilitated by app developers. With your consent, developers may provide certain personal data to Apple to assist with processing these refund requests, such as whether you used the purchase.
When you download an app from the App Store, or install an app on your Apple Watch, identifiers such as your device’s hardware ID and IP address are logged by Apple along with your Apple Account. Apple may use the IP address of your internet connection to approximate your location in order to determine whether certain apps that are subject to legal restrictions in some regions can be made available to you.
Improving the Stores
To improve and optimize the experience in the App Store and other Apple online stores, apps, and services, we collect information about your usage of the stores, including when you open or close the App Store, what content you search for, the content you view and download, and your interactions with App Store push notifications and badges, as well as messages from the App Store within apps. We also collect information about your device such as the type of device, the version of your operating system, and the amount of free space on your device. We may use this information in the following ways, for example:
To offer trending searches and personalized features like More Games You Might Like
To assess whether requested content can be downloaded
To understand general trends in the use of device storage, and whether your device is connected by Wi-Fi or cellular
We may also use your ratings and reviews of apps on the App Store and what you search for to improve models that power the App Store. For example, app reviews and aggregated search queries from you and other App Store users are used to provide review summaries and to fine-tune the App Store search model.
Personalizing the Stores
We use your interactions with the App Store to help you discover the content that’s most relevant to you. For example, we recommend content that we think will be of interest to you based on what you’ve previously searched for, viewed, downloaded, updated, or reviewed in the App Store. We also use your purchase history, including in-app purchases, subscriptions, and payment methods together with account information derived from your Apple Account, such as the devices you use and new devices you activate. To make better recommendations, we also use aggregate information about app launches, installs, and deletions from users who choose to share device analytics with Apple, and aggregate information about app ratings. The App Store uses local, on-device processing to enhance our recommendations. Using app usage data stored on your device — such as the apps you frequently open, the time you spend using certain apps, and your app installs and uninstalls — the App Store can suggest apps and in-app events that are more relevant to you. The information Apple receives about your usage of the stores includes information about the personalized content you tap and view.
You can turn off personalization features in the App Store, Apple Books, the iTunes Store, Apple TV, Podcasts, and for subscriptions from Apple by turning off Personalized Recommendations for your Apple Account. On your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device, go to Settings > [your name] > Media & Purchases > View Account, and then tap to turn off Personalized Recommendations. You can clear the app usage data logged on your device for personalization on iOS and iPadOS devices by going to Settings > App Store > Personalized Recommendations and tapping Clear App Usage Data. This will not delete data logged on your device, but any data logged at the point when you clear your app usage data will no longer be used for personalization. The App Store personalization features will use new data logged after you cleared your app usage data history.
Communicating with You
Apple may use information about your account, such as the Apple products you own and your subscriptions to Apple services, to send you communications about the App Store and other Apple products, services, and offers that may be of interest to you. Apple may also use information about your activity within the App Store to send you communications about new features, content, and offers available on the App Store.
Email Marketing
You may receive these communications by email, if you consent to receive email marketing. You can change your email preferences and opt out of receiving these emails by going to
account.apple.com
, or on your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device by going to Settings > [your name] > Personal Information > Communication Preferences.
Push Notifications
You may also receive these communications by push notification. To update your notification preferences or to opt out of notifications on your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device, go to Settings > Notifications > App Store.
Advertising
Apple-delivered advertising helps people discover apps, products, and services on the App Store, Apple News, and Stocks. We use information about your device, account, purchases, subscriptions, and previous downloads to ensure that ads are relevant. On the App Store, we may also use contextual information, including your search terms when you run a search, and information about the page you are viewing or the app you are downloading, to serve you a relevant ad. We create groups of people, called segments, who share similar characteristics and we use these groups for delivering targeted ads. Information about you is used to determine which segments you are assigned to, and thus, which ads you receive. To protect your privacy, targeted ads are delivered only if more than 5,000 people meet the targeting criteria. The information used to determine which ads are relevant to you is tied to random identifiers and not tied to your Apple Account.
When selecting which ad to display on the App Store from multiple ads for which you are eligible, we may use some of the above mentioned information, as well as your App Store searches and browsing activity, to determine which ad is likely to be most relevant to you. App Store browsing activity includes information like the content and apps you tap and view while browsing the App Store. This information is aggregated across users so that it does not identify you. We may also use local, on-device processing to select which ad to display, using information stored on your device, such as the apps you frequently open. Apple’s advertising platform receives information about the ads you tap and view against a random identifier not tied to your Apple Account.
If you allow App Store to access your location, your approximate location may be used to provide geographically targeted ads on the App Store. You can opt out of location-based functionality at any time on your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device by going to Settings > Privacy & Security > Location Services > App Store, then tapping Never.
If the Personalized Ads setting is turned on, Apple’s advertising platform may use your information to serve ads that are more relevant to you. If you do not want to receive ads targeted to your interests from Apple’s advertising platform, you can choose to turn off Personalized Ads. Turning off Personalized Ads will prevent Apple from using your information for ad targeting. It may not decrease the number of ads you receive, but the ads may be less relevant to you.
Learn more about Apple Advertising & Privacy at
www.apple.com/legal/privacy/data/en/apple-advertising
.
Learn how to opt out of personalized ads on the App Store, Apple News, and Stocks at
support.apple.com/105131
.
Sharing with Third Parties
We are obligated to provide some non-personal data to strategic partners that work with Apple to provide our products and services, help Apple market to customers, and sell ads on Apple’s behalf to display in the App Store, Apple News, and Stocks. For example, we may share non-personal data about your content purchases with app developers so that they can measure the performance of their creative work, meet royalty and accounting requirements, and improve their products and services.
We may share information with developers to help them operate and improve their apps. Developers can access usage information, provided by users who opt in, that allows them to look at aggregated data from groups of users that have similar characteristics or behavior, as long as the data comes from groups of no less than five users. Developers can also access receipt information for purchases and refunds of their products and services in the App Store. The receipts provided to developers do not include personal data; however, developers could seek to associate them with personal data from your use and download of their apps, if you have provided it to them.
If you purchase a subscription in a third-party app, we create a Subscriber ID that is unique to you and the developer or publisher. We use the Subscriber ID to provide reports to the developer that include information about the subscription you purchased and your country or region of residence. This information is provided to developers so that they can understand the performance of their subscriptions. If you cancel all of your subscriptions with a particular developer, and if you don’t resubscribe, the Subscriber ID will be reset after 180 days.
In certain regions, if you make an external purchase for digital goods or services for an app, meaning your purchase is not made with Apple’s in-app payment system, the app developer for that app will report to Apple information about the purchase, including amount paid and item purchased, for Apple’s accounting, reporting, and analytics purposes. Apple does not link the purchase information to your Apple Account.
In addition, when automatic downloads of in-app content from app developers occur, your device’s IP address will be visible to the app developer before the app is first opened. The handling of your IP address by the app developer is governed by the app developer’s privacy policies. To turn off automatic downloads of in-app content from developers before you first open an app, go to Settings > App Store, then tap to turn off In-App Content.
Applicable Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
We process your personal data in the App Store generally for performance of your contract with Apple, as necessary for providing the service, and to comply with our legal obligations. Where consent is the appropriate legal basis, we seek it in accordance with applicable local law.
Where applicable local law provides, we process personal data as necessary for purposes of our legitimate interests or those of a third party in order to:
Display relevant content, assess whether your device has enough space to download requested content, and facilitate automatic downloads of updated content
Help improve and optimize the App Store and other Apple products and services for you and others
Send you offers via email and push notifications that may be of interest to you, and to create segments to serve you ads in the App Store, Apple News, and Stocks
Process refund requests
Provide reporting to developers on purchases in their apps
Prevent fraud and other malicious activity
The data used includes:
Your use of the App Store app, such as your interactions with content you search for, view, download, and purchase, as well as App Store notifications and messages and in-app notifications and messages
Details about your device and account
Your IP address
The device trust score
Retention
We retain personal data associated with your purchases and downloads on the App Store and other Apple online stores for the periods specified by applicable laws relating to financial reporting, which vary by region. For most customers, that requires at least a 10-year retention period but in regions such as China that period can be 30 years. We also retain a record of your purchase and downloads of content for at least as long as you have an account with us to allow you to download that content, again in line with our applicable terms. We retain other information such as browsing activity and searches for a shorter period. The period chosen takes account of applicable legal requirements to retain data and specific business use cases. However, some information, such as purchases but not your stored card details, may be retained as business records even after you close your account or stop using the App Store.
When you use a payment card, Apple may retain and automatically update your card number and billing information for future purchases, recurring transactions, or other uses you authorize. Apple may obtain this information from your financial institution or payment network, and also use it for fraud prevention and verification.
Preventing Fraud and Other Malicious Activity
We also collect personal data to prevent fraud and other malicious activity in the App Store and other Apple online stores, and other Apple apps and services. This information includes device information, such as device type and software version, location information (approximated by matching the IP address of your internet connection to a geographic region, if available), download and purchase history, searches, and other interactions with the stores.
When you initiate a purchase, or when a subscription is set to auto-renew, Apple may use information about your historical business relationship with Apple to process the request and determine whether to provide the product or service in advance of authorization by the payment partner.
We also compute a device trust score on your device when you attempt a purchase using information about how you use your device, including the approximate number of phone calls or emails you send and receive. The submission is designed so Apple cannot learn the underlying values on your device. The score is stored for a fixed time on our servers.
At all times, information collected by Apple will be treated in accordance with Apple’s Privacy Policy, which can be found at
www.apple.com/privacy
.
Published Date: January 27, 2025
Sub-policy 16
https://stripe.com/gb/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connect
Platform Agreement
Account Agreement
Products and Programmes
Stripe Atlas
Stripe Adaptive Pricing
Stripe Climate
Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Corporate Card
Stripe Customer Portal
Stripe Data Pipeline
Stripe Financial Connections
Stripe Identity
Stripe Issuing
Stripe Tax
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Radar
Stripe Rewards
Stripe Verifications
Stripe Shop
Stripe Terminal
Terminal Purchase Terms
Terminal Reseller Terms
Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Treasury - Connected Accounts
Stripe Treasury - Platforms
Stripe Vault and Forward
Financial Services Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Stripe Payments Company
PNC Bank
Payment Method Terms
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Data Privacy Framework
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Licences
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 17
https://www.paypal.com/uk/legalhub/privacy-full:
Back To Home Page
PayPal Privacy Statement
1. Overview
2. PayPal’s role as a data controller
3. Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
4. Categories of Personal Data We Collect about You
5. What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
6. Do We Share Personal Data, and why?
7. How long does PayPal store your Personal Data?
8. International Transfers of Personal Data
9. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
10. Your Data Protection Rights
11. Specific information about automated decision-making and profiling
12. Why do we share your Personal Data with credit reference agencies?
13. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
14. Can Children Use Our Services?
15. Updates to this Privacy Statement
16. Users in the UK
17. Definitions
18. Our Contact Information
Status disclosure
Download Printable PDF
PayPal Privacy Statement
Last updated on 1 February 2025
Please contact us if you have any questions regarding this Privacy Statement or in general questions regarding your Personal Data. Your information will be used to provide the Services and in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal
User Agreement
.
1. Overview
PayPal UK Ltd (“we,” “our,” “us,” “PayPal”) provides this Privacy Statement to describe our use of your Personal Data when you use your PayPal account, Xoom account, visit our websites, apply for, or use our services (collectively, the “
Services
”). This Privacy Statement does not apply to Other Services, such as Hyperwallet. We encourage you to read this Privacy Statement and to use it to help you make informed decisions.
Certain capitalized terms that are not otherwise defined in the Statement are explained in the “
Definitions
” section below.
2. PayPal’s role as a data controller
In the United Kingdom (UK),
PayPal UK Ltd
is the data controller for the Personal Data collected and processed in connection with Personal Data obtained when you visit our website, during the registration and application process, and throughout your continued use of the services.
Some of the third-parties that we share Personal Data with are independent data controllers. This means that we are not the ones that dictate how the data that we share will be processed. Examples are authorities, credit bureaus, acquirers, and other financial institutions. When your data is shared with independent data controllers, their data policies will apply. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
For more information about how we protect your Personal Data when transferred outside of the UK, please see Section 8, (“
International Transfers of Personal Data
”).
For most of our Services, we act as a “data controller”, however there are some products and features where PayPal may also act as a “data processor” when providing services to our Partners and Merchants.  The “data controller” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that has the control over the purposes and means by which the data processing is performed.  The “data processor” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that processes the Personal Information for the data controller, for the data controller’s specific purposes, and as otherwise permitted under applicable data protection laws.
3. Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
Our Services may be accessed by individuals without a PayPal or Xoom account. We will collect Personal Data from you even if you are a non-account holder when you use our Services, such as when you use our Pay Without a PayPal account, use Unbranded Payment Services (e.g. Braintree), use PayPal Groups, use a Fastlane profile, or when you receive a payment through our Services from account holders (“Recipient”). If you use Pay Without a PayPal account, we may link your transaction information with your PayPal account, if you have one at the time you use the Service without logging in, or if you create a PayPal account later. We use the term “User” to apply to account and non-account holders. If you are a non-account holder, your Personal Data will be used to provide the Services and in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal
User Agreement
.
With a Fastlane profile, individuals can store their payment methods and other Personal Data with PayPal so that they can complete the checkout process faster, create a store or loyalty account, or facilitate other transactions at participating Partners and Merchants with payment card, contact information, shipping data or other data they save in their Fastlane profile as relevant to the specific interaction, participating Partner or Merchant, all without having to manually input payment method details and other Personal Data each time they check out (“Fastlane”).
When you create a Fastlane profile, PayPal will store your Personal Data, including your name, email, phone number, address information,  billing information and payment method details, and other data that will be relevant to specific Partner or Merchant interactions, and pre-populate that information in the checkout flows or other interactive features of participating Partners and Merchants so that you can enjoy a faster Partner and Merchant experience by not having to manually input your payment or other information. We will also collect transaction and other Partner or Merchant data related to your purchases and other Partner and Merchant interactions when you use Fastlane. If you have a Fastlane profile, we may recognize you as a Fastlane user when you shop on the participating Partners and Merchants sites and we may prompt you to engage in participating Partner or Merchant interactions, such as register for a store or loyalty account  using your Fastlane profile information. If you choose to interact with participating Partners or Merchants through Fastlane, you agree to let PayPal disclose your Fastlane profile information to the Participating Partners and Merchants and their service providers, and to facilitate your transaction and shopping experience on the participating Partners and Merchants sites.
When you shop on Partner and Merchant sites, the Partner and Merchant may disclose Personal Data with PayPal that we will use in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal user agreement.
4. Categories of Personal Data We Collect about You
We collect the following categories of information about you to provide our Services, continually improve your user experience, manage and improve our business. The types of Personal Data we collect about you are described below.
Categories of Personal Data
collected from you
,
including from your interactions with us and use of the Services:
Registration and Contact Information
. Depending on the Services you choose, we will collect your name, mailing address, email, income, telephone number, tax ID, Payment Information, profession, employment or business information, and other information necessary to establish an account or profile and use our Services.
Identification and Signature Information
. Depending on the Services you choose, we will collect information to verify your name, address, email, phone number, government- issued identification, age and biometric data as well as to create and issue your electronic signature.
Payment Information
. Information such as amount you send or request, your payment instrument, card, or financial or funding account used in connection with the Services, including issuer name, card type, country code, payment account number, CVV, username, and IBAN information.
Information about your imported contacts
. If you choose to import your contact lists, we will collect Information you enter or import about your contacts, such as name, address, phone number, images, email address or usernames associated with the contacts you import or enter manually.
Information in your PayPal Account Profile.
Information you choose to enter such as your username, email, mobile number, profile picture, preferred language, or personal description which may include sensitive Personal Data that reveals religious beliefs, political or philosophical views, disability, sexual orientation as well as biometric data. You can set your profile to “Private” at any time.
Information you provide when you contact us
. Information you disclose when you respond to surveys, or contact our customer support teams, such as Services you have used, recorded conversations, chat conversations with us, email correspondence with us, account or profile status, repayment history, voice identification. This may include information about others if you choose to share it with us.
Device Information.
Information that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Site or Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device IP address; information about your device’s web browser and internet connection you use to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data.
Inferred data.
We may derive inferences from your transactions and personal data when you use the Services. We do this, for example, to help keep your account and profile secure and protect your use of the Services from fraud. We may draw inferences that reflect your behaviour patterns and personal preferences, browsing and purchasing habits, and creditworthiness.
Categories of Personal Data
collected from third parties,
including from identity verification vendors, data brokers, vendors that help us with fraud detection, your bank, Partners and Merchants or third party platforms you engage with using our Services:
Information from your connected third party accounts
. If you choose to connect non-financial or financial account such as your personal email, social media, or bank or credit accounts, we will collect information consistent with the disclosed purpose for which it was linked. For example, if you choose to participate in
Open Banking
, we will collect account credentials, account balances, account transactions, and information about your financial standing from your linked accounts. You may change your mind about use of this feature and unlink your connected accounts at any time.
Information from Credit Reporting Agencies
. Where permitted by law, we collect credit-related information such as outstanding and historical debt, repayment history, previous credit approvals, current employment relationship, and relationship with other financial institutions within the framework of your use of our Services.
Transaction Information
. Information about your order details and purchases, such as item description, quantity, price, currency, shipping address, online shopping cart information, seller and buyer information, and Payment Information. This includes information from your transactions where you use our Services without a PayPal account (e.g. Guest checkout).
Information related to legal requirements
. Consistent with applicable law (such as anti-money laundering laws), this may include information from external sanction lists such as name, date of birth, place of birth, occupation, and the reason why the person is on the list in question.
Third party applications
. Information from others from your use of third-party applications, such as the Apple App Store or Google Play Store, social networking sites, such as name, your social network ID, Location Information, email, device ID, browser ID, and profile picture. Your use of third-party applications is subject to the privacy notice and terms of service for such applications.
Categories of Personal Data automatically collected about you, including through your access to our website or mobile app, from cookies and similar tracking technologies, and your devices:
Technical Usage Data
. Information about response time for web pages, download errors and date and time when you used the service, such as your IP address, statistics regarding how pages are loaded or viewed, the websites you visited before coming to the Sites and other usage and browsing information collected through Cookies (“
Technical Usage Data
”).
Information from your device
. Information about your language settings, IP address, browser ID, device ID, cookie preferences, time zone, operating system, platform, screen resolution and similar information about your device settings, and data collected from cookies or other tracking technologies,
Location Information
. Information from IP-based geolocation such as latitude and longitude data, and Global Positioning System (GPS) information when you give us permission through your device settings.
Inferred data
. Inferences drawn to create a profile about you that may reflect behavior patterns and personal preferences, such as gender, income, browsing and purchasing habits, and creditworthiness.
5. What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
We may
process
your Personal Data for a variety of reasons that are permitted under data protection laws applicable in the UK and in accordance with the lawful bases below:
We collect the following Personal Data we consider
necessary to fulfil our pre-contractual and contractual obligations
to you and without which you will not be able to use the Services.
Necessary categories of Personal Data include:
Registration and Contact Information
Identification and Signature Information
Payment Information
Information related to legal requirements
Information you provide when you contact us
Transaction information
Package Tracking
Service-specific Personal Data
Information from credit reporting agencies and financial institutions
Information from your connected financial accounts
Information from your use of the Services
Technical usage data
Device information
Location data
These activities include
:
to provide our Services, to fulfil relevant agreements with you and to otherwise administer our business relationship with you. If you are using Fastlane, we will also use your Personal Data and payment method details to determine whether the payment you are making with a participating Partner or Merchant is authorised by you and likely to be successfully authorised by the payment method you choose to use when you make a purchase using details from your Fastlane profile.
to administer your payment for products and the customer relationship.
to assess your creditworthiness in connection with your application, confirm your identity and your contact information, and protect you and others from fraud.
to confirm your identity, also through the use of electronic signature, and verify your personal and contact details.
to prove that transactions have been executed.
to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim or collection procedures.
to comply with internal procedures.
to assess which payment options and services to offer you, for example by carrying out internal and external credit assessments.
for customer analysis, to administer our Services, and for internal operations, for example troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research and statistical purposes.
to communicate with you in relation to our Services.
to comply with applicable UK laws, such as anti-money laundering and booking keeping laws and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks.
We have a legitimate interest in ensuring that PayPal remains a secure financial service and continuing to offer services that are innovative and of interest to you. We do this where
our legitimate interests are not outweighed by your right not to have your data processed for this purpose
.
These activities include:
to ensure that content is presented in the most effective way for you and your device.
to prevent misuse of our Services as part of our efforts to keep our platform safe and secure.
to determine your eligibility for and to communicate with you about Services for which you may qualify or that may be of interest to you, for example by carrying out internal credit assessments.
to carry out risk analysis, fraud prevention and risk management.
to improve our Services and for general business development purposes, for example improving risk models to minimize fraud, develop new products and features and explore new business opportunities.
To keep your account, profile and financial information accurate and up to date.
for marketing, product and customer analysis, including testing, for example to improve our product range and optimize our customer offerings.
to comply with applicable laws, such as anti-money laundering, bookkeeping laws, regulatory capital adequacy requirements, and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks. For example, when we process Personal Data for know-your-customer (“KYC”) requirements, to prevent, detect and investigate money laundering, terrorist financing and fraud. We also carry out sanction screening, report to tax authorities, police enforcement authorities, enforcement authorities, supervisory authorities where we are not compelled by UK law but where we have a good faith belief that sharing the information is necessary to comply with applicable law.
to facilitate your participation in competitions, offerings, and events.
to conduct financial risk management obligations such as credit performance and quality, insurance risks and compliance with capital adequacy requirements under applicable law
to process information about your contacts to make it easy for you to find and connect them and improve payment accuracy.
By providing us with information about your contacts you certify that you have permission to provide that information to PayPal for the purposes described in this Privacy Statement.
to provide you with information, news, and marketing about our Services, including where we partner with others to offer similar services.
to associate information about you to identify your use of Services without a PayPal account (e.g. Pay Without a PayPal account), and to associate such transactions with your PayPal account, if you have one or later establish an account.
to remember your preferences for the next time you use the Services, such as which of your payment methods you prefer or whether you choose to receive digital receipts via email or text when you checkout.
We have a legal obligation under UK laws to conduct certain processing activities.
We do this where it is necessary to comply with applicable laws
.
These activities include:
to provide our Services and products.
to certify your identity, also for signature purposes, and verify your personal and contact details.
to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim or collection procedures.
to prevent misuse of our Services as part of our efforts to keep our platform safe and secure.
to carry out risk analysis, fraud prevention and risk management.
to comply with applicable laws, such as anti-money laundering and bookkeeping laws and regulatory capital adequacy requirements and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks. For example, when we process Personal Data for know-your-customer (“KYC”) requirements, to prevent, detect and investigate money laundering, terrorist financing and fraud. We also carry out sanction screening, report to tax authorities, police enforcement authorities, enforcement authorities, supervisory authorities.
We rely on your explicit and voluntary consent
to process your Personal Data to participate in certain features that while not necessary for use of the Services may be of interest to you, such as syncing your contact list to your account, providing biometric data, targeted advertising, linking your email account for package tracking or connecting to a third-party platform. You may change your mind about use of these features at any time through your account settings. Note that withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we have conducted prior to your withdrawal. Please refer to Section 10 (“
Your data protection rights
”) for more information on your right to withdraw your consent.
6. Do We Share Personal Data, and why?
We will share your Personal Data with third parties where there is a lawful basis to do so.
This includes:
With other Other Services
, in order to provide you with the Services and for our own legitimate interests in conducting our business. These interests are described further in Section 5 (“
What Personal Data is used and for which legal basis?
”)
.
With authorities
, to the extent we are under a legal obligation to do so. Such authorities include tax authorities, police authorities, enforcement authorities and supervisory authorities in relevant countries. We may also be required to provide competent authorities information about your use of our Services, for example revenue or tax authorities, which may include your name, address and information regarding card transactions processed by us on your behalf through our Services. The legal basis for complying with disclosure obligations under UK law is legal obligation and where acting under non-UK law, on the basis of our legitimate interest to comply with relevant laws to deter illegal conduct.
With other financial institutions and card networks
, for example to facilitate payment processing, to jointly offer a product or to add cards to your electronic wallet. For payment transactions with Fastlane, your Personal Data will be shared with the provider of the payment services for the participating Partner and Merchant to enable the processing of the payment transaction. The payment provider for the Partner and Merchant may be PayPal or a third party payment provider. The legal basis for our disclosure is performance of our contract with you. These parties may also access your Personal Data for other legitimate purposes such as identity verification, fraud prevention and risk management. The legal basis for this processing is the legitimate interest of ourselves and our Partners and Merchants to deter fraudulent and illegal conduct.
With fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
, for example to assist us in detecting activities suggestive of fraud. The legal basis for this processing is the legitimate interest of ourselves and our Partners and Merchants to deter fraudulent and illegal conduct.
With debt collection agencies,
for example to collect unpaid overdue debts through a third party such as a debt collection agency. We do this on the basis of our legitimate interest to conduct business and recover debts. Please be aware that these parties’ privacy notice applies to the processing of Personal Data that you share directly with them, and they may report your unpaid debts to credit reporting agencies which may affect your creditworthiness or ability to secure future credit.
With service providers
that operate at our direction and on our behalf to perform services we outsource to them, such as marketing, IT development, maintenance, hosting and support and customer service operations. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of our contractual obligations to you.
With other Users in accordance with your account settings
. You may display or make certain information available to other Users, such as your profile photo, first and last name, username, or city in accordance with your account settings. The legal basis for this processing is your consent. Please note that you can change your profile settings at any time and at no cost to you.
With financial institutions in connection with your participation in Open Banking
, for example when you initiate an account connection with another bank, card account, or aggregator. We do this to check if you have sufficient funds or confirm your ownership of the account. When you choose to link your account the legal basis for accessing your account data is performance of our contractual obligations to you.
With Partners and Merchants, their service providers and others involved in a transaction
, for example when you use the Services to initiate online purchases, save your payment information with Fastlane, pay other Users, use the Services, or return goods we may share information about you and your account or Fastlane profile with the other parties (or their service providers) involved in processing your transactions. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of our contractual obligations to you and for our legitimate interests. We may also disclose Personal Data to Partners and Merchants to enable their use of our Services to facilitate your transactions. For example, when you visit a participating Merchant site or app, the Merchant can check whether you are a user of PayPal services and present a recommended payment method to you to simplify your checkout process. If you choose to interact with participating Partners and Merchants through Fastlane, we will disclose your Fastlane profile information with the participating Partners and Merchants and their services providers, and facilitate your transaction, shopping experience or other interaction on participating Partners and Merchants sites.
Please note that Personal Data shared with Partners and Merchants (or their service providers) involved in a transaction is subject to the Partners and Merchants’ own privacy policies and procedures.  We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of Partners and Merchants.
With third parties that are independent data controllers
, for example when we share Personal Data to credit reference agencies, acquirers and other financial institutions, or security products to prevent bots from accessing our Services.
Please be aware that these parties’ privacy notice applies to the processing of Personal Data that you share directly with them
. For example, we use Google’s reCAPTCHA to prevent misuse of our Services, when you access our mobile application. Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
apply to the processing of Personal Data you share with them. For more information specific to credit reference agencies we partner to assess your creditworthiness, see Section 12, (“
Credit Reference Agency Information Notice
”).
With buyers or in connection with business transfer
, for example if we sell business or assets, we may share your Personal Data to a buyer of those business or assets. If PayPal or a significant portion of PayPal’s assets are acquired by a third party, Personal Data may also be shared. PayPal has a legitimate interest in being able to carry out these transactions.
7. How long does PayPal store your Personal Data?
We retain Personal Data for as long as needed or permitted in context of the purpose for which it was collected and consistent with applicable law.
The criteria used to determine our retention period is as follows:
Personal Data used for the ongoing relationship between you and PayPal is stored for the duration of the relationship plus a period of 10 years
Personal Data in relation to a legal obligation to which we are subject is retained consistent with the applicable law, such as under applicable bankruptcy laws and AML obligations.
We retain Personal Data for the least amount of time necessary where retention is advisable in light of litigation, investigations, audit and compliance practices, or to protect against legal claims.
8. International Transfers of Personal Data
We operate in many countries, and we (or our service providers) may move your data and process it outside the country where you live. We use third-party service providers to process and store your information in the United States and other countries. These countries do not always afford an equivalent level of privacy protection. We have taken specific steps, in accordance with UK data protection laws, to protect your Personal Data. For transfers of Personal Data from the EU within PayPal and Other Services, we rely on Binding Corporate Rules approved by competent Supervisory Authorities (available
here
). For transfers of personal data from the UK, these are based on the UK Addendum (approved by the Information Commissioner’s Office) to the EU standard contractual clauses, approved by the European Commission, to help ensure your information is afforded a high standard of protection and that your privacy rights are respected.
9. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you interact with our Services, open email we send you, or visit a third-party website for which we provide Services, we and our partners use cookies and other tracking technologies such as pixel tags, web beacons, and widgets (collectively, “
Cookies
”) to recognise you as a User, customise your online experiences and online content, including to serve you interest-based advertising, perform analytics; mitigate risk and prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Sites and Services. Certain aspects and features of our Services and Sites are only available through the use of Cookies, so if you decline certain Cookies, your use of the Sites and Services may be limited or not possible.
We use Cookies to collect your device information, internet activity information, and inferences as described above.
Cookies help us to do the following:
Remember your information so you do not have to re-enter it
Track and understand how you use and interact with our online services and emails
Tailor our online services to your preferences
Measure how useful and effective our services and communications are to you
Otherwise manage and enhance our products and services
Do Not Track (DNT) is an optional browser setting that allows you to express your preferences regarding tracking by advertisers and other third parties. At this time our Sites are not designed to respond to DNT signals or similar mechanisms from browsers.
Please review our
Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies
to learn more about our use of Cookies.
10. Your Data Protection Rights
Under applicable data protection law, you have certain rights to control our collection and use of your Personal Data. Your rights include:
Access, rectification, deletion, objection, portability, and restriction of your Personal Data
We recognize the importance of your ability to control use of your Personal Data and provide several ways for you to exercise your rights to access (right to know), rectification (correction or update), deletion (erasure), objection, portability (transferring), and to restrict process in whole or in part.
If you have an account you can exercise your data protection rights by accessing “Data and Privacy” from account settings in the PayPal app. If you, or an authorised agent, want to exercise any of your rights relating to your Personal Data in your Fastlane profile, contact us at the number provided in the Our Contact Information section or submit your request from your Fastlane profile management portal.
Even if you do not you have a PayPal account (for example, where you use Pay without a PayPal account), you can submit a request for access, modification, correction, or deletion of your information Personal Data by contacting us at the number provided in the Our Contact Information section. You can submit a request related to someone else’s information, if you are their authorised agent, by contacting us. Please note that we may require you to provide additional information for verification.
Your right to object to the Automated Decisions and profiling
If you are not approved under the Automated Decisions described below, you will not have access to our services, such as our payment methods. PayPal has several safety mechanisms to ensure the decisions are appropriate. These mechanisms include ongoing overviews of our decision models and random sampling in individual cases. If you have any concern about the outcome, you can
contact us
, and we will determine whether the procedure was performed appropriately.
You have the right to object to an Automated Decision with legal consequences or decisions which can otherwise significantly affect you (together with the relevant profiling) by
contacting us
. We will then review the decision, taking into account relevant additional circumstances.
Consent
Generally, if we use your Personal Data with your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your Personal Data conducted in reliance on a lawful processing ground other than consent.
Right to object to Direct Marketing
If we use your Personal Data for direct marketing, you can always modify your permissions, object and opt out of future direct marketing messages using the unsubscribe link in electronic communications or through your account or profile settings.
Right to object to Legitimate Interest processing
If we use your Personal Data to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third-party, you have the right to object to our use for that purpose. See Section 5 (“
What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
”)
How do you exercise your rights and how can you contact us or the data protection authority?
If you are unhappy with our processing of your Personal Data for any reason, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority for data protection in your country.
By contacting our Data Protection Officer, please see Section 18 (“
Our Contact Information
”).
You may also seek a remedy through
local courts
if you believe your rights have been breached.
You may also lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority, which in the UK is the Information Commissioner’s Office: website: https://ico.org.uk/, address: Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF.
11. Specific information about automated decision-making and profiling
“
Automated-decision making”
is the process of making a decision by fully automated means without human involvement. In some cases these decisions
could have a legal or similarly significant
effect on you as an individual. “
Profiling
” means analysis of an individual's personality, behaviour, interest and habits to make predictions or decisions about them. Where authorised under UK law or where necessary for the entry into or performance of a contract, we may in some cases use automated decision-making or profiling for decisions. An example of our use of automated decision making is evaluation of your creditworthiness to assess your suitability for certain credit products.
We believe that by making such decisions automatically, PayPal increases its objectivity and transparency in deciding which services to offer you. We deploy several safety mechanisms to ensure the decisions are appropriate. These mechanisms include ongoing overviews of our decision models and random sampling in individual cases. You can always ask for a manual decision-making process instead, express your opinion or contest decision making based solely on automated processing, including profiling, if such a decision would produce
legal effects or otherwise similarly significantly affect you
. You can find out more about how to object to these decisions in Section 10
(“Your data protection rights”)
.
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
if you require more information on our use of Automated-decision making or Profiling.
12. Why do we share your Personal Data with credit reference agencies?
If you have applied for or use our credit Services, in order to process your application, we may supply your Personal Data to credit reference agencies (CRAs) and they will give us information about you, such as your financial history. We do this to assess creditworthiness and product suitability, check your identity, trace and recover debts and prevent criminal activity.
The legal bases for such transmissions are found in Article 6, paragraph 1, letter b (contractual) and Article 6, paragraph 1, letter f (legitimate interest) of the UK General Data Protection Regulation (“UK GDPR”).
We will also continue to exchange information about you with CRAs on an ongoing basis, including about your settled accounts and any debts not fully repaid on time. This information may be supplied by CRAs to other organizations to perform similar checks and to trace your whereabouts and recover debts that you owe.
Your data will also be linked to the data of any joint applicants or other financial associates.
How to Find Out More
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
for details of which CRA we have used for a specific search.
The list of CRAs used in the UK and EEA, can be found
here
, including identities of the CRAs used in each relevant country, and a link to their privacy notice from which you can determine the ways in which they use and share Personal Data, including how long they will retain such Personal Data. You can contact the credit reference agencies operating in the country in which you live directly if you have any questions regarding their services, your credit score or the information they have stored about you, or if you wish to exercise your data subject rights towards them.
13. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Data against loss, misuse, unauthorised access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centres, and information access authorisation controls. While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s) and account/profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Data we maintain about you is accurate and current. We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Data that we share with a third-party based on an account connection that you have authorised.
14. Can Children Use Our Services?
We do not knowingly collect information, including Personal Data, from children under the age of 16 or other individuals who are not legally able to use our Sites and Services. If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Data from someone not allowed to use our Services, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data.
Please
contact us
if you believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from someone not allowed to use our Services.
15. Updates to this Privacy Statement
We revise this Privacy Statement from time to time to reflect changes to our business, Services, or applicable laws. If the revised version requires notice in accordance with applicable law, we will provide you with 30 days prior notice by posting notice of the change on the "
Policy Updates
" or "
Privacy Statement
" page of our website, otherwise the revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date. If you are a new User or are receiving this Privacy Statement for the first time and there is an upcoming change described on the
Policy Updates
or Privacy Statement page at the time you receive this Privacy Statement, such upcoming change will apply to you on the indicated effective date.
16. Users in the UK
In order to provide the PayPal Services, certain of the information we collect (as set out in this Privacy Statement) may be required to be transferred to other PayPal related companies or other entities, including those referred to in this section in their capacity as payment providers, payment processors or account holders (or similar capacities). You acknowledge that according to their local legislation, such entities may be subject to laws, regulations, inquiries, investigations, or orders which may require the disclosure of information to the relevant authorities of the relevant country.
Specifically, you acknowledge that PayPal may do any and all of the following with your information:
Disclose necessary information to: the police and other law enforcement agencies; security forces; competent governmental, intergovernmental or supranational bodies; competent agencies, departments, regulatory authorities, self-regulatory authorities or organisations and other third parties, including PayPal Group companies, that (i) we are legally compelled and permitted to comply with, including but without limitation laws implementing the US Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act (“FATCA”) and OECD Common Reporting Standard (“CRS”); (ii) we have reason to believe it is appropriate for us to cooperate with in investigations of fraud or other illegal activity or potential illegal activity, or (iii) to conduct investigations of violations of our User Agreement (including without limitation, your funding source or credit or debit card provider).
If you are covered by FATCA or CRS, we are required to give you notice of the information about you that we may transfer to various authorities.
We and other organisations, including parties that accept PayPal, may also share, access and use (including from other countries) necessary information (including, without limitation the information recorded by fraud prevention agencies) to help us and them assess and to manage risk (including, without limitation, to prevent fraud, money laundering and terrorist financing). Please contact us if you want to receive further details of the relevant fraud prevention agencies.
Disclose account Information to intellectual property right owners if under applicable law they have a claim against PayPal for an out-of-court information disclosure due to an infringement of their intellectual property rights for which PayPal Services have been used.
Disclose necessary information in response to the requirements of the credit card associations or a civil or criminal legal process.
Disclose your name and PayPal link in the PayPal user directory. Your details will be confirmed to other PayPal users in response to a user searching using your name, email address or telephone number, or part of these details. This is to ensure people make payments to the correct user. This feature can be turned off in the PayPal profile settings.
If you as a Partner and Merchant use a third party to access or integrate PayPal, we may disclose to any such third party necessary information for the purpose of facilitating and maintaining such an arrangement (including, without limitation, the status of your PayPal integration, whether you have an active PayPal account and whether you may already be working with a different PayPal integration partner).
Disclose necessary information to the payment processors, auditors, customer services providers, credit reference and fraud agencies, financial products providers, commercial partners, marketing and public relations companies, operational services providers, group companies, agencies, marketplaces and other third parties listed here. The purpose of this disclosure is to allow us to provide PayPal Services to you. We also set out in the list of third parties, under each "Category", non-exclusive examples of the actual third parties (which may include their assigns and successors) to whom we currently disclose your account information or to whom we may consider disclosing your account information, together with the purpose of doing so, and the actual information we disclose (except as explicitly stated, these third parties are limited by law or by contract from using the information for secondary purposes beyond the purposes for which the information was shared).
Disclose necessary information to your agent or legal representative (such as the holder of a power of attorney that you grant, or a guardian appointed for you).
Disclose aggregated statistical data with our business partners or for public relations. For example, we may disclose that a specific percentage of our users live in Manchester. However, this aggregated information is not tied to Personal Data.
Share necessary account information with unaffiliated third parties (listed here) for their use for the following purposes:
Fraud Prevention and Risk Management: to help prevent fraud or assess and manage risk.
Customer Service: for customer service purposes, including to help service your accounts or resolve disputes (e.g., billing or transactional).
Shipping: in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using PayPal.
Legal Compliance: to help them comply with anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing verification requirements.
Service Providers: to enable service providers under contract with us to support our business operations, such as fraud prevention, bill collection, marketing, customer service and technology services. Our contracts dictate that these service providers only use your information in connection with the services they perform for us and not for their own benefit.
17. Definitions
Device Information means data that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Site or Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device IP address; information about your device’s web browser and internet connection you use to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data.
Other Services means companies or separate brands, affiliates or subsidiaries of PayPal, Inc., and who process Personal Data in accordance with their terms of service and privacy policies. Examples include Honey Science LLC, Paidy Inc., and Hyperwallet.
Geolocation Information means information that identifies, with precise specificity, your location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through your GPS, or your device settings.
Location Information means information that identifies, with reasonable specificity, your approximate location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through GPS or Wi-Fi or cell site triangulation.
Partner and Merchant means the merchant or business that our Users transact with for the purpose of obtaining goods or services.
Pay Without a PayPal account means our Services may be accessed by individuals without using a PayPal account, a Fastlane profile, or the Unbranded Payment Services.
PayPal means PayPal UK Ltd, which offers PayPal, Xoom, Unbranded Payment Services and Fastlane profile services.
Personal Data means information that can be associated with an identified or directly or indirectly identifiable natural person. “Personal Data” can include, but is not limited to, name, postal address (including billing and shipping addresses), telephone number, email address, payment card number, other financial account information, account number, date of birth, government-issued credentials (e.g., driver’s license number, national ID, passport number), and biometrics.
Processing means any method or way that we handle Personal Data or sets of Personal Data, whether by automated means, such as by collection, recording, categorization, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, and consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction of Personal Data.
Services  means any PayPal Unbranded Payment Services, Pay Without a PayPal account, PayPal Groups, Fastlane, Xoom, credit products and services, content, features, technologies, or functions, and all related websites, applications and services offered to you by PayPal, with the exception of the Other Services. Your use of the Services includes use of our Sites.
Sites means the websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which PayPal offers the Services and which has posted or linked to this Privacy Statement.
Unbranded Payment Services means you are interacting with and making payments to Partners and Merchants using our card and/or direct debit payment services that do not carry the PayPal brand, or when you use our Braintree services.
User is any person who uses the Services as a consumer for personal or household use. For the purposes of this Notice, “User” includes “you” and “your”.
18. Our Contact Information
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
or offline at PayPal UK Ltd at 5 Fleet Place, London, United Kingdom, EC4M 7RD.
Click
here
to contact us about your PayPal Account or Service or Unbranded Payment Services.
Click
here
to contact us about your Xoom Account or Service.
To contact us about your Fastlane profile: visit your Fastlane profile management portal.
Status disclosure
PayPal UK Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) as an electronic money institution (firm reference number 994790); in relation to its regulated consumer credit activities (firm reference number 996405); and for the provision of cryptocurrency services (firm reference number 1000741). Some products and services, such as PayPal Pay in 3 and PayPal Working Capital, are not regulated by the FCA and may offer a lower level of protection. Please read product terms for further details. PayPal UK Ltd's company number is 14741686. Its registered office is 5 Fleet Place, London, United Kingdom, EC4M 7RD.
Sub-policy 18
https://www.chargebackgurus.com/privacy-policy:
By using this website, you agree to our use of cookies. We use cookies to help our website run effectively. For more information see our
Privacy Policy
.
If you decline, your information won’t be tracked when you visit this website. A single cookie will be used in your browser to remember your preference not to be tracked.
I Accept
Decline
Solutions
FPROne
Prevention
Representment
Analytics
Industries We Serve
Why Us?
The Chargeback Gurus Difference
Client Success Stories
Resources
VAMP - Visa Acquirers Monitoring Program
Chargeback Risk Calculator
Blog
Press & Articles
Reports and E-guides
Webinars
Bin Lookup
Chargeback Reason Codes
Company
About Us
Mission, Vision and Commitment
Partners
Leadership Team
Careers
Events
Press & Articles
Contact
Solutions
Solutions
FPROne
Prevention
Representment
Analytics
Industries We Serve
Why Us?
Why Us?
The Chargeback Gurus Difference
Client Success Stories
Resources
Resources
VAMP - Visa Acquirers Monitoring Program
Chargeback Risk Calculator
Blog
Press & Articles
Reports and E-guides
Webinars
Bin Lookup
Chargeback Reason Codes
Company
Company
About Us
Mission, Vision and Commitment
Partners
Leadership Team
Careers
Events
Press & Articles
Contact
Chargeback Gurus
Privacy Policy
Effective Date:  January 8, 2025
Introduction
Welcome to the website of Chargeback Gurus (“CBG” “we,” “us” and/or “our”). This Privacy Policy explains our online privacy practices regarding the use, collection, and disclosure of Personal Data. We encourage you to read this entire Privacy Policy before using or submitting any Personal Data through the Site. Visitors (“visitors,” “users,” “you” or “your”) are encouraged to read this entire Privacy Policy before using or submitting any Personal Data through our Site.
This policy describes the types of information we may collect from you or that you may provide when you visit the website www.chargebackgurus.com (our "
Website
") and our practices for collecting, using, maintaining, protecting, and disclosing that information.
This policy applies to information we collect:
On this Website.
In email, text, and other electronic messages between you and this We
When you interact with our advertising and applications on third-party websites and services, if those applications or advertising include links to this policy.
It does not apply to information collected by:
Us offline or through any other means, including on any other website operated by Company or any third party (including our affiliates and subsidiaries);
Our Platform, which is governed by its own terms; or
Any third party, including through any application or content (including advertising) that may link to or be accessible from or through the Website.
Please read this policy carefully to understand our policies and practices regarding your information and how we will treat it. If you do not agree with our policies and practices, your choice is not to use our Website. By accessing or using this Website, you agree to this privacy policy. This policy may change from time to time (see
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
). Your continued use of this Website after we make changes is deemed to be acceptance of those changes, so please check the policy periodically for updates.
Links to Other Sites
This website may contain links to other websites that may offer information of interest to you. Please note that this Privacy Policy does not apply to the privacy practices of those linked sites. Any personal information you choose to provide on those linked sites will be governed by the privacy policies of those sites. Before using the linked websites, please review their privacy policies to understand how they use and protect your personal information.
Use by Minors
This site is not intended for use by individuals in the US under the age of 18. If you fall within an age restriction, we ask that you not provide any Personal Data through this site. If you are a parent or legal guardian and a minor under your care has provided any Personal Data through this site, you may request that we remove such Personal Data by submitting a request as explained below under “Contact Us.”
Information We Collect and How We Use It
Summary
Our website may collect Personal Data, which is information that either directly identifies you or could reasonably be used in combination with other information to identify you; for purposes of this Privacy Policy, Personal Data also includes personal information as defined by federal, state, and international law. Examples of Personal Data that directly identify you include your name, contact information, email address, and other information in combination with such identifiers. This website may also collect Personal Data that does not directly identify you by name or contact information, but which may be used to identify that a specific computer or device has accessed our website.
Personal Data You Provide Us
This website may allow you to submit Personal Data for various reasons, such as to access content or features, registration for events, or to contact us with your questions or requests. We may ask you to provide certain Personal Data depending on the type of activity or communication in which you are engaged. Such Personal Data may include:
Contact Information. We collect this information to be able to communicate with you. This information may include your name, mailing address, telephone number, email address, age range, and other information you provide on our website. Where we solicit this information, we will explain how the information you provide is to be used and ask for your consent to such uses.
Interests and Preferences. This information helps us understand your interest in our products and services so that we can best serve you. This information may include contact preferences, languages, marketing preferences and demographic data. In some cases, we collect this information pursuant to your consent. In other cases, we collect this information automatically, for our legitimate business interests.
Transaction History. This information helps us fulfill services you request and respond to your inquiries. It also helps us to understand your interests and preferences. This information includes how you interact with us and use our websites, purchase and correspondence history, and customer account information. Where you have purchased a product or service from us, we use this information to perform our agreement with you. In other cases, we collect this information automatically, for our legitimate business interests.
Automatically Collected Data
When you use or interact with the Site, the following information is automatically logged in our systems. We use this information to secure our websites, network systems, and other assets. We collect this information automatically, for our legitimate business interests.
Log Data: Information that your browser automatically sends whenever you visit the Site. Log data includes your Internet Protocol address (so we understand which country you are connecting from when you visit the Site), domain and host from which you accessed the internet, browser type, operating system, and settings, the date and time of your access, and how you interacted with the Site.
Cookies: Information from cookies stored on your device. Please see the “Cookies” section below to learn more about how we use cookies and other technologies.
Device Information: Includes type of device you are using, operating system, settings, unique device identifiers, network information and other device-specific information. Information collected may depend on the type of device you use and its settings.
Usage Information: Information about how you use our Site, such as the types of content that you view or engage with, the features you use, the actions you take, the other users you interact with and the time, frequency and duration of your activities.
Web Beacons. Pages of our Website and our emails may contain small electronic files known as web beacons (also referred to as clear gifs, pixel tags, and single-pixel gifs) that permit the Company, for example, to count users who have visited those pages or opened an email and for other related website statistics (for example, recording the popularity of certain website content and verifying system and server integrity).
Please do not send or disclose to us any sensitive Personal Data through or using this Site, social media, email, physical mail, telephone conversations or any other form of communication with us unless we specifically ask for it. Examples of sensitive Personal Data include Social Security numbers, information related to racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religion or philosophical beliefs, health, sex life or sexual orientation, criminal background, or trade union membership, or biometric or genetic data for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual.
Third-Party Use of Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Some content or applications, including advertisements, on the Website are served by third parties, including advertisers, ad networks and servers, content providers, and application providers. These third parties may use cookies alone or in conjunction with web beacons or other tracking technologies to collect information about you when you use our website. The information they collect may be associated with your personal information or they may collect information, including personal information, about your online activities over time and across different websites and other online services. They may use this information to provide you with interest-based (behavioral) advertising or other targeted content.
We do not control these third parties' tracking technologies or how they may be used. If you have any questions about an advertisement or other targeted content, you should contact the responsible provider directly. For information about how you can opt out of receiving targeted advertising from many providers, see Choices About How We Use and Disclose Your Information.
Third Party Sources
We may collect Personal Data about you from third party sources with which you interact to add to the information that you provide, or which is automatically collected by the Site, as explained above. This supplemental information allows us to enhance our ability to provide you with content that better meets your interests.
Social Media
Online social media platforms allow users to interact with others, including sharing information, content, and images. We may offer social media platforms or interact with platforms offered on third party sites. We may collect information about you to facilitate your use of such social media platforms. If you use such social media platforms, you acknowledge that we may be able to access any information you make public through such sites and other information you allow us to have through use of privacy settings on such third party sites.
How We Use Your Personal Data:
We may use your Personal Data as necessary for certain legitimate business interests, which include the following:
For administrative maintenance of the website, such as to authenticate Site visitors and provide access to the Site.
To provide information or respond to your inquiries and fulfill your requests for products, services, and information.
To provide you with further information about CBG and its products through advertising across multiple channels including but not limited to email, direct mail, digital advertising, telephone, and other advertising channels.
To provide, maintain and improve the content and functionality of the Site. For example, we regularly fix bugs or user experience issues that may be tied to particular user accounts. We use cookies to analyze how users interact with our Site, and that analysis can help us build a better Site.
To identify you and prevent further unwanted processing if you request it and applicable law allows it.
To prevent fraud or criminal activity, misuse of our products or services, and ensure the security of our computer systems, architecture, and networks; and
To fulfill legal and regulatory obligations such as to (a) comply with a legal process, like a subpoena; (b) respond to requests from public and government authorities including authorities that may be located outside your country of residence; (c) enforce our Terms of Use; (d) protect our operations; (e) protect our rights, privacy, safety or property; and (f) allow us to pursue remedies or damages that we may sustain, as required or permitted by the law.
Disclosure of Your Information
We may disclose aggregated information about our users, and information that does not identify any individual, without restriction.
We may disclose personal information that we collect or you provide as described in this privacy policy:
To our subsidiaries and affiliates.
To contractors, service providers, and other third parties we use to support our business and who are bound by contractual obligations to keep personal information confidential and use it only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them.
To a buyer or other successor in the event of a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of CBG’s assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which personal information held by CBG about our Website users is among the assets transferred.
To third parties to market their products or services to you if you have not opted out of these disclosures. We contractually require these third parties to keep personal information confidential and use it only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them. For more information, see
Choices About How We Use and Disclose Your Information
.
To fulfill the purpose for which you provide it.
For any other purpose disclosed by us when you provide the information.
With your consent.
We may also disclose your personal information:
To comply with any court order, law, or legal process, including to respond to any government or regulatory request.
To enforce or apply our
terms and conditions
and other agreements, including for billing and collection purposes.
If we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to protect the rights, property, or safety of CBG, our customers, or others.
Choices About How We Use and Disclose Your Information
We strive to provide you with choices regarding the personal information you provide to us. We have created mechanisms to provide you with the following control over your information:
Tracking Technologies and Advertising
.
You can set your browser to refuse all or some browser cookies, or to alert you when cookies are being sent. If you disable or refuse cookies, please note that some parts of this site may then be inaccessible or not function properly.
Targeted Advertising.
If you do not want us to use information that we collect or that you provide to us to deliver advertisements according to our advertisers' target-audience preferences, you can opt-out by sending us an email with your request to
privacy@chargebackgurus.com
. For this opt-out to function, it may be necessary for you to have your browser set to accept all browser cookies.
We do not control third parties' collection or use of your information to serve interest-based advertising. However, these third parties may provide you with ways to choose not to have your information collected or used in this way. You can opt out of receiving targeted ads from members of the Network Advertising Initiative ("
NAI
") on the NAI's
website
.
Residents of certain states may have additional personal information rights and choices. Please see
Your State Privacy Rights
for more information.
Accessing and Correcting Your Information
You may also send us an email at
privacy@chargebackgurus.com
to request access to, correct, or delete any personal information that you have provided to us. We cannot delete your personal information except by also deleting your user account. We may not accommodate a request to change information if we believe the change would violate any law or legal requirement or cause the information to be incorrect.
Residents of certain states may have additional personal information rights and choices. Please see
Your State Privacy Rights
for more information.
Your State Privacy Rights
State consumer privacy laws may provide their residents with additional rights regarding our use of their personal information.
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Florida, Indiana, Iowa, Montana, Oregon, Tennessee, Texas, Utah, and Virginia provide (now or in the future) their state residents with rights to:
Confirm whether we process their personal information.
Access and delete certain personal information.
Correct inaccuracies in their personal information, taking into account the information's nature processing purpose (excluding Iowa and Utah).
Data portability.
Opt-out of personal data processing for:
targeted advertising (excluding Iowa);
sales; or
profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects (excluding Iowa and Utah).
Either limit (opt-out of) or require consent to process sensitive personal data.
The exact scope of these rights may vary by state. To exercise any of these rights please send us an email to
privacy@chargebackgurus.com
and include details about your request including your name, email address on file, your state of residence, and which rights you are exercising. To appeal a decision regarding a consumer rights request, please reply to our email communication regarding the request you wish to appeal and explain the reasons for your appeal.
Nevada provides its residents with a limited right to opt-out of certain personal information sales. Residents who wish to exercise this sale opt-out rights may submit a request to this designated address:
privacy@chargebackgurus.com
. However, please know we do not currently sell data triggering that statute's opt-out requirements.
Data Retention
We will keep your Personal Data for as long as reasonably necessary for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy, including to (1) pursue legitimate business purposes, (2) while we have a contractual or business relationship with you, (3) to resolve disputes or establish legal defenses, (4) conduct audits, (5) enforce our agreements, and (6) as required by law (e.g. for regulatory reporting, legal, tax, accounting or other purposes), whichever period is the longer. To determine the appropriate retention period for your Personal Data, we will consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Data collected, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Data, the purposes for which we use your Personal Data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and applicable legal requirements.
Security
It is CBG’s objective to maintain reasonable organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect Personal Data under our control. However, no data transmission over the Internet or data storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure. If you have concerns about the security of your Personal Data, please contact our data protection team at privacy@chargebackgurus.com.
Cookies
Our Site uses cookies to operate and administer our Site and to make it easier for you to use the Site during future visits.
What are Cookies?
A “cookie” is a small data file sent to your browser by a website you visit and subsequently stored on your browser. Cookies help to make your experience on our site easier. For example, if you register or log in, cookies will remember your username to make future log in easier. They can also remember your customized user preferences so that you receive information on our Site in ways that you like. Cookies also help us better understand how many visitors use our Site and what pages they are visiting (known as “traffic data”), to help us improve our Site.
Some cookies expire after a certain amount of time or upon logging out (session cookies); others remain on your computer or terminal device for a longer period (persistent cookies). Our Site uses first party cookies (cookies set directly by CBG) as well as third party cookies (set by others), as described below.
By choosing to use our Site after having been notified of our use of cookies in the ways described in this Privacy Policy, and, in applicable jurisdictions, through notice and acknowledgement of your consent, you agree to such use.
The Site uses the technologies described below.
Strictly Necessary Cookies
We use cookies that are strictly necessary to provide users with access to the Site and to use some of their features, such as the ability to log-in and access to secure areas. These cookies are essential for using and navigating the Site. Without these cookies, basic functions of our Site would not work. Because these cookies are strictly necessary to deliver the Site, users cannot opt out of their deposit.
We also use a cookie to record when a user has agreed to the cookie consent banner.
Optional Cookies
We use “analytics” cookies that allow us to recognize and count the number of visitors and to see how visitors move around the Site when they are using it. This helps us to improve the way our Site works, for example by making sure users are finding what they need easily. These cookies provide us only with anonymous traffic data (like number of page views, number of visitors, and time spent on each page). These cookies may also allow us to track how often posts on third party websites, such as social media sites, are clicked on.
Optional cookies are deposited on our Site by Google as part of our use of Google Analytics. These cookies help to provide you with content that may be tailored to your interests and to recognize you across different media. To learn more about how Google Analytics collects and uses personal data, please refer to their privacy policy, which can be accessed here:
Google Privacy Policy
. To opt out of being recognized by Google Analytics across all websites, visit
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
. You may also opt out by downloading and installing an
opt-out add-on
for your web browser.
Your Choices
In most web browsers, you will find a “help” section on the toolbar. Please refer to this section for information on how to receive a notification when you are receiving a new cookie and how to turn cookies off. Please see the links below for guidance on how to modify your web browser’s settings on the most popular browsers:
Internet Explorer
Mozilla Firefox
Google Chrome
Apple Safari
Please note that if you limit the ability of websites to set cookies, you may be unable to access certain parts of the Site and you may not be able to benefit from the full functionality of the Site.
If you access the Site on your mobile device, you may not be able to control tracking technologies through the settings.
Changes to the Privacy Statement
The Site and our business may change from time to time. As a result, we may change this Privacy Policy at any time and when we do, we will post an updated version on this page and change the “Effective Date” date above, unless another type of notice is required by the applicable law. You should consult this Privacy Policy regularly for any changes. By continuing to use the Site or providing us with information after we have posted an updated Privacy Policy, or notified you if applicable, you consent to the revised Privacy Policy and practices described in it.
Transfer of Personal Data — International Users
CBG is based in the United States. If you are accessing our Site from the European Union, United Kingdom, Switzerland or other regions with laws governing data collection and use, please note that your Personal Data will be transmitted to our servers and/or those of our service providers located in the United States as necessary to provide you with the information that you requested, administer our agreement with you, or to respond to your requests as described in this Privacy Policy. The United States may have data protection laws that are different than the laws in effect in the country in which you are located. Where we transfer your Personal Data out of the EU, the United Kingdom or Switzerland, we will take steps to ensure that your Personal Data receives an adequate level of protection and your rights continue to be protected.
Contact Us
Please feel free to contact us if you have any questions about
CBG
’s Privacy Statement or the information practices on this Site. You may contact us as follows:
By email to
privacy@
chargebackgurus.com
or
By postal mail to:
Chargeback Gurus
Attention: Privacy Officer
5601 Democracy Drive
Suite 195 Plano, TX 75024
Sub-policy 19
https://www.appsflyer.com/legal/privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Website Privacy Policy
Last updated May 28, 2024
This Privacy Policy applies to: (i) use of the AppsFlyer owned and operated Websites (appsflyer.com, onelink.me and their subdomains); (ii) our marketing activities including, registrations as part of webinars, conference events, emails etc.; and (iii) any other product or activity that links to, or otherwise references, this privacy policy (collectively, the “Marketing Platforms“). We respect your privacy rights and value your trust. This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, receive, use, store, share, transfer, and process your personal information, as well as your rights in determining what we do with the information that we collect or hold about you.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use by customers of the AppsFlyer service, which is described under our
Services Privacy Policy
.
Information We Collect
When using or interacting with our Marketing Platforms, we may collect or receive the following types of information (collectively, “Information”).
“Personal Information” such as name, email, contact details or any other personal content that you provide to us whether through a form or field on our website or any other communication (e.g. email, phone, post etc.).
“Technical Information” such as browser type, operating system, device type, IP address and other similar technical information typically received from a browser or device automatically when visiting or interacting with our Marketing Platforms. This may include the referring URL that led you to our website.
“Usage Information” such as the pages you visited on our website, where you clicked, searches performed on our website and other similar information related to how you have used our website. It may also include information related to whether you receive, opened or clicked on any links in an email sent to you.
We understand that certain Technical information or Usage Information may, either alone or when combined with other data, be deemed personal data under various laws and jurisdictions and we are committed to treating such data in compliance with applicable laws.
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
Depending on the type of Information, we may collect or receive Information in the following ways:
When you voluntarily share Information with us. For example, when you register to one of our events, request that we contact you through our online forms, submit your CV, or when you request to receive certain content that we may make available (e.g. research and white papers).
Through use of cookies and other similar technologies (e.g. HTML5 Local Storage, LSO, web beacons, JavaScript, etc.). These technologies help us to analyze how our Marketing Platforms are used and to tailor content that is relevant to you. It also helps us to deliver more relevant advertisements to you on our own or third party sites. For more information on such technologies, including how to manage your cookie preferences please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information obtained from third party sources. This includes Information received through the various business support tools and services that we use (e.g. marketing platforms, analytics services etc.) and public sources such as social media sites. We may combine the Information received through these sources with other Information we have in order to ensure our records are up to date and so that we are able to provide you with relevant content.
You have choices in how we collect and use Information. See the “
Your Choices
” section below for more information.
The Purposes
We use Information for the following purposes:
To process your inquiries and to respond to your requests. For example, when you contact us to learn more about our products or services or when you request to receive certain materials from us (e.g. white papers, research papers, product and services information). Additionally, if you submit your CV to us, we use it to evaluate your candidacy (including by assessing your qualifications and skills).
To send you information related to our services and products that we believe may interest you, such as newsletters or product and service updates. Such communications will be sent to you when you have chosen to receive such communication or when we have a legitimate interest to market our products and services. In any event, you will always be able to opt-out of receiving such communications. Opting out may be done either directly in the communication received or through the ways described in the instructions in the “
Your Choices
” section below.
To understand how you have used our Marketing Platforms and to customize them in accordance with your interests and past actions and choices. We do this based on our legitimate interest to operate our Marketing Platforms, diagnose any problems with the Marketing Platforms and to improve the Marketing Platforms and your experience when navigating through them.
In our legitimate interest to prevent fraud or harm to us or to any third party, and ensure the security of our network and services.
Where it is necessary for AppsFlyer to comply with its legal obligations and to exercise and enforce its legal rights.
We may use certain third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Who We Share Information With
In order to conduct our business and operate our Marketing Platforms, we may share Information with various third parties, such as:
Our subsidiary companies and global branches.
Third parties that help us operate our Marketing Platforms (e.g. hosting company, recruitment platforms and agencies, payment processors, business management and email distribution service providers and other similar service providers). These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When required by law, such as to comply with court orders, search warrants, regulatory orders, subpoenas, and other lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
Legal authorities, consultants, advisors or service providers when required to investigate, respond to, or prevent, fraud; or when required to ensure the security of our network and services and protect the safety of AppsFlyer or the public.
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, Information may be transferred to the merging or acquiring company, as well as to any advisors representing a party during discussions of such merger or acquisition.
AppsFlyer resellers, agents, partners or service providers acting on our behalf in connection with the offering of AppsFlyer’s products or services.
Third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Without derogating from the foregoing, AppsFlyer may publish general aggregate and unidentifiable information (e.g. statistical information) relating to use of its Marketing Platforms.
Cross Border Data Transfers and Mechanisms
We may need to transfer Information to countries where we and/or our service providers operate. Such countries may be different from the country in which the data originated and where data protection laws may not be equivalent to, or offer the same protection as, those in your country. By using our Marketing Platforms, you agree to any such transfers. In any event, where appropriate given the nature of services, we will put in place agreements with our service providers to ensure a level of privacy consistent with the terms of this policy.
With regards to the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
AppsFlyer Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. AppsFlyer Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as well as to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view AppsFlyer’s certification, please visit
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over AppsFlyer Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, and in case of onward transfer of data to third parties, AppsFlyer maintains liability.
In compliance with the DPF Principles, AppsFlyer is committed to resolving any complaints arising regarding our processing of your personal data. You may direct your queries to privacy@appsflyer.com and, in compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we are committed to referring unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPF to Truste, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://trustarc.com/dispute-resolution/
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of Truste are provided at no cost to you and allow for binding arbitration.
Protecting Your Information
We strive to meet the highest standards of security measures across our business units. We have implemented appropriate technical and organizational measures based on industry-leading standards. Such measures are designed to protect against unauthorized access or unlawful processing of Personal Information and against accidental loss, destruction or damage of Personal Information. As part of such measures, we have established various policies and procedures that guide us, including in respect of asset management, access management, physical security, people security, product security, cloud and network infrastructure security, third-party security, vulnerability management, security monitoring, and incident response.
Information Storage and Retention
We may store Information on our own servers as well as those operated by third party data hosting providers. As specified in Section 5 above (Cross Border Transfers), such servers may be located worldwide. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary to pursue the purpose of the collection. We may also retain your Personal Information for such time needed to pursue our legitimate business interests, in connection with any legal claims and compliance with legal obligations. When we use your information for direct marketing purposes, we will retain your data until you opt-out from receiving the marketing materials; provided that we will need to retain certain information to maintain a record of your request.
Modifications to This Policy
AppsFlyer may amend this Privacy Policy at any time, provided that in the event of a material change we shall provide notice on this page and/or a note near the link to this page. The updates shall apply immediately for new Information collected or provided as of the day of the update and following thirty (30) days for any Information collected or provided to AppsFlyer prior to the update date. If you do not agree to the terms of the new policy you are requested to contact the Legal Department using the contact details listed in Section 11 below. We encourage you to periodically review this page for any updates.
Your Choices
We provide you with various choices on how we may use Information in connection with: (i) our marketing activities; and (ii) our use of cookies and similar technologies to serve your interest-based advertisements and to analyze usage of our Marketing Platforms.
You may choose to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails, accessing the email preferences in your account settings page, or you can contact us at
https://www.appsflyer.com/company/contact/
. You can manage your preferences related to our use of cookies and similar technologies that we use, among other things, to provide you with targeted interest-based advertisements and to analyze your use of our Marketing Platforms – please see our
Cookie Policy
for instructions. Additionally, certain advertisers (including Google) we work with may be members of NAI and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance. You may opt-out from such advertisers’ services here or at the following link:
https://youradchoices.com/
In addition, the laws of some jurisdictions may provide you with various rights in connection with our processing of certain Information. Such rights may include:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. For any additional information regarding such rights or to exercise any such rights please contact AppsFlyer at: privacy@appsflyer.com
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Social Media and Third Party Services
Our website may offer a blog with ‘comments’ section and various social media features, such as a ‘share’ button or links to third party websites and services, including Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+ and Facebook. When using any such features, certain information may be collected by such third parties, including your IP address or which page you are visiting on our website, and such third parties may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Any data collected by such third parties is governed by such third party’s privacy policy. You are encouraged to carefully review such third party privacy policies.
Children’s Privacy
AppsFlyer does not knowingly collect or process personal data from or with respect to children under the age of 16, and you must be 16 years of age or older in order to establish an account for AppsFlyer’s Services. If you are a parent or legal guardian and believe that your child under the age of 16 has submitted his or her personal data or other data without your consent, permission, or authorization – please let us know immediately, and we will promptly act to remove your child’s data from our database, cease the use of such data and inform any other party we suspect to have access to such data to do the same.
California Privacy Rights
We may collect personal information about California residents who are afforded additional rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 et seq. (the “CCPA“). If you are a California resident, you can see more details about the types of personal information we have collected from you in the past 12 months and may collect from you in Section 1 above (
Information We Collect
) and how we collect such personal information in Section 2 above (
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
). The purposes for which we collect your personal information are further described in Section 3 above (
The Purpose
). We do not share your personal information with any third party except as further described in Section 4 above (
Who We Share Information With
). Please refer to the other terms of this Privacy Policy to see further rights afforded to you and how we use your personal information.
We do not “Sell” (as defined in the CCPA) your personal information which we have collected or may collect and in the event we will Sell your personal information, we will notify you by updating this Privacy Policy in accordance with Section 8 above (
Modifications to this Policy
) and we will provide you with the option of opting out of such “sale”.
You, as a California resident, have certain rights regarding your personal information pursuant to the CCPA, subject to certain restrictions under applicable laws, including the rights to access your personal information, to delete your personal information, and to opt out of the “sale” of your personal data. You may request any of these by contacting us via email at
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. Upon your request, we will verify that you are the person making this request and in order to do so, we may request identification documents from you.
Contacting Us
If you have any questions or concerns about this Website Privacy Policy, the information we collect, the practices of AppsFlyer, or your dealings with the Marketing Platforms, please contact us or our Data Protection Officer by sending an email to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany Schönhauser Allee 180, 10119 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49 30 166373500).
Our Cookies Policy
AppsFlyer respects your privacy as our website user. We use cookies to improve your user experience and for remarketing. Some of this data may be shared with select partners. See our
cookies policy
for more information.
Reject all cookies
Accept all cookies
Customize
Cookie Preference Center
AppsFlyer uses Cookies to provide, maintain, and improve our websites, to optimize our offerings and marketing activities, and to provide our visitors and users with a better experience, for example, in order to maintain your preferences, to better secure our websites, to identify technical issues, and to monitor and improve the overall performance of our websites.
More information
Allow All
Please select which Cookies you approve, you may choose all options.
Always Active
Necessary Cookies are enabled for the assurance and function of a properly run website, and they cannot be disabled. They are usually only set in response to actions permitted by you, such as, enabling functions like navigation and access to secure areas of the website. These Cookies do not store personal information that will be used for other purposes.
Performance Cookies
These Cookies provide us with aggregated (anonymous) insights into website enhancement and performance improvement. These cookies allow us to measure and improve the performance of our Sites. They help us know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the website.
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Functional Cookies
These Cookies enable us to provide enhanced functionality and personalization through our Sites and allow for a better user experience. These may be set by us (first-party Cookies) or by third-party providers who work with us (third-party Cookies).
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label